Missouri, session 2026, HB2637.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 43.500, 43.503, 43.506, 43.509, 43.527, 43.530, 43.533, 43.650,
43.651, 56.265, 57.540, 211.021, 211.071, 211.319, 211.331, 211.341, 217.362, 217.690,
217.760, 455.050, 527.270, 556.061, 557.011, 557.021, 558.011, 558.016, 558.019, 558.026,
558.031, 558.046, 559.115, 565.002, 565.050, 565.052, 565.054, 565.056, 565.072, 565.073,
565.074, 565.076, 565.090, 565.091, 565.225, 565.227, 566.030, 566.032, 566.060, 566.103,
566.125, 566.203, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 568.045, 568.060, 577.800, 589.400, 589.401,
589.402, 589.403, 589.404, 589.405, 589.407, 589.410, 589.414, 589.415, 589.417, 589.425,
590.192, 632.305, 632.489, 632.492, 632.495, 632.504, and 632.520, RSMo, sections 211.021,
211.071, 211.331, 211.341, 211.342, 211.436, 217.362, 217.690, 217.760, 557.011, 557.021,
558.011, 558.019, 558.026, 558.031, 558.046, 559.115, 566.030, 566.060, 566.125, 566.210,
566.211, 568.060, and 589.425 as enacted by senate substitute no. 3 for senate bill number 888,
one hundred third general assembly, second regular session, section 589.407 as truly agreed to
and finally passed by house committee substitute for senate bill no. 982, one hundred third
general assembly, second regular session, and sections 589.400 and 589.414 as enacted by senate
substitute for senate committee substitute for house committee substitute for house bills nos.
2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551, one hundred third general assembly, second regular session, are
repealed and ninety-four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 27.117,
43.500, 43.503, 43.506, 43.509, 43.527, 43.530, 56.265, 57.540, 211.021, 211.071, 211.319,
211.331, 211.341, 211.342, 217.362, 217.690, 217.760, 455.050, 455.098, 527.270, 544.667,
556.061, 557.011, 557.021, 558.011, 558.016, 558.019, 558.026, 558.031, 558.046, 559.115,
565.002, 565.050, 565.052, 565.054, 565.056, 565.072, 565.073, 565.074, 565.076, 565.090,
565.091, 565.225, 565.227, 565.260, 565.400, 565.405, 566.030, 566.032, 566.060, 566.103,
566.125, 566.203, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 568.045, 568.060, 573.570, 573.575, 577.800,
589.400, 589.401, 589.403, 589.404, 589.405, 589.407, 589.410, 589.411, 589.412, 589.413,
589.414, 589.415, 589.417, 589.425, 589.900, 589.902, 590.192, 632.305, 632.489, 632.492,
632.495, 632.504, 632.520, 632.580, 632.585, 632.590, 632.593, 632.595, 632.600, 632.605,
632.610, and 1, to read as follows:
27.117. A prosecuting or circuit attorney may request assistance from the attorney
general, or one of his or her assistants, to assist in the prosecution of a violation of sections
565.090, 565.091, 565.225, 565.227, 565.400, 565.405, 573.570 or 573.575, where the offense
occurred in more than one jurisdiction of the state. The prosecuting or circuit attorney
may request any resource or capability of the attorney general when prosecuting such
cases.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 3
43.500. As used in sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600, the following terms mean:
(1) "Administration of criminal justice", performance of any of the following activities:
detection, apprehension, detention, pretrial release, post-trial release, prosecution, adjudication,
correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders. The
administration of criminal justice shall include the screening of employees or applicants seeking
employment with criminal justice agencies, criminal identification activities, and the collection,
storage, and dissemination of criminal history information, including fingerprint searches,
photographs, and other unique biometric identification;
(2) "Central repository", the division within the Missouri state highway patrol
responsible for compiling and disseminating complete and accurate criminal history records and
statistics;
(3) "Committee", criminal records and justice information advisory committee;
(4) "Comparable ordinance violation", a violation of an ordinance having all the
essential elements of a statutory felony or a class A misdemeanor;
(5) "Criminal history record information", information collected by criminal justice
agencies on individuals consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests,
detentions, indictments, informations, or other formal criminal charges, and any disposition
arising therefrom, sentencing, correctional supervision, and release;
(6) "Final disposition", the formal conclusion of a criminal proceeding at whatever stage
it occurs in the criminal justice system;
(7) "Missouri charge code", a unique number assigned by the office of state courts
administrator to an offense for tracking and grouping offenses. Beginning January 1, 2005, the
complete charge code shall consist of digits assigned by the office of state courts administrator,
the two-digit national crime information center modifiers and a single digit designating attempt,
accessory, or conspiracy. The only exception to the January 1, 2005, date shall be the courts that
are not using the statewide court automation case management pursuant to section 476.055; the
effective date will be as soon thereafter as economically feasible for all other courts;
(8) "State offense cycle number", a unique number, supplied by or approved by the
Missouri state highway patrol, on the state criminal fingerprint card. The offense cycle number,
OCN, is used to link the identity of a person, through unique biometric identification, to one or
many offenses for which the person is arrested or charged. The OCN will be used to track an
offense incident from the date of arrest to the final disposition when the offender exits from the
criminal justice system;
(9) "Unique biometric identification", automated methods of recognizing and identifying
an individual based on a physiological characteristic. Biometric identification methods may
include but are not limited to facial recognition, fingerprints, palm prints, hand geometry, iris
recognition, and retinal scan.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 4
43.503. 1. For the purpose of maintaining complete and accurate criminal history record
information, all police officers of this state, the clerk of each court, the department of
corrections, the sheriff of each county, the chief law enforcement official of a city not within a
county and the prosecuting attorney of each county or the circuit attorney of a city not within
a county shall submit certain criminal arrest, charge, and disposition information to the central
repository for filing without undue delay in the form and manner required by sections 43.500
to [43.651] 43.600.
2. All law enforcement agencies making misdemeanor and felony arrests as determined
by section 43.506 shall furnish without undue delay, to the central repository, fingerprints,
photograph, and if available, any other unique biometric identification collected, charges,
appropriate charge codes, and descriptions of all persons who are arrested for such offenses on
standard fingerprint forms supplied or approved by the highway patrol or electronically in a
format and manner approved by the highway patrol and in compliance with the standards set by
the Federal Bureau of Investigation in its Automated Fingerprint Identification System or its
successor program. All such agencies shall also notify the central repository of all decisions not
to refer such arrests for prosecution. An agency making such arrests may enter into
arrangements with other law enforcement agencies for the purpose of furnishing without undue
delay such fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any other unique biometric identification
collected, charges, appropriate charge codes, and descriptions to the central repository upon its
behalf.
3. In order for the Missouri office of prosecution services to maintain complete and
accurate statewide reports as required by section 56.750, on or before January 1, 2028, and
thereafter, all police officers of this state, the sheriff and each deputy sheriff of each county, and
the chief law enforcement official of a city not within a county and his or her officers shall
submit referrals for any traffic violation, ordinance violation, or misdemeanor or felony offense
referred to a prosecuting or circuit attorney in the form and manner approved by the Missouri
office of prosecution services as required by subdivision (7) of subsection 1 of section 56.750.
At a minimum, any referral to a prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney for a felony offense shall
include a probable cause statement and an investigative report. Any law enforcement agency
that violates this subsection shall be ineligible to receive state or federal funds that would
otherwise be paid to such agency for law enforcement, safety, or criminal justice purposes.
4. In instances where an individual [less than seventeen] under eighteen years of age
and not currently certified as an adult is taken into custody for an offense [which] that would
be a class A or B felony, felony under chapter 566, or two felony offenses arising from
distinct acts committed within one year of each other, if committed by an adult, the arresting
officer shall take fingerprints for the central repository. These fingerprints shall be taken on
fingerprint cards supplied by or approved by the highway patrol or transmitted electronically in

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 5
a format and manner approved by the highway patrol and in compliance with the standards set
by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in its Automated Fingerprint Identification System or its
successor program. [The fingerprint cards shall be so constructed that the name of the juvenile
should not be made available to the central repository.] The individual's name and the unique
number associated with the fingerprints and other pertinent information shall be provided to the
court of jurisdiction by the agency taking the juvenile into custody. The juvenile's fingerprints
and other information shall be forwarded to the central repository and the courts without undue
delay. The fingerprint information from the card shall be captured and stored in the automated
fingerprint identification system operated by the central repository. In the event the fingerprints
are found to match other tenprints or unsolved latent prints, the central repository shall notify
the submitting agency who shall notify the court of jurisdiction as per local agreement. Under
section 211.031, in instances where a juvenile over fifteen and one-half years of age is alleged
to have violated a state or municipal traffic ordinance or regulation, which does not constitute
a felony, and the juvenile court does not have jurisdiction, the juvenile shall not be fingerprinted
unless certified as an adult. Records of a juvenile who has been fingerprinted under this
subsection shall be closed records as provided under section 610.120.
5. Upon certification of the individual as an adult, the certifying court shall order a law
enforcement agency to immediately fingerprint and photograph the individual and certification
papers will be forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency with the order for
fingerprinting. The law enforcement agency shall submit such fingerprints, photograph, and
certification papers to the central repository within fifteen days and shall furnish the offense
cycle number associated with the fingerprints to the prosecuting attorney or the circuit attorney
of a city not within a county and to the clerk of the court ordering the subject fingerprinted. If
the juvenile is acquitted of the crime and is no longer certified as an adult, the prosecuting
attorney shall notify within fifteen days the central repository of the change of status of the
juvenile. Records of a child who has been fingerprinted and photographed after being taken into
custody shall be closed records as provided under section 610.100 if a petition has not been filed
within thirty days of the date that the child was taken into custody; and if a petition for the child
has not been filed within one year of the date the child was taken into custody, any records
relating to the child concerning the alleged offense may be expunged under the procedures in
sections 610.122 to 610.126.
6. The prosecuting attorney of each county or the circuit attorney of a city not within a
county or the municipal prosecuting attorney shall notify the central repository on standard
forms supplied by the highway patrol or in a manner approved by the highway patrol of his or
her decision to not file a criminal charge on any charge referred to such prosecuting attorney or
circuit attorney for criminal charges. All records forwarded to the central repository and the
courts by prosecutors or circuit attorneys as required by sections 43.500 to 43.530 shall include

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 6
the state offense cycle number of the offense, the charge code for the offense, and the originating
agency identifier number of the reporting prosecutor, using such numbers as assigned by the
highway patrol.
7. The clerk of the courts of each county or city not within a county or municipal court
clerk shall furnish the central repository, on standard forms supplied by the highway patrol or
in a manner approved by the highway patrol, with a record of all charges filed, including all
those added subsequent to the filing of a criminal court case, amended charges, and all final
dispositions of cases for which the central repository has a record of an arrest or a record of
fingerprints reported pursuant to sections 43.500 to 43.506. Such information shall include, for
each charge:
(1) All judgments of not guilty, acquittals on the ground of mental disease or defect
excluding responsibility, judgments or pleas of guilty including the sentence, if any, or
probation, if any, pronounced by the court, nolle pros, discharges, releases and dismissals in the
trial court;
(2) Court orders filed with the clerk of the courts which reverse a reported conviction
or vacate or modify a sentence;
(3) Judgments terminating or revoking a sentence to probation, supervision or
conditional release and any resentencing after such revocation; and
(4) The offense cycle number of the offense, and the originating agency identifier
number of the sentencing court, using such numbers as assigned by the highway patrol.
8. The clerk of the courts of each county or city not within a county shall furnish, to the
department of corrections or department of mental health, court judgment and sentence
documents and the state offense cycle number and the charge code of the offense which resulted
in the commitment or assignment of an offender to the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections or the department of mental health if the person is committed pursuant to chapter
100 552. This information shall be reported to the department of corrections or the department of
101 mental health at the time of commitment or assignment. If the offender was already in the
102 custody of the department of corrections or the department of mental health at the time of such
103 subsequent conviction, the clerk shall furnish notice of such subsequent conviction to the
104 appropriate department by certified mail, return receipt requested, or in a manner and format
105 mutually agreed to, within fifteen days of such disposition.
106 9. Information and fingerprints, photograph and if available, any other unique biometric
107 identification collected, forwarded to the central repository, normally obtained from a person at
108 the time of the arrest, may be obtained at any time the subject is in the criminal justice system
109 or committed to the department of mental health. A law enforcement agency or the department
110 of corrections may fingerprint, photograph, and capture any other unique biometric identification
111 of the person unless collecting other unique biometric identification of the person is not

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 7
112 financially feasible for the law enforcement agency, and obtain the necessary information at any
113 time the subject is in custody. If at the time of any court appearance, the defendant has not been
114 fingerprinted and photographed for an offense in which a fingerprint and photograph is required
115 by statute to be collected, maintained, or disseminated by the central repository, the court shall
116 order a law enforcement agency or court marshal to fingerprint and photograph immediately the
117 defendant. The order for fingerprints shall contain the offense, charge code, date of offense, and
118 any other information necessary to complete the fingerprint card. The law enforcement agency
119 or court marshal shall submit such fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any other unique
120 biometric identification collected, to the central repository without undue delay and within thirty
121 days and shall furnish the offense cycle number associated with the fingerprints to the
122 prosecuting attorney or the circuit attorney of a city not within a county and to the court clerk
123 of the court ordering the subject fingerprinted.
124 10. The department of corrections and the department of mental health shall furnish the
125 central repository with all information concerning the receipt, escape, execution, death, release,
126 pardon, parole, commutation of sentence, granting of executive clemency, legal name change,
127 or discharge of an individual who has been sentenced to that department's custody for any
128 offenses which are mandated by law to be collected, maintained or disseminated by the central
129 repository. All records forwarded to the central repository by the department as required by
130 sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600 shall include the offense cycle number of the offense, and
131 the originating agency identifier number of the department using such numbers as assigned by
132 the highway patrol.
43.506. 1. Those offenses considered reportable for the purposes of sections 43.500 to
[43.651] 43.600 include all felonies; class A misdemeanors; all violations for driving under the
influence of drugs or alcohol; any offense that can be enhanced to a class A misdemeanor or
higher for subsequent violations; and comparable ordinance violations consistent with the
reporting standards established by the National Crime Information Center, Federal Bureau of
Investigation, for the Federal Interstate Identification Index System; and all cases arising under
chapter 566. The following types of offenses shall not be considered reportable for the purposes
of sections 57.403, 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600, and 595.200 to 595.218: nonspecific charges of
suspicion or investigation, general traffic violations and all misdemeanor violations of the state
wildlife code. All offenses considered reportable shall be reviewed annually and noted in the
Missouri charge code manual established in section 43.512. All information collected pursuant
to sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600 shall be available only as set forth in section 610.120.
2. Law enforcement agencies, court clerks, prosecutors and custody agencies may report
required information by electronic medium either directly to the central repository or indirectly
to the central repository via other criminal justice agency computer systems in the state with the
approval of the highway patrol, based upon standards established by the advisory committee.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 8
3. In addition to the repository of fingerprint records for individual offenders and
applicants, the central repository of criminal history and identification records for the state shall
maintain a repository of latent prints, palm prints and other unique biometric identification
submitted to the repository.
43.509. The director of the department of public safety shall, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 536, establish such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement the
provisions of sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600. All collection and dissemination of criminal
history information shall be in compliance with chapter 610 and applicable federal laws or
regulations. Such rules shall relate to the collection of criminal history information from or
dissemination of such information to criminal justice, noncriminal justice, and private agencies
or citizens both in this and other states. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the
authority of sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600 shall become effective unless it has been
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 536.024.
43.527. For purposes of sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600, all federal and nonstate of
Missouri agencies and persons shall pay for criminal records checks, fingerprint searches, and
any of the information as defined in subdivision (5) of section 43.500, when such information
is not related to the administration of criminal justice. There shall be no charge for information
supplied to criminal justice agencies for the administration of criminal justice. For purposes of
sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600, the administration of criminal justice is defined in
subdivision (1) of section 43.500 and shall be available only as set forth in section 610.120.
43.530. 1. For each request requiring the payment of a fee received by the central
repository, the requesting entity shall pay a fee of not more than nine dollars per request for
criminal history record information not based on a fingerprint search. In each year beginning
on or after January 1, 2010, the superintendent may increase the fee paid by requesting entities
by an amount not to exceed one dollar per year, however, under no circumstance shall the fee
paid by requesting entities exceed fifteen dollars per request.
2. For each request requiring the payment of a fee received by the central repository, the
requesting entity shall pay a fee of not more than twenty dollars per request for criminal history
record information based on a fingerprint search, unless the request is required under the
provisions of subdivision (6) of section 210.481, section 210.487, or section 571.101, in which
case the fee shall be fourteen dollars.
3. A request made under subsections 1 and 2 of this section shall be limited to check and
search on one individual. Each request shall be accompanied by a check, warrant, voucher,
money order, or electronic payment payable to the state of Missouri-criminal record system or
payment shall be made in a manner approved by the highway patrol. The highway patrol may
establish procedures for receiving requests for criminal history record information for
classification and search for fingerprints, from courts and other entities, and for the payment of

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 9
such requests. There is hereby established by the treasurer of the state of Missouri a fund to be
entitled as the "Criminal Record System Fund". Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary, if the moneys collected and deposited into this fund are not totally
expended annually for the purposes set forth in sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600, the
unexpended moneys in such fund shall remain in the fund and the balance shall be kept in the
fund to accumulate from year to year.
56.265. 1. The county prosecuting attorney in any county[, other than in a chartered
county,] shall receive an annual salary computed [using the following schedule, when applicable.
The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as shown for the year immediately
preceding the year for which the computation is done] as provided in this subsection.
(1) For a full-time [prosecutor] prosecuting attorney of a charter, first, or second
class county, or of a city not within a county, the [prosecutor] prosecuting attorney shall
receive compensation equal to one hundred percent of the compensation of [an associate] a
circuit judge[;] .
(2) [For a part-time prosecutor:] For a full-time prosecuting attorney of a third or
fourth class county, the prosecuting attorney shall receive compensation equal to one
hundred percent of the compensation of an associate circuit judge or, upon approval by
a majority of the county commission, the prosecuting attorney shall receive compensation
equal to ninety-five percent of the compensation of a circuit judge.
(3) Upon approval by a majority of the county commission, a part-time prosecuting
attorney shall receive compensation equal to between thirty and sixty percent of the
compensation of an associate circuit judge.

[Assessed Valuation Amount
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $37,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 38,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 39,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 41,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 43,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 45,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 47,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 49,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 51,000
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 53,000
300,000,000 or more 55,000]


CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 10
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, no
prosecuting attorney who has held the office of prosecuting attorney prior to January 1,
2027, shall have their compensation lowered by the implementation of the compensation
procedures of this section, nor shall any prosecuting attorney have their compensation
lowered during their tenure of office.
2. Two thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any prosecuting attorney only
if the prosecuting attorney has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction each
calendar year relating to the operations of the prosecuting attorney's office when approved by
a professional association of the county prosecuting attorneys of Missouri unless exempted from
the training by the professional association. The professional association approving the program
shall provide a certificate of completion to each prosecuting attorney who completes the training
program and shall send a list of certified prosecuting attorneys to the treasurer of each county
or city not within a county. Expenses incurred for attending the training session may be
reimbursed to the prosecuting attorney in the same manner as other expenses as may be
appropriated for that purpose.
3. Each calendar year, five thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any
prosecuting attorney only if the prosecuting attorney has collected the data described in
subsection 2 of section 56.750 in a manner approved by the prosecutors coordinators training
council and makes the data described in subsection 2 of section 56.750 readily accessible to the
Missouri office of prosecution services. The Missouri office of prosecution services shall
provide a certificate of compliance to each prosecuting attorney who complies with this
subsection and shall send a list of any certified prosecuting attorney to the respective treasurer
of each county or city not within a county.
4. For each calendar year, three thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any
prosecuting attorney only if the prosecuting attorney has provided discovery to criminal defense
attorneys who have entered an appearance on behalf of a defendant in a manner approved by the
prosecutors coordinators training council. The Missouri office of prosecution services shall
provide a certificate of compliance to each prosecuting attorney who complies with this
subsection and shall send a list of any certified prosecuting attorney to the respective treasurer
of each county or city not within a county.
5. As used in this section, the term "prosecuting attorney" includes the circuit attorney
of any city not within a county.
6. The prosecuting attorney of any county which becomes a county of the first
classification during a four-year term of office or a county which passed the proposition
authorized by subsection 1 of section 56.363 shall not be required to devote full time to such
office pursuant to section 56.067 until the beginning of the prosecuting attorney's next term of
office or until the proposition otherwise becomes effective.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 11
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any county with a
vacancy in the office of prosecuting attorney for more than sixty days may consolidate with
one contiguous county with a sitting prosecuting attorney upon a unanimous vote of the
county commissions of such counties to establish a cooperative regional prosecuting
attorney's office at any time. The prosecuting attorney of the contiguous county shall then
become the prosecuting attorney of that region for the remainder of that prosecuting
attorney's term of office or until such time as the governor appoints a prosecuting attorney
to fill the vacant prosecuting attorney position pursuant to section 105.030. Regional
prosecuting attorneys shall be designated as full-time prosecuting attorneys and shall be
compensated in the manner provided under the provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection
1 of this section. No two counties that each have sitting prosecuting attorneys shall be
permitted to consolidate in the manner described in this section.
8. The provisions of section 56.066 shall not apply to full-time prosecutors who are
compensated pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section.
9. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri State
Prosecutorial Services Grant Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the
general assembly.
(2) The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely as
provided in this section and shall be allocated to counties of the third and fourth
classification on the basis of need in order for such counties to be in compliance with the
prosecuting attorney compensation provisions of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(4) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other
funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited
to the fund.
57.540. 1. The sheriff of the City of St. Louis may employ an attorney at law to aid and
advise him in the discharge of his duties and to represent him in court[, which said attorney shall
be known as "sheriff's attorney", and who shall receive as compensation for his services as such
sheriff's attorney a sum of not less than three thousand dollars and not more than fifteen
thousand dollars per annum, payable in semimonthly installments]. The sheriff shall set the
compensation for an attorney hired pursuant to this section and such compensation shall
be paid out of the same funds and revenue as the sheriff of such city is paid.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 12
2. The attorney employed by a sheriff pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall
be employed at the pleasure of the sheriff.
[211.021. As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adult" [means], a person eighteen years of age or older;
(2) "Child" [means], any person under eighteen years of age;
(3) "Juvenile court" [means], the juvenile division or divisions of the
circuit court of the county, or judges while hearing juvenile cases assigned to
them;
(4) "Juvenile detention facility", a place for the temporary care
of a juvenile in judicial custody in a proceeding under subdivision (2) or
(3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031 and includes a place that is
physically confining, but does not include a jail or other adult detention
facility unless the juvenile is seventeen years of age or older or unless the
juvenile detention facility is operated, administered, and staffed
separately and independently of a jail or other adult detention facility and
used exclusively for the lawful custody and treatment of juveniles. A
juvenile detention facility may be located in the same building or grounds
as a jail or other adult detention facility if there is spatial separation
between the facilities which prevents haphazard or accidental contact
between juvenile and adult detainees; there is separation between juvenile
and adult program activities; and there are separate juvenile and adult
staff other than specialized support staff who have infrequent contact
with detainees. The facility may be owned or operated by public or
private agencies;
(5) "Legal custody" [means], the right to the care, custody and control
of a child and the duty to provide food, clothing, shelter, ordinary medical
care, education, treatment and discipline of a child. Legal custody may be
taken from a parent only by court action and if the legal custody is taken from
a parent without termination of parental rights, the parent's duty to provide
support continues even though the person having legal custody may provide
the necessities of daily living;
[(5)] (6) "Parent" [means], either a natural parent or a parent by
adoption and if the child is illegitimate, "parent" means the mother;
[(6)] (7) "Shelter care" [means], the temporary care of juveniles in
physically unrestricting facilities pending final court disposition. These
facilities may include:
(a) "Foster home", the private home of foster parents providing
twenty-four-hour care to one to three children unrelated to the foster parents
by blood, marriage or adoption;
(b) "Group foster home", the private home of foster parents providing
twenty-four-hour care to no more than six children unrelated to the foster
parents by blood, marriage or adoption;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 13
(c) "Group home", a child care facility which approximates a family
setting, provides access to community activities and resources, and provides
care to no more than twelve children.]
211.021. As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adult" [means], a person eighteen years of age or older;
(2) "Child" [means], any person under eighteen years of age;
(3) "Juvenile court" [means], the juvenile division or divisions of the circuit court of the
county, or judges while hearing juvenile cases assigned to them;
(4) "Juvenile detention facility", a place for the temporary care of a juvenile in
judicial custody in a proceeding under subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 1 of section
211.031 and includes a place that is physically confining, but does not include a jail or
other adult detention facility unless the juvenile is eighteen years of age or older or unless
the juvenile detention facility is operated, administered, and staffed separately and
independently of a jail or other adult detention facility and used exclusively for the lawful
custody and treatment of juveniles. A juvenile detention facility may be located in the
same building or grounds as a jail or other adult detention facility if there is spatial
separation between the facilities which prevents haphazard or accidental contact between
juvenile and adult detainees; there is separation between juvenile and adult program
activities; and there are separate juvenile and adult staff other than specialized support
staff who have infrequent contact with detainees. The facility may be owned or operated
by public or private agencies;
(5) "Legal custody" [means] , the right to the care, custody and control of a child and
the duty to provide food, clothing, shelter, ordinary medical care, education, treatment and
discipline of a child. Legal custody may be taken from a parent only by court action and if the
legal custody is taken from a parent without termination of parental rights, the parent's duty to
provide support continues even though the person having legal custody may provide the
necessities of daily living;
[(5)] (6) "Parent" [means] , either a natural parent or a parent by adoption and if the child
is illegitimate, "parent" means the mother;
[(6)] (7) "Shelter care" [means], the temporary care of juveniles in physically
unrestricting facilities pending final court disposition. These facilities may include:
(a) "Foster home", the private home of foster parents providing twenty-four-hour care
to one to three children unrelated to the foster parents by blood, marriage or adoption;
(b) "Group foster home", the private home of foster parents providing twenty-four-hour
care to no more than six children unrelated to the foster parents by blood, marriage or adoption;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 14
(c) "Group home", a child care facility which approximates a family setting, provides
access to community activities and resources, and provides care to no more than twelve children.
[211.071. 1. (1) If a petition or motion to modify alleges that a child
between the ages of fourteen and eighteen has committed an offense that
would be considered a class A or B felony, felony under chapter 566, or
three felony offenses arising from distinct acts committed within one
hundred eighty days of each other, if committed by an adult, the court may,
upon its own motion or upon motion by the juvenile officer, the office of the
prosecuting or circuit attorney, the child, or the child's custodian, order a
hearing at which the prosecuting or circuit attorney may present evidence
if the prosecuting or circuit attorney filed the petition, and may, in its
discretion, dismiss the petition or motion to modify and such child may be
transferred to the court of general jurisdiction and prosecuted under the
general law; except that, if a petition alleges that a child between the ages of
twelve and eighteen has committed an offense that would be considered first
degree murder under section 565.020, second degree murder under section
565.021, first degree assault under section 565.050, forcible rape under section
566.030 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013, rape in the first degree under
section 566.030, forcible sodomy under section 566.060 as it existed prior to
August 28, 2013, sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060, first
degree robbery under section 569.020 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017,
robbery in the first degree under section 570.023, distribution of drugs under
section 195.211 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or the manufacturing of
a controlled substance under section 579.055, if committed by an adult, or a
dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061, or any felony involving the
use, assistance, or aid of a deadly weapon, or has committed two or more prior
unrelated offenses that would be felonies if committed by an adult, the court
shall order a hearing, and may, in its discretion, dismiss the petition or motion
to modify and transfer the child to a court of general jurisdiction for
prosecution under the general law.
(2) The moving party shall be solely responsible for all duties
enumerated under this section. If the juvenile officer forwards to the
prosecuting or circuit attorney a class A or B felony that is not certified
by the juvenile officer, the prosecuting or circuit attorney shall notify the
juvenile officer within fourteen days of the decision to certify the case.
2. Upon apprehension and arrest, jurisdiction over the criminal offense
allegedly committed by any person between eighteen and twenty-one years of
age over whom the juvenile court has retained continuing jurisdiction shall
automatically terminate and that offense shall be dealt with in the court of
general jurisdiction as provided in section 211.041.
3. Knowing and willful age misrepresentation by a juvenile subject
shall not affect any action or proceeding which occurs based upon the
misrepresentation. Any evidence obtained during the period of time in which

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 15
a child misrepresents his or her age may be used against the child and will be
subject only to rules of evidence applicable in adult proceedings.
4. Written notification of a transfer hearing shall be given to the
juvenile and his or her custodian in the same manner as provided in sections
211.101 and 211.111. Notice of the hearing may be waived by the custodian.
Notice shall contain a statement that the purpose of the hearing is to determine
whether the child is a proper subject to be dealt with under the provisions of
this chapter, and that if the court finds that the child is not a proper subject to
be dealt with under the provisions of this chapter, the petition or motion to
modify will be dismissed to allow for prosecution of the child under the
general law.
5. The juvenile officer [may] shall consult with the office of
prosecuting or circuit attorney concerning any offense for which the child
could be certified as an adult under this section. The prosecuting or circuit
attorney shall [have access to] be provided police reports, reports of the
juvenile or deputy juvenile officer, statements of witnesses, a copy of the
completed Missouri Juvenile Detention Assessment Form (JDTA) or
similar form that was used in determining detention, and all other records
or reports relating to the offense alleged to have been committed by the child.
The prosecuting or circuit attorney shall have access to the disposition records
of the child when the child has been adjudicated pursuant to subdivision (3)
of subsection 1 of section 211.031. The prosecuting or circuit attorney shall
not divulge any information regarding the child and the offense until the
juvenile court at a judicial hearing has determined that the child is not a proper
subject to be dealt with under the provisions of this chapter. Any sanction
recommended as a result of the JDTA shall be used as a guideline and
shall not be mandatory.
6. In every incident, the juvenile officer shall consider legally
sufficient charges submitted by a law enforcement agency when utilizing
the JDTA form to determine whether or not to detain a child and shall
provide a copy of that completed JDTA form to the law enforcement
agency once a determination has been made. For purposes of this section,
the term "legally sufficient" means a reasonable belief with articulable
facts that a crime has been or is being committed based on the totality of
the circumstances.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or the Missouri
supreme court operating rules to the contrary, law enforcement agencies
who detain juveniles for offenses where fingerprinting is required, shall
collect fingerprints and forward detention information to the central
repository, in a manner prescribed by the central repository. The
juvenile officer and court of jurisdiction over the juvenile offender shall
report all adjudication, delinquency, and custody information to the
central repository, in a manner prescribed by the central repository. All
information reported under this section shall be available to criminal

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 16
justice agencies for the administration of criminal justice under section
43.500 through the Missouri Uniform Law Enforcement System
(MULES). Such records maintained by the central repository under this
subsection shall be closed pursuant to section 610.120.
8. A written report shall be prepared in accordance with this chapter
developing fully all available information relevant to the criteria which shall
be considered by the court in determining whether the child is a proper subject
to be dealt with under the provisions of this chapter and whether there are
reasonable prospects of rehabilitation within the juvenile justice system.
These criteria shall include but not be limited to:
(1) The seriousness of the offense alleged and whether the protection
of the community requires transfer to the court of general jurisdiction;
(2) Whether the offense alleged involved viciousness, force and
violence;
100 (3) Whether the offense alleged was against persons or property with
101 greater weight being given to the offense against persons, especially if
102 personal injury resulted;
103 (4) Whether the offense alleged is a part of a repetitive pattern of
104 offenses which indicates that the child may be beyond rehabilitation under the
105 juvenile code;
106 (5) The record and history of the child, including experience with the
107 juvenile justice system, other courts, supervision, commitments to juvenile
108 institutions and other placements;
109 (6) The sophistication and maturity of the child as determined by
110 consideration of his or her home and environmental situation, emotional
111 condition and pattern of living;
112 (7) The age of the child;
113 (8) The program and facilities available to the juvenile court in
114 considering disposition;
115 (9) Whether or not the child can benefit from the treatment or
116 rehabilitative programs available to the juvenile court; and
117 (10) Racial disparity in certification.
118 [7.] 9. If the court dismisses the petition to permit the child to be
119 prosecuted under the general law, the court shall enter a dismissal order
120 containing:
121 (1) Findings showing that the court had jurisdiction of the cause and
122 of the parties;
123 (2) Findings showing that the child was represented by counsel;
124 (3) Findings showing that the hearing was held in the presence of the
125 child and his or her counsel; and
126 (4) Findings showing the reasons underlying the court's decision to
127 transfer jurisdiction.
128 [8.] 10. A copy of the petition or motion to modify and order of the
129 dismissal shall be sent to the prosecuting attorney.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 17
130 [9.] 11. When a petition or motion to modify has been dismissed
131 thereby permitting a child to be prosecuted under the general law and the
132 prosecution of the child results in a conviction, the jurisdiction of the juvenile
133 court over that child is forever terminated, except as provided in subsection
134 [10] 12 of this section, for an act that would be a violation of a state law or
135 municipal ordinance.
136 [10.] 12. If a petition or motion to modify has been dismissed thereby
137 permitting a child to be prosecuted under the general law and the child is
138 found not guilty by a court of general jurisdiction, the juvenile court shall
139 have jurisdiction over any later offense committed by that child which would
140 be considered a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult, subject to
141 the certification provisions of this section.
142 [11.] 13. If the court does not dismiss the petition or motion to modify
143 to permit the child to be prosecuted under the general law, it shall set a date
144 for the hearing upon the petition as provided in section 211.171.]
211.071. 1. (1) If a petition or motion to modify alleges that a child between the ages
of fourteen and eighteen has committed an offense that would be considered a class A or B
felony, felony under chapter 566, or three felony offenses arising from distinct acts
committed within one hundred eighty days of each other, if committed by an adult, the court
may, upon its own motion or upon motion by the juvenile officer, the office of the prosecuting
or circuit attorney, the child, or the child's custodian, order a hearing at which the prosecuting
or circuit attorney may present evidence if the prosecuting or circuit attorney filed the
motion, and may, in its discretion, dismiss the petition or motion to modify and such child may
be transferred to the court of general jurisdiction and prosecuted under the general law; except
that, if a petition alleges that a child between the ages of twelve and eighteen has committed an
offense that would be considered first degree murder under section 565.020, second degree
murder under section 565.021, first degree assault under section 565.050, forcible rape under
section 566.030 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013, rape in the first degree under section
566.030, forcible sodomy under section 566.060 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013, sodomy
in the first degree under section 566.060, first degree robbery under section 569.020 as it existed
prior to January 1, 2017, robbery in the first degree under section 570.023, distribution of drugs
under section 195.211 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or the manufacturing of a controlled
substance under section 579.055, if committed by an adult, or a dangerous felony as defined in
section 556.061, or any felony involving the use, assistance, or aid of a deadly weapon, or has
committed two or more prior unrelated offenses that would be felonies if committed by an adult,
the court shall order a hearing, and may, in its discretion, dismiss the petition or motion to
modify and transfer the child to a court of general jurisdiction for prosecution under the general
law.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 18
(2) The moving party shall be solely responsible for all duties enumerated under
this section. If the juvenile officer forwards to the prosecuting or circuit attorney a class
A or B felony that is not certified by the juvenile officer, the prosecuting or circuit attorney
shall notify the juvenile officer within fourteen days of the decision to certify the case.
Should certification be sought, the prosecuting attorney shall have no more than fourteen
days to file such motion.
2. Upon apprehension and arrest, jurisdiction over the criminal offense allegedly
committed by any person between eighteen and twenty-one years of age over whom the juvenile
court has retained continuing jurisdiction shall automatically terminate and that offense shall be
dealt with in the court of general jurisdiction as provided in section 211.041.
3. Knowing and willful age misrepresentation by a juvenile subject shall not affect any
action or proceeding which occurs based upon the misrepresentation. Any evidence obtained
during the period of time in which a child misrepresents his or her age may be used against the
child and will be subject only to rules of evidence applicable in adult proceedings.
4. Written notification of a transfer hearing shall be given to the juvenile and his or her
custodian in the same manner as provided in sections 211.101 and 211.111. Notice of the
hearing may be waived by the custodian. Notice shall contain a statement that the purpose of
the hearing is to determine whether the child is a proper subject to be dealt with under the
provisions of this chapter, and that if the court finds that the child is not a proper subject to be
dealt with under the provisions of this chapter, the petition or motion to modify will be dismissed
to allow for prosecution of the child under the general law.
5. The juvenile officer [may] shall consult with the office of prosecuting or circuit
attorney concerning any offense for which the child could be certified as an adult under this
section. The prosecuting or circuit attorney shall [have access to] be provided police reports,
reports of the juvenile or deputy juvenile officer, statements of witnesses, a copy of the
completed Missouri Juvenile Detention Assessment Form (JDTA) or similar form that was
used in determining detention, and all other records or reports relating to the offense alleged
to have been committed by the child. The prosecuting or circuit attorney shall have access to
the disposition records of the child when the child has been adjudicated pursuant to subdivision
(3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031. The prosecuting or circuit attorney shall not divulge any
information regarding the child and the offense until the juvenile court at a judicial hearing has
determined that the child is not a proper subject to be dealt with under the provisions of this
chapter. Any recommendation as a result of the JDTA shall be used as a guideline and shall
not be mandatory.
6. In every incident, the juvenile officer shall consider legally sufficient charges
submitted by a law enforcement agency when utilizing the JDTA form to determine
whether or not to detain a child and shall provide a copy of that completed JDTA form to

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 19
the law enforcement agency once a determination has been made. For purposes of this
section, the term "legally sufficient" means a reasonable belief with articulable facts that
a crime has been or is being committed based on the totality of the circumstances.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or the Missouri supreme court
operating rules to the contrary, law enforcement agencies who detain juveniles for offenses
where fingerprinting is required, shall collect fingerprints and forward detention
information to the central repository, in a manner prescribed by the central repository.
The juvenile officer and court of jurisdiction over the juvenile offender shall report all
adjudication, delinquency, and custody information to the central repository, in a manner
prescribed by the central repository. All information reported under this section shall be
available to criminal justice agencies for the administration of criminal justice under
section 43.500 through the Missouri Uniform Law Enforcement System (MULES). Such
records maintained by the central repository under this subsection shall be closed pursuant
to section 610.120.
8. A written report shall be prepared in accordance with this chapter developing fully
all available information relevant to the criteria which shall be considered by the court in
determining whether the child is a proper subject to be dealt with under the provisions of this
chapter and whether there are reasonable prospects of rehabilitation within the juvenile justice
system. These criteria shall include but not be limited to:
(1) The seriousness of the offense alleged and whether the protection of the community
requires transfer to the court of general jurisdiction;
(2) Whether the offense alleged involved viciousness, force and violence;
(3) Whether the offense alleged was against persons or property with greater weight
being given to the offense against persons, especially if personal injury resulted;
(4) Whether the offense alleged is a part of a repetitive pattern of offenses which
indicates that the child may be beyond rehabilitation under the juvenile code;
(5) The record and history of the child, including experience with the juvenile justice
system, other courts, supervision, commitments to juvenile institutions and other placements;
(6) The sophistication and maturity of the child as determined by consideration of his
or her home and environmental situation, emotional condition and pattern of living;
(7) The age of the child;
(8) The program and facilities available to the juvenile court in considering disposition;
(9) Whether or not the child can benefit from the treatment or rehabilitative programs
available to the juvenile court; and
(10) Racial disparity in certification.
[7.] 9. If the court dismisses the petition to permit the child to be prosecuted under the
general law, the court shall enter a dismissal order containing:

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 20
(1) Findings showing that the court had jurisdiction of the cause and of the parties;
(2) Findings showing that the child was represented by counsel;
100 (3) Findings showing that the hearing was held in the presence of the child and his or
101 her counsel; and
102 (4) Findings showing the reasons underlying the court's decision to transfer jurisdiction.
103 [8.] 10. A copy of the petition or motion to modify and order of the dismissal shall be
104 sent to the prosecuting attorney.
105 [9.] 11. When a petition or motion to modify has been dismissed thereby permitting a
106 child to be prosecuted under the general law and the prosecution of the child results in a
107 conviction, the jurisdiction of the juvenile court over that child is forever terminated, except as
108 provided in subsection [10] 12 of this section, for an act that would be a violation of a state law
109 or municipal ordinance.
110 [10.] 12. If a petition or motion to modify has been dismissed thereby permitting a child
111 to be prosecuted under the general law and the child is found not guilty by a court of general
112 jurisdiction, the juvenile court shall have jurisdiction over any later offense committed by that
113 child which would be considered a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult, subject to
114 the certification provisions of this section.
115 [11.] 13. If the court does not dismiss the petition or motion to modify to permit the
116 child to be prosecuted under the general law, it shall set a date for the hearing upon the petition
117 as provided in section 211.171.
211.319. 1. On or before July 1, 2005, all juvenile court proceedings conducted
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 211.031 and for termination of parental
rights cases pursuant to sections 211.442 to 211.487 initiated by a juvenile officer or the division
shall be open to the public; except that, when the parent has consented in writing to the
termination of his or her parental rights in conjunction with a placement with a licensed child-
placing agency under subsection 6 of section 453.010, the hearing shall be closed. The court,
on its own motion, may exclude for good cause shown any person or persons from the
proceedings to protect the welfare and best interests of the child and for exceptional
circumstances. Any party to a juvenile court proceeding referred to in this subsection, except
the state, may file a motion requesting that the general public be excluded from the proceeding
or any portion of the proceeding. Upon the filing of such motion, the court shall hear arguments
by the parties, but no evidence, and shall make a determination whether closure is in the best
interest of the parties or whether it is in the public interest to deny such motion. The court shall
make a finding on the record when a motion to close a hearing pursuant to this section is made
and heard by the court.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, the general public shall
be excluded from all juvenile court proceedings referred to in subsection 1 of this section during

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 21
the testimony of any child or victim and only such persons who have a direct interest in the case
or in the work of the court will be admitted to the proceedings.
3. For juvenile court proceedings described in subsection 1 of this section, pleadings and
orders of the juvenile court other than confidential files and those specifically ordered closed by
the juvenile court judge shall be open to the general public. For purposes of this section,
"confidential file" means all other records and reports considered closed or confidential by law,
including but not limited to medical reports, psychological or psychiatric evaluations,
investigation reports of the children's division, social histories, home studies, and police reports
and law enforcement records. Only persons who are found by the court to have a legitimate
interest shall be allowed access to confidential or closed files. In determining whether a person
has a legitimate interest, the court shall consider the nature of the proceedings, the welfare and
safety of the public, and the interest of any child involved.
4. For records made available to the public pursuant to this section:
(1) The identity of any child involved except the perpetrator shall not be disclosed and
all references in such records to the identity of any child involved except the perpetrator shall
be redacted prior to disclosure to the public; and
(2) All information that may identify or lead to the disclosure of the identity of a reporter
of child abuse under sections 210.109 to 210.183 and section 352.400 shall not be disclosed to
the public.
5. All juvenile court proceedings conducted pursuant to subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of section 211.031 shall not be open to the general public.
6. The provisions of this section shall apply to juvenile court proceedings and records
specified in this section in which the initial pleadings are filed on or after July 1, 2005.
[211.331. 1. In each county of the first and second classifications and
in [the city of St. Louis] any city not within a county, it is the duty of the
county [commission, or, where there is no county commission, such other
authorized] governing body, to provide a place of juvenile detention [for
children coming within the provisions of this chapter] or juvenile detention
facility. It is also the duty of the county [commission or other authorized]
governing body to provide offices for the personnel of the juvenile court.
2. The place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility shall
be so located and arranged that the child being detained does not come in
contact, at any time or in any manner, with adults convicted or under arrest,
and the care of children in detention shall approximate as closely as possible
the care of children in good homes.
3. The place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility shall
be in charge of a superintendent. The judge of the juvenile court or the family
court administrator, if provided by local rule, shall appoint and fix the
compensation and maintenance of the superintendent and of any assistants or

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 22
other personnel required to operate the detention facility. Such compensation
and maintenance are payable out of funds of the county.
4. The county [commission or other] governing body [of the county]
is authorized to lease or to acquire by purchase, gift or devise land for such
purpose, and to erect buildings thereon and to provide funds to equip and
maintain the same for the subsistence and education of the children placed
therein.]
211.331. 1. In each county of the first and second classifications and in [the city of St.
Louis] any city not within a county, it is the duty of the county [commission, or, where there
is no county commission, such other authorized] governing body[,] to provide a place of
juvenile detention [for children coming within the provisions of this chapter] or juvenile
detention facility. It is also the duty of the county [commission or other authorized] governing
body to provide offices for the personnel of the juvenile court.
2. The place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility shall be so located and
arranged that the child being detained does not come in contact, at any time or in any manner,
with adults convicted or under arrest, and the care of children in detention shall approximate as
closely as possible the care of children in good homes.
3. The place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility shall be in charge of
a superintendent. The judge of the juvenile court or the family court administrator, if provided
by local rule, shall appoint and fix the compensation and maintenance of the superintendent and
of any assistants or other personnel required to operate the detention facility. Such
compensation and maintenance are payable out of funds of the county.
4. The county [commission or other] governing body [of the county] is authorized to
lease or to acquire by purchase, gift or devise land for such purpose, and to erect buildings
thereon and to provide funds to equip and maintain the same for the subsistence and education
of the children placed therein.
[211.341. 1. [Counties of the third and fourth classes within one
judicial circuit, shall,] Upon the written recommendation of the [circuit]
presiding judge of that judicial circuit, or upon written notice from the
county governing body to the presiding judge of approval of ordinances,
orders, or resolutions authorizing a juvenile detention facility by all
counties within that judicial circuit and the agreement provided in section
211.342, counties of the third and fourth classes within one judicial circuit
shall establish a place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility to
serve all of the counties within that judicial circuit, and in like manner, the
counties shall supply offices for the juvenile officers of that circuit.
2. The recommendation of the [circuit] presiding judge provided in
subsection 1 of this section shall be made only after a hearing conducted by
[him] the judge, after thirty days' notice, to determine the need and feasibility
of establishing such a place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 23
facility within the judicial circuit.
3. The provisions of section 211.331 apply as to the form of operation
and means of maintenance of the place of juvenile detention or juvenile
detention facility, except that the total cost of establishment and operation of
the places of juvenile detention or juvenile detention facilities shall be
prorated among the several counties within that judicial circuit upon a ratio to
be determined by a comparison of the respective populations of the counties.
The point of location of the place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention
facility shall be determined by the [circuit] presiding judge of the judicial
circuit or pursuant to an agreement established by section 211.342.
[2. Circuit judges of any two or more adjoining judicial circuits after
a hearing as provided in subsection 1 may, by agreement confirmed by
judicial order, and] 4. In the interest of economy of administration, after a
hearing as provided in subsection 2 of this section, the presiding judges
of any two or more adjoining judicial circuit may establish one place of
juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility to serve their respective
judicial circuits, by agreement confirmed by judicial order. In such event,
the [circuit] presiding judges so agreeing shall jointly govern the affairs of the
place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility and the cost thereof
shall be apportioned among the counties served in the manner provided for in
subsection 1 of this section.
[3.] 5. Any county of the third or fourth class desiring to provide its
own place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility may do so in
the manner prescribed for counties of the first and second classes.]
211.341. 1. [Counties of the third and fourth classes within one judicial circuit, shall,]
Upon the written recommendation of the [circuit] presiding judge of [that] a judicial circuit, or
upon written notice from the county governing body to the presiding judge of approval of
ordinances, orders, or resolutions authorizing a juvenile detention facility by all counties
within that judicial circuit and the agreement provided in section 211.342, counties of the
third and fourth classes within one judicial circuit shall establish a place of juvenile detention
or juvenile detention facility to serve all of the counties within that judicial circuit, and in like
manner, the counties shall supply offices for the juvenile officers of that circuit.
2. The recommendation of the [circuit] presiding judge provided in subsection 1 of
this section shall be made only after a hearing conducted by [him] the judge, after thirty days'
notice, to determine the need and feasibility of establishing such a place of juvenile detention
or juvenile detention facility within the judicial circuit.
3. The provisions of section 211.331 apply as to the form of operation and means of
maintenance of the place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility, except that the
total cost of establishment and operation of the places of juvenile detention or juvenile
detention facilities shall be prorated among the several counties within that judicial circuit upon

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 24
a ratio to be determined by a comparison of the respective populations of the counties. The point
of location of the place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility shall be determined
by the [circuit] presiding judge of the judicial circuit or pursuant to an agreement established
by section 211.342.
[2. Circuit judges of any two or more adjoining judicial circuits after a hearing as
provided in subsection 1 may, by agreement confirmed by judicial order, and] 4. In the interest
of economy of administration, after a hearing as provided in subsection 2 of this section, the
presiding judges of any two or more adjoining judicial circuits may establish one place of
juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility to serve their respective judicial circuits, by
agreement confirmed by judicial order. In such event, the [circuit] presiding judges so
agreeing shall jointly govern the affairs of the place of juvenile detention or juvenile detention
facility and the cost thereof shall be apportioned among the counties served in the manner
provided for in subsection 1 of this section.
[3.] 5. Any county of the third or fourth class desiring to provide its own place of
juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility may do so in the manner prescribed for
counties of the first and second classes.
[211.342. 1. (1) In coordination with each other, the governing
bodies of the counties within the same judicial circuit may establish a
juvenile detention facility to serve the judicial circuit.
(2) The governing body of each county desiring to coordinate a
juvenile detention facility under this subsection shall approve an
ordinance, order, or resolution authorizing a juvenile detention facility
within one of the counties and shall approve an agreement between all
counties within the same judicial circuit, as specified by subsection 4 of
this section.
2. (1) In coordination with each other, the governing bodies of the
counties in adjoining judicial circuits may establish a juvenile detention
facility to serve the judicial circuits.
(2) The governing body of each county desiring to coordinate a
juvenile detention facility under this subsection shall approve an
ordinance, order, or resolution authorizing a juvenile detention facility
within one of the counties and shall approve an agreement between all
counties within each judicial circuit, as specified by subsection 4 of this
section.
3. The governing body of each county desiring to coordinate a
juvenile detention facility under subsection 1 or 2 of this section shall
notify the presiding judge of the judicial circuit or each judicial circuit of
the authorization of a juvenile detention facility. The notice shall include
the authorizing ordinance, order, or resolution of each county and the

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 25
approved agreement, as specified in subsection 4 of this section.
4. The agreement that specifies the duties of each county shall
contain the following:
(1) The total cost of establishment and operation of the places of
detention;
(2) The prorated formula for the calculation of each county's
contribution to the costs of a juvenile detention facility based upon a ratio
of the respective populations of the counties;
(3) The methods and powers that may be used for constructing,
leasing, or financing a juvenile detention facility;
(4) The use of the sales tax as authorized by subsection 6 of this
section; and
(5) The point of location of the place of juvenile detention facility.
5. Subsection 3 and 4 of section 211.331 shall apply to a juvenile
detention facility authorized pursuant to this section. The operation and
support of a juvenile detention facility authorized pursuant to this section
shall be regulated in accordance with the rules and standards of the
Missouri supreme court under the governance of the presiding judge of
the judicial circuit. If the counties of adjoining judicial circuits have
authorized a juvenile detention facility pursuant to this section, the
presiding judges shall jointly govern the affairs of the juvenile detention
facility.
6. (1) The counties authorizing a juvenile detention facility
pursuant to this section may impose, by order, a sales tax up to one
percent on all retail sales made in such counties which are subject to
taxation pursuant to the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the
purpose of providing a juvenile detention facility. The tax authorized by
this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by
law, except that no order imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section
shall be effective unless the governing body, for each county in the
judicial circuit or circuits submits to the voters of the county, on any
election date authorized in chapter 115, a proposal to authorize the
governing body of the county to impose a tax.
(2) The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited
to, the following language:
Shall the (counties' names) impose a region-
wide sales tax of ______ (insert amount) for the
purpose of providing a juvenile detention facility
within in the jurisdiction of (judicial circuit's name

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 26
or judicial circuits' name)?

9 YES 9 NO

If you are in favor of the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed
to the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"NO".


If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters of
the county voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the order and
any amendment to such order shall be in effect on the first day of the
second quarter immediately following the election approving the
proposal. If the proposal receives less than the required majority, the
governing body of the county shall have no power to impose the sales tax
authorized pursuant to this section unless and until the governing body
of the county shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize
the county commission, or authorized body, to impose the sales tax
authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the required
majority of the qualified voters of the county commission, or authorized
body, voting on such proposal; however, in no event shall a proposal
pursuant to this section be submitted to the voters sooner than twelve
months from the date of the last submission of a proposal pursuant to this
section.
(3) All revenue received by a county from the tax authorized
pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall
be used solely for providing a juvenile detention facility for children
coming within the provisions of this chapter for so long as the tax shall
remain in effect.
(4) Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished or
terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special trust fund
shall be used solely for providing a juvenile detention facility for children
coming within the provisions of this chapter for the counties. Any funds
in such special trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures
may be invested by the county commission in accordance with applicable
laws relating to the investment of other county funds.
100 (5) All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to
101 this section on behalf of any county, less one percent for cost of collection
102 which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 27
103 of premiums for surety bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be
104 deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be known as
105 the "Juvenile Detention Facility Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in
106 the juvenile detention facility sales tax trust fund shall not be deemed to
107 be state funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state.
108 The director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of
109 money in the trust fund which was collected in each county imposing a
110 sales tax pursuant to this section, and the records shall be open to the
111 inspection of officers of each member county and the public. Not later
112 than the tenth day of each month the director of revenue shall distribute
113 all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the
114 county which levied the tax. Such funds shall be deposited with the
115 treasurer of each such county, and all expenditures of funds arising from
116 the juvenile detention facility sales tax trust fund shall be paid pursuant
117 to an appropriation adopted by the governing body of the county.
118 Expenditures may be made from the fund for the function authorized in
119 the order adopted by the governing body of the county submitting the
120 juvenile detention facility tax to the voters.
121 (6) The director of revenue may make refunds from the amounts
122 in the trust fund and credited to any county for erroneous payments and
123 overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts
124 deposited to the credit of such counties. If any county abolishes the tax,
125 the governing body of the county shall notify the director of revenue of
126 the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal, and
127 the director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
128 of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such
129 notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem
130 dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
131 After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax
132 in such county, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the
133 account to the county and close the account of that county. The director
134 of revenue shall notify each county in each instance of any amount
135 refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
136 (7) Except as provided in this section, all provisions of sections
137 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.]
211.342. 1. (1) In coordination with each other, the governing bodies of the
counties within the same judicial circuit may establish a juvenile detention facility to serve
the judicial circuit.
(2) The governing body of each county desiring to coordinate a juvenile detention
facility under this subsection shall approve an ordinance, order, or resolution authorizing
a juvenile detention facility within one of the counties and shall approve an agreement

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 28
between all counties within the same judicial circuit, as specified by subsection 4 of this
section.
2. (1) In coordination with each other, the governing bodies of the counties in
adjoining judicial circuits may establish a juvenile detention facility to serve the judicial
circuits.
(2) The governing body of each county desiring to coordinate a juvenile detention
facility under this subsection shall approve an ordinance, order, or resolution authorizing
a juvenile detention facility within one of the counties and shall approve an agreement
between all counties within each judicial circuit, as specified by subsection 4 of this section.
3. The governing body of each county desiring to coordinate a juvenile detention
facility under subsection 1 or 2 of this section shall notify the presiding judge of the judicial
circuit or each judicial circuit of the authorization of a juvenile detention facility. The
notice shall include the authorizing ordinance, order, or resolution of each county and the
approved agreement, as specified in subsection 4 of this section.
4. The agreement that specifies the duties of each county shall contain the
following:
(1) The total cost of establishment and operation of the places of detention;
(2) The prorated formula for the calculation of each county's contribution to the
costs of a juvenile detention facility based upon a ratio of the respective populations of the
counties;
(3) The methods and powers that may be used for constructing, leasing, or
financing a juvenile detention facility;
(4) The use of the sales tax as authorized by subsection 6 of this section; and
(5) The point of location of the place of a juvenile detention facility.
5. Subsections 3 and 4 of section 211.331 shall apply to a juvenile detention facility
authorized pursuant to this section. The operation and support of a juvenile detention
facility authorized pursuant to this section shall be regulated in accordance with the rules
and standards of the Missouri supreme court under the governance of the presiding judge
of the judicial circuit. If the counties of adjoining judicial circuits have authorized a
juvenile detention facility pursuant to this section, the presiding judges shall jointly govern
the affairs of the juvenile detention facility.
6. (1) The counties authorizing a juvenile detention facility pursuant to this section
may impose, by order, a sales tax up to one percent on all retail sales made in such counties
which are subject to taxation pursuant to the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 for
the purpose of providing a juvenile detention facility. The tax authorized by this section
shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no order
imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section shall be effective unless the governing body,

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 29
for each county in the judicial circuit or circuits submits to the voters of the county, on any
election date authorized in chapter 115, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the
county to impose a tax.
(2) The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the (counties' names) impose a region-wide sales tax of ______
(insert amount) for the purpose of providing a juvenile detention
facility within the jurisdiction of (judicial circuit's name or judicial
circuits' names)?
9 YES 9 NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters of the county voting
thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the order and any amendment to such order shall
be in effect on the first day of the second quarter immediately following the election
approving the proposal. If the proposal receives less than the required majority, the
governing body of the county shall have no power to impose the sales tax authorized
pursuant to this section unless and until the governing body of the county shall again have
submitted another proposal to authorize the county commission, or authorized body, to
impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the
required majority of the qualified voters of the county commission, or authorized body,
voting on such proposal; however, in no event shall a proposal pursuant to this section be
submitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last submission of
a proposal pursuant to this section.
(3) All revenue received by a county from the tax authorized pursuant to this
section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for providing a
juvenile detention facility for children coming within the provisions of this chapter for so
long as the tax shall remain in effect.
(4) Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished or terminated by any
means, all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall be used solely for providing a
juvenile detention facility for children coming within the provisions of this chapter for the
counties. Any funds in such special trust fund which are not needed for current

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 30
expenditures may be invested by the county commission in accordance with applicable
laws relating to the investment of other county funds.
(5) All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to this section on
behalf of any county, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in the
state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in
section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be
known as the "Juvenile Detention Facility Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the
juvenile detention facility sales tax trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and
shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep
accurate records of the amount of money in the trust fund which was collected in each
county imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section, and the records shall be open to the
inspection of officers of each member county and the public. Not later than the tenth day
of each month the director of revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in the trust
fund during the preceding month to the county which levied the tax. Such funds shall be
deposited with the treasurer of each such county, and all expenditures of funds arising
from the juvenile detention facility sales tax trust fund shall be paid pursuant to an
appropriation adopted by the governing body of the county. Expenditures may be made
from the fund for the function authorized in the order adopted by the governing body of
the county submitting the juvenile detention facility tax to the voters.
(6) The director of revenue may make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund
and credited to any county for erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may
redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such counties. If any
100 county abolishes the tax, the governing body of the county shall notify the director of
101 revenue of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal, and the
102 director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two
103 percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
104 overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit
105 of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax
106 in such county, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the county
107 and close the account of that county. The director of revenue shall notify each county in
108 each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the
109 county.
110 (7) Except as provided in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
111 shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
[217.362. 1. The department of corrections shall design and
implement an intensive long-term program for the treatment of chronic
nonviolent offenders with serious substance abuse addictions who have not

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 31
[pleaded] pled guilty to or been convicted of a dangerous felony as defined in
section 556.061.
2. Prior to sentencing, any judge considering an offender for this
program shall notify the department. The potential candidate for the program
shall be screened by the department to determine eligibility. The department
shall, by regulation, establish eligibility criteria and inform the court of such
criteria. The department shall notify the court as to the offender's eligibility
and the availability of space in the program. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, except as provided for in section 558.019, if
an offender is eligible and there is adequate space, the court may sentence a
person to the program which shall consist of institutional drug or alcohol
treatment for a period of at least twelve and no more than twenty-four months,
as well as a term of incarceration. The department shall determine the nature,
intensity, duration, and completion criteria of the education, treatment, and
aftercare portions of any program services provided. Execution of the
offender's term of incarceration shall be suspended pending completion of said
program. Allocation of space in the program may be distributed by the
department in proportion to drug arrest patterns in the state. If the court is
advised that an offender is not eligible or that there is no space available, the
court shall consider other authorized dispositions.
3. Upon successful completion of the program, the division of
probation and parole shall advise the sentencing court of an offender's
probationary release date thirty days prior to release. If the court determines
that probation is not appropriate the court may order the execution of the
offender's sentence.
4. If it is determined by the department that the offender has not
successfully completed the program, or that the offender is not cooperatively
participating in the program, the offender shall be removed from the program
and the court shall be advised. Failure of an offender to complete the program
shall cause the offender to serve the sentence prescribed by the court and void
the right to be considered for probation on this sentence.
[5. An offender's first incarceration in a department of corrections
program pursuant to this section prior to release on probation shall not be
considered a previous prison commitment for the purpose of determining a
minimum prison term pursuant to the provisions of section 558.019.]]
217.362. 1. The department of corrections shall design and implement an intensive
long-term program for the treatment of chronic nonviolent offenders with serious substance
abuse addictions who have not [pleaded] pled guilty to or been convicted of a dangerous felony
as defined in section 556.061.
2. Prior to sentencing, any judge considering an offender for this program shall notify
the department. The potential candidate for the program shall be screened by the department to
determine eligibility. The department shall, by regulation, establish eligibility criteria and

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 32
inform the court of such criteria. The department shall notify the court as to the offender's
eligibility and the availability of space in the program. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, except as provided for in section 558.019, if an offender is eligible and there
is adequate space, the court may sentence a person to the program which shall consist of
institutional drug or alcohol treatment for a period of at least twelve and no more than twenty-
four months, as well as a term of incarceration. The department shall determine the nature,
intensity, duration, and completion criteria of the education, treatment, and aftercare portions
of any program services provided. Execution of the offender's term of incarceration shall be
suspended pending completion of said program. Allocation of space in the program may be
distributed by the department in proportion to drug arrest patterns in the state. If the court is
advised that an offender is not eligible or that there is no space available, the court shall consider
other authorized dispositions.
3. Upon successful completion of the program, the division of probation and parole shall
advise the sentencing court of an offender's probationary release date thirty days prior to release.
If the court determines that probation is not appropriate the court may order the execution of the
offender's sentence.
4. If it is determined by the department that the offender has not successfully completed
the program, or that the offender is not cooperatively participating in the program, the offender
shall be removed from the program and the court shall be advised. Failure of an offender to
complete the program shall cause the offender to serve the sentence prescribed by the court and
void the right to be considered for probation on this sentence.
[5. An offender's first incarceration in a department of corrections program pursuant to
this section prior to release on probation shall not be considered a previous prison commitment
for the purpose of determining a minimum prison term pursuant to the provisions of section
558.019.]
[217.690. 1. All releases or paroles shall issue upon order of the
parole board, duly adopted.
2. Before ordering the parole of any offender, the parole board shall
conduct a validated risk and needs assessment and evaluate the case under the
rules governing parole that are promulgated by the parole board. The parole
board shall then have the offender appear before a hearing panel and shall
conduct a personal interview with him or her, unless waived by the offender,
or if the guidelines indicate the offender may be paroled without need for an
interview. The guidelines and rules shall not allow for the waiver of a hearing
if a victim requests a hearing. The appearance or presence may occur by
means of a videoconference at the discretion of the parole board. A parole
may be ordered for the best interest of society when there is a reasonable
probability, based on the risk assessment and indicators of release readiness,
that the person can be supervised under parole supervision and successfully

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 33
reintegrated into the community, not as an award of clemency; it shall not be
considered a reduction of sentence or a pardon. Every offender while on
parole shall remain in the legal custody of the department but shall be subject
to the orders of the parole board.
3. The division of probation and parole has discretionary authority to
require the payment of a fee, not to exceed sixty dollars per month, from every
offender placed under division supervision on probation, parole, or conditional
release, to waive all or part of any fee, to sanction offenders for willful
nonpayment of fees, and to contract with a private entity for fee collections
services. All fees collected shall be deposited in the inmate fund established
in section 217.430. Fees collected may be used to pay the costs of contracted
collections services. The fees collected may otherwise be used to provide
community corrections and intervention services for offenders. Such services
include substance abuse assessment and treatment, mental health assessment
and treatment, electronic monitoring services, residential facilities services,
employment placement services, and other offender community corrections
or intervention services designated by the division of probation and parole to
assist offenders to successfully complete probation, parole, or conditional
release. The division of probation and parole shall adopt rules not inconsistent
with law, in accordance with section 217.040, with respect to sanctioning
offenders and with respect to establishing, waiving, collecting, and using fees.
4. The parole board shall adopt rules not inconsistent with law, in
accordance with section 217.040, with respect to the eligibility of offenders
for parole, the conduct of parole hearings or conditions to be imposed upon
paroled offenders. Whenever an order for parole is issued it shall recite the
conditions of such parole.
5. When considering parole for an offender with consecutive
sentences, the minimum term for eligibility for parole shall be calculated by
adding the minimum terms for parole eligibility for each of the consecutive
sentences, except the minimum term for parole eligibility shall not exceed the
minimum term for parole eligibility for an ordinary life sentence.
6. Any offender sentenced to a term of imprisonment amounting to
fifteen years or more or multiple terms of imprisonment that, taken together,
amount to fifteen or more years who was under eighteen years of age at the
time of the commission of the offense or offenses may be eligible for parole
after serving fifteen years of incarceration, regardless of whether the case is
final for the purposes of appeal, and may be eligible for reconsideration
hearings in accordance with regulations promulgated by the parole board.
7. The provisions of subsection 6 of this section shall not apply to an
offender found guilty of capital murder, murder in the first degree or murder
in the second degree, when murder in the second degree is committed
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 565.021, who was under
eighteen years of age when the offender committed the offense or offenses
who may be found ineligible for parole or whose parole eligibility may be

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 34
controlled by section 558.047 or 565.033.
8. Any offender under a sentence for first degree murder who has been
denied release on parole after a parole hearing shall not be eligible for another
parole hearing until at least three years from the month of the parole denial;
however, this subsection shall not prevent a release pursuant to subsection [4]
7 of section 558.011.
9. A victim who has requested an opportunity to be heard shall receive
notice that the parole board is conducting an assessment of the offender's risk
and readiness for release and that the victim's input will be particularly helpful
when it pertains to safety concerns and specific protective measures that may
be beneficial to the victim should the offender be granted release.
10. Parole hearings shall, at a minimum, contain the following
procedures:
(1) The victim or person representing the victim who attends a hearing
may be accompanied by one other person;
(2) The victim or person representing the victim who attends a hearing
shall have the option of giving testimony in the presence of the inmate or to
the hearing panel without the inmate being present;
(3) The victim or person representing the victim may call or write the
parole board rather than attend the hearing;
(4) The victim or person representing the victim may have a personal
meeting with a parole board member at the parole board's central office;
(5) The judge, prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney and a
representative of the local law enforcement agency investigating the crime
shall be allowed to attend the hearing or provide information to the hearing
panel in regard to the parole consideration; and
(6) The parole board shall evaluate information listed in the juvenile
sex offender registry pursuant to section 211.425, provided the offender is
between the ages of seventeen and twenty-one, as it impacts the safety of the
community.
11. The parole board shall notify any person of the results of a parole
eligibility hearing if the person indicates to the parole board a desire to be
notified.
12. The parole board may, at its discretion, require any offender
seeking parole to meet certain conditions during the term of that parole so
long as said conditions are not illegal or impossible for the offender to
perform. These conditions may include an amount of restitution to the state
for the cost of that offender's incarceration.
13. Special parole conditions shall be responsive to the assessed risk
and needs of the offender or the need for extraordinary supervision, such as
electronic monitoring. The parole board shall adopt rules to minimize the
100 conditions placed on low-risk cases, to frontload conditions upon release, and
101 to require the modification and reduction of conditions based on the person's
102 continuing stability in the community. Parole board rules shall permit parole

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 35
103 conditions to be modified by parole officers with review and approval by
104 supervisors.
105 14. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require the
106 release of an offender on parole nor to reduce the sentence of an offender
107 heretofore committed.
108 15. Beginning January 1, 2001, the parole board shall not order a
109 parole unless the offender has obtained a high school diploma or its
110 equivalent, or unless the parole board is satisfied that the offender, while
111 committed to the custody of the department, has made an honest good-faith
112 effort to obtain a high school diploma or its equivalent; provided that the
113 director may waive this requirement by certifying in writing to the parole
114 board that the offender has actively participated in mandatory education
115 programs or is academically unable to obtain a high school diploma or its
116 equivalent.
117 16. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
118 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
119 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
120 of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
121 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
122 assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
123 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
124 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
125 28, 2005, shall be invalid and void.
126 17. When concurrent sentences are imposed by a court, the person
127 shall serve the minimum required percentage for the longest sentence
128 prior to parole eligibility.]
217.690. 1. All releases or paroles shall issue upon order of the parole board, duly
adopted.
2. Before ordering the parole of any offender, the parole board shall conduct a validated
risk and needs assessment and evaluate the case under the rules governing parole that are
promulgated by the parole board. The parole board shall then have the offender appear before
a hearing panel and shall conduct a personal interview with him or her, unless waived by the
offender, or if the guidelines indicate the offender may be paroled without need for an interview.
The guidelines and rules shall not allow for the waiver of a hearing if a victim requests a hearing.
The appearance or presence may occur by means of a videoconference at the discretion of the
parole board. A parole may be ordered for the best interest of society when there is a reasonable
probability, based on the risk assessment and indicators of release readiness, that the person can
be supervised under parole supervision and successfully reintegrated into the community, not
as an award of clemency; it shall not be considered a reduction of sentence or a pardon. Every
offender while on parole shall remain in the legal custody of the department but shall be subject
to the orders of the parole board.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 36
3. The division of probation and parole has discretionary authority to require the
payment of a fee, not to exceed sixty dollars per month, from every offender placed under
division supervision on probation, parole, or conditional release, to waive all or part of any fee,
to sanction offenders for willful nonpayment of fees, and to contract with a private entity for fee
collections services. All fees collected shall be deposited in the inmate fund established in
section 217.430. Fees collected may be used to pay the costs of contracted collections services.
The fees collected may otherwise be used to provide community corrections and intervention
services for offenders. Such services include substance abuse assessment and treatment, mental
health assessment and treatment, electronic monitoring services, residential facilities services,
employment placement services, and other offender community corrections or intervention
services designated by the division of probation and parole to assist offenders to successfully
complete probation, parole, or conditional release. The division of probation and parole shall
adopt rules not inconsistent with law, in accordance with section 217.040, with respect to
sanctioning offenders and with respect to establishing, waiving, collecting, and using fees.
4. The parole board shall adopt rules not inconsistent with law, in accordance with
section 217.040, with respect to the eligibility of offenders for parole, the conduct of parole
hearings or conditions to be imposed upon paroled offenders. Whenever an order for parole is
issued it shall recite the conditions of such parole.
5. When considering parole for an offender with consecutive sentences, the minimum
term for eligibility for parole shall be calculated by adding the minimum terms for parole
eligibility for each of the consecutive sentences, except the minimum term for parole eligibility
shall not exceed the minimum term for parole eligibility for an ordinary life sentence.
6. Any offender sentenced to a term of imprisonment amounting to fifteen years or more
or multiple terms of imprisonment that, taken together, amount to fifteen or more years who was
under eighteen years of age at the time of the commission of the offense or offenses may be
eligible for parole after serving fifteen years of incarceration, regardless of whether the case is
final for the purposes of appeal, and may be eligible for reconsideration hearings in accordance
with regulations promulgated by the parole board.
7. The provisions of subsection 6 of this section shall not apply to an offender found
guilty of capital murder, murder in the first degree or murder in the second degree, when murder
in the second degree is committed pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 565.021,
who was under eighteen years of age when the offender committed the offense or offenses who
may be found ineligible for parole or whose parole eligibility may be controlled by section
558.047 or 565.033.
8. Any offender under a sentence for first degree murder who has been denied release
on parole after a parole hearing shall not be eligible for another parole hearing until at least three

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 37
years from the month of the parole denial; however, this subsection shall not prevent a release
pursuant to subsection [4] 7 of section 558.011.
9. A victim who has requested an opportunity to be heard shall receive notice that the
parole board is conducting an assessment of the offender's risk and readiness for release and that
the victim's input will be particularly helpful when it pertains to safety concerns and specific
protective measures that may be beneficial to the victim should the offender be granted release.
10. Parole hearings shall, at a minimum, contain the following procedures:
(1) The victim or person representing the victim who attends a hearing may be
accompanied by one other person;
(2) The victim or person representing the victim who attends a hearing shall have the
option of giving testimony in the presence of the inmate or to the hearing panel without the
inmate being present;
(3) The victim or person representing the victim may call or write the parole board rather
than attend the hearing;
(4) The victim or person representing the victim may have a personal meeting with a
parole board member at the parole board's central office;
(5) The judge, prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney and a representative of the local
law enforcement agency investigating the crime shall be allowed to attend the hearing or provide
information to the hearing panel in regard to the parole consideration; and
(6) The parole board shall evaluate information listed in the juvenile sex offender
registry pursuant to section 211.425, provided the offender is between the ages of seventeen and
twenty-one, as it impacts the safety of the community.
11. The parole board shall notify any person of the results of a parole eligibility hearing
if the person indicates to the parole board a desire to be notified.
12. The parole board may, at its discretion, require any offender seeking parole to meet
certain conditions during the term of that parole so long as said conditions are not illegal or
impossible for the offender to perform. These conditions may include an amount of restitution
to the state for the cost of that offender's incarceration.
13. Special parole conditions shall be responsive to the assessed risk and needs of the
offender or the need for extraordinary supervision, such as electronic monitoring. The parole
board shall adopt rules to minimize the conditions placed on low-risk cases, to frontload
conditions upon release, and to require the modification and reduction of conditions based on
the person's continuing stability in the community. Parole board rules shall permit parole
conditions to be modified by parole officers with review and approval by supervisors.
14. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require the release of an
offender on parole nor to reduce the sentence of an offender heretofore committed.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 38
15. Beginning January 1, 2001, the parole board shall not order a parole unless the
offender has obtained a high school diploma or its equivalent, or unless the parole board is
satisfied that the offender, while committed to the custody of the department, has made an honest
good-faith effort to obtain a high school diploma or its equivalent; provided that the director may
waive this requirement by certifying in writing to the parole board that the offender has actively
participated in mandatory education programs or is academically unable to obtain a high school
diploma or its equivalent.
16. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and
100 annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
101 any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2005, shall be invalid and void.
102 17. When concurrent sentences are imposed by a court, the person shall serve the
103 minimum required percentage for the longest sentence prior to parole eligibility.
104 [217.760. 1. In all felony cases and class A misdemeanor cases, the
105 basis of which misdemeanor cases are contained in chapters 565 and 566 and
106 section 577.023, at the request of a [circuit] sentencing judge of any circuit
107 court, the division of probation and parole shall assign one or more state
108 probation and parole officers to make an investigation of the person convicted
109 of the crime or offense before sentence is imposed. In all felony cases in
110 which the recommended sentence established by the sentencing advisory
111 commission pursuant to subsection [7] 1 of section 558.019 includes probation
112 but the recommendation of the prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney does
113 not include probation, the division of probation and parole shall, prior to
114 sentencing, provide the judge with a report on available alternatives to
115 incarceration. If a presentence investigation report is completed then the
116 available alternatives shall be included in the presentence investigation report.
117 2. The report of the presentence investigation or preparole
118 investigation shall contain any prior criminal record of the defendant and such
119 information about his or her characteristics, his or her financial condition, his
120 or her social history, the circumstances affecting his or her behavior as may
121 be helpful in imposing sentence or in granting probation or in the correctional
122 treatment of the defendant, information concerning the impact of the crime
123 upon the victim, the recommended sentence established by the sentencing
124 advisory commission and available alternatives to incarceration including
125 opportunities for restorative justice, as well as a recommendation by the
126 probation and parole officer. The officer shall secure such other information
127 as may be required by the court and, whenever it is practicable and needed,

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 39
128 such investigation shall include a physical and mental examination of the
129 defendant.]
217.760. 1. In all felony cases and class A misdemeanor cases, the basis of which
misdemeanor cases are contained in chapters 565 and 566 and section 577.023, at the request
of a [circuit] sentencing judge of any circuit court, the division of probation and parole shall
assign one or more state probation and parole officers to make an investigation of the person
convicted of the crime or offense before sentence is imposed. In all felony cases in which the
recommended sentence established by the sentencing advisory commission pursuant to
subsection [7] 1 of section 558.019 includes probation but the recommendation of the
prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney does not include probation, the division of probation and
parole shall, prior to sentencing, provide the judge with a report on available alternatives to
incarceration. If a presentence investigation report is completed then the available alternatives
shall be included in the presentence investigation report.
2. The report of the presentence investigation or preparole investigation shall contain
any prior criminal record of the defendant and such information about his or her characteristics,
his or her financial condition, his or her social history, the circumstances affecting his or her
behavior as may be helpful in imposing sentence or in granting probation or in the correctional
treatment of the defendant, information concerning the impact of the crime upon the victim, the
recommended sentence established by the sentencing advisory commission and available
alternatives to incarceration including opportunities for restorative justice, as well as a
recommendation by the probation and parole officer. The officer shall secure such other
information as may be required by the court and, whenever it is practicable and needed, such
investigation shall include a physical and mental examination of the defendant.
455.050. 1. Any full or ex parte order of protection granted pursuant to sections 455.010
to 455.085 shall be to protect the petitioner from cyberstalking, domestic violence, stalking, or
sexual assault and may include such terms as the court reasonably deems necessary to ensure
the petitioner's safety, including but not limited to:
(1) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from committing or threatening to commit
cyberstalking, domestic violence, molesting, stalking, sexual assault, or disturbing the peace
of the petitioner, including violence against a pet;
(2) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from entering the premises of the dwelling unit
of the petitioner when the dwelling unit is:
(a) Jointly owned, leased or rented or jointly occupied by both parties; or
(b) Owned, leased, rented or occupied by petitioner individually; or
(c) Jointly owned, leased, rented or occupied by petitioner and a person other than
respondent; provided, however, no spouse shall be denied relief pursuant to this section by
reason of the absence of a property interest in the dwelling unit; or

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 40
(d) Jointly occupied by the petitioner and a person other than respondent; provided that
the respondent has no property interest in the dwelling unit; or
(3) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from communicating with the petitioner in any
manner or through any medium.
2. Mutual orders of protection are prohibited unless both parties have properly filed
written petitions and proper service has been made in accordance with sections 455.010 to
455.085.
3. When the court has, after a hearing for any full order of protection, issued an order
of protection, it may, in addition:
(1) Award custody of any minor child born to or adopted by the parties when the court
has jurisdiction over such child and no prior order regarding custody is pending or has been
made, and the best interests of the child require such order be issued;
(2) Establish a visitation schedule that is in the best interests of the child;
(3) Award child support in accordance with supreme court rule 88.01 and chapter 452;
(4) Award maintenance to petitioner when petitioner and respondent are lawfully
married in accordance with chapter 452;
(5) Order respondent to make or to continue to make rent or mortgage payments on a
residence occupied by the petitioner if the respondent is found to have a duty to support the
petitioner or other dependent household members;
(6) Order the respondent to pay the petitioner's rent at a residence other than the one
previously shared by the parties if the respondent is found to have a duty to support the
petitioner and the petitioner requests alternative housing;
(7) Order that the petitioner be given temporary possession of specified personal
property, such as automobiles, checkbooks, keys, and other personal effects;
(8) Prohibit the respondent from transferring, encumbering, or otherwise disposing of
specified property mutually owned or leased by the parties;
(9) Order the respondent to participate in a court-approved counseling program designed
to help batterers stop violent behavior or to participate in a substance abuse treatment program;
(10) Order the respondent to pay a reasonable fee for housing and other services that
have been provided or that are being provided to the petitioner by a shelter for victims of
domestic violence;
(11) Order the respondent to pay court costs;
(12) Order the respondent to pay the cost of medical treatment and services that have
been provided or that are being provided to the petitioner as a result of injuries sustained to the
petitioner by an act of domestic violence committed by the respondent;
(13) Award possession and care of any pet, along with any moneys necessary to cover
medical costs that may have resulted from abuse of the pet.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 41
4. A verified petition seeking orders for maintenance, support, custody, visitation,
payment of rent, payment of monetary compensation, possession of personal property,
prohibiting the transfer, encumbrance, or disposal of property, or payment for services of a
shelter for victims of domestic violence, shall contain allegations relating to those orders and
shall pray for the orders desired.
5. In making an award of custody, the court shall consider all relevant factors including
the presumption that the best interests of the child will be served by placing the child in the
custody and care of the nonabusive parent, unless there is evidence that both parents have
engaged in abusive behavior, in which case the court shall not consider this presumption but may
appoint a guardian ad litem or a court-appointed special advocate to represent the children in
accordance with chapter 452 and shall consider all other factors in accordance with chapter 452.
6. The court shall grant to the noncustodial parent rights to visitation with any minor
child born to or adopted by the parties, unless the court finds, after hearing, that visitation would
endanger the child's physical health, impair the child's emotional development or would
otherwise conflict with the best interests of the child, or that no visitation can be arranged which
would sufficiently protect the custodial parent from further domestic violence. The court may
appoint a guardian ad litem or court-appointed special advocate to represent the minor child in
accordance with chapter 452 whenever the custodial parent alleges that visitation with the
noncustodial parent will damage the minor child.
7. The court shall make an order requiring the noncustodial party to pay an amount
reasonable and necessary for the support of any child to whom the party owes a duty of support
when no prior order of support is outstanding and after all relevant factors have been considered,
in accordance with Missouri supreme court rule 88.01 and chapter 452.
8. The court may grant a maintenance order to a party for a period of time, not to exceed
one hundred eighty days. Any maintenance ordered by the court shall be in accordance with
chapter 452.
9. (1) The court may, in order to ensure that a petitioner can maintain an existing
wireless telephone number or numbers, issue an order, after notice and an opportunity to be
heard, directing a wireless service provider to transfer the billing responsibility for and rights
to the wireless telephone number or numbers to the petitioner, if the petitioner is not the wireless
service accountholder.
(2) (a) The order transferring billing responsibility for and rights to the wireless
telephone number or numbers to the petitioner shall list the name and billing telephone number
of the accountholder, the name and contact information of the person to whom the telephone
number or numbers will be transferred, and each telephone number to be transferred to that
person. The court shall ensure that the contact information of the petitioner is not provided to
the accountholder in proceedings held under this chapter.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 42
(b) Upon issuance, a copy of the full order of protection shall be transmitted, either
electronically or by certified mail, to the wireless service provider's registered agent listed with
the secretary of state, or electronically to the email address provided by the wireless service
provider. Such transmittal shall constitute adequate notice for the wireless service provider
acting under this section and section 455.523.
(c) If the wireless service provider cannot operationally or technically effectuate the
order due to certain circumstances, the wireless service provider shall notify the petitioner within
three business days. Such circumstances shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
a. The accountholder has already terminated the account;
b. The differences in network technology prevent the functionality of a device on the
network; or
100 c. There are geographic or other limitations on network or service availability.
101 (3) (a) Upon transfer of billing responsibility for and rights to a wireless telephone
102 number or numbers to the petitioner under this subsection by a wireless service provider, the
103 petitioner shall assume all financial responsibility for the transferred wireless telephone number
104 or numbers, monthly service costs, and costs for any mobile device associated with the wireless
105 telephone number or numbers.
106 (b) This section shall not preclude a wireless service provider from applying any routine
107 and customary requirements for account establishment to the petitioner as part of this transfer
108 of billing responsibility for a wireless telephone number or numbers and any devices attached
109 to that number or numbers including, but not limited to, identification, financial information, and
110 customer preferences.
111 (4) This section shall not affect the ability of the court to apportion the assets and debts
112 of the parties as provided for in law, or the ability to determine the temporary use, possession,
113 and control of personal property.
114 (5) No cause of action shall lie against any wireless service provider, its officers,
115 employees, or agents, for actions taken in accordance with the terms of a court order issued
116 under this section.
117 (6) As used in this section and section 455.523, a "wireless service provider" means a
118 provider of commercial mobile service under Section 332(d) of the Federal
119 [Telecommunications Act of 1996] Communications Act of 1934 (47 U.S.C. Section [151, et
120 seq.] 332).
455.098. 1. Upon the request of the victim or the prosecuting or circuit attorney,
a court shall have jurisdiction at the time of sentencing to enter a lifetime protection order
restraining or enjoining the defendant from contacting the victim if the defendant has been
found guilty of a dangerous felony, as defined in section 556.061. The protection order
shall be effective immediately and shall be served on the defendant at the time of

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 43
sentencing. An order issued pursuant to this section shall not expire and is valid for the
defendant's lifetime unless:
(1) The defendant makes a showing to the court that the victim has died or the
conviction has been dismissed, expunged, or overturned or the defendant has been
pardoned; or
(2) The victim submits a written request to the court for an early expiration upon
which the court may hold a hearing to terminate the order.
2. A copy of any order of protection granted pursuant to this section shall be issued
to the victim and to the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the victim
resides. The court shall provide all necessary information, including the defendant's
relationship to the victim, for entry of the order of protection into the Missouri Uniform
Law Enforcement System (MULES) and the National Crime Information Center (NCIC).
Upon receiving the order under this subsection, the sheriff shall make the entry into
MULES within twenty-four hours. MULES shall forward the order information to NCIC,
which will in turn make the order viewable within the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System (NICS). The sheriff shall enter information contained in the
order, including, but not limited to, any orders regarding child custody or visitation and
all specifics as to times and dates of custody or visitation that are provided in the order.
A notice of termination of any order of protection or any change in child custody or
visitation within that order shall be issued to the local law enforcement agency for entry
into MULES or any other comparable law enforcement system. The information
contained in an order of protection may be entered into MULES or any other comparable
law enforcement system using a direct automated data transfer from the court automated
system to the law enforcement system.
527.270. 1. Hereafter every person desiring to change his or her name may present a
petition to that effect, verified by affidavit, to the circuit court in the county of the petitioner's
residence, which petition shall set forth the petitioner's full name, the new name desired, and a
concise statement of the reason for such desired change; and it shall be the duty of the judge of
such court to order such change to be made, and spread upon the records of the court, in proper
form, if such judge is satisfied that the desired change would be proper and not detrimental to
the interests of any other person.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this section, no person required to register
under sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall change his or her name for the period of time he
or she is required to register on the registry.
544.667. In addition to the forfeiture of any security which was given or pledged
for a person's release, any person who, having been released upon a recognizance or bond
pursuant to any other provisions of law while pending preliminary hearing, trial,

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 44
sentencing, appeal, probation or parole revocation, or any other stage of a criminal matter
against him or her, knowingly violates any condition of release that imposes no contact
with specific individuals shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
556.061. In this code, unless the context requires a different definition, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Access", to instruct, communicate with, store data in, retrieve or extract data from,
or otherwise make any use of any resources of, a computer, computer system, or computer
network;
(2) "Affirmative defense":
(a) The defense referred to is not submitted to the trier of fact unless supported by
evidence; and
(b) If the defense is submitted to the trier of fact the defendant has the burden of
persuasion that the defense is more probably true than not;
(3) "Burden of injecting the issue":
(a) The issue referred to is not submitted to the trier of fact unless supported by
evidence; and
(b) If the issue is submitted to the trier of fact any reasonable doubt on the issue requires
a finding for the defendant on that issue;
(4) "Commercial film and photographic print processor", any person who develops
exposed photographic film into negatives, slides or prints, or who makes prints from negatives
or slides, for compensation. The term commercial film and photographic print processor shall
include all employees of such persons but shall not include a person who develops film or makes
prints for a public agency;
(5) "Computer", the box that houses the central processing unit (CPU), along with any
internal storage devices, such as internal hard drives, and internal communication devices, such
as internal modems capable of sending or receiving [electronic mail] email or fax cards, along
with any other hardware stored or housed internally. Thus, computer refers to hardware,
software and data contained in the main unit. Printers, external modems attached by cable to the
main unit, monitors, and other external attachments will be referred to collectively as peripherals
and discussed individually when appropriate. When the computer and all peripherals are
referred to as a package, the term "computer system" is used. Information refers to all the
information on a computer system including both software applications and data;
(6) "Computer equipment", computers, terminals, data storage devices, and all other
computer hardware associated with a computer system or network;
(7) "Computer hardware", all equipment which can collect, analyze, create, display,
convert, store, conceal or transmit electronic, magnetic, optical or similar computer impulses or
data. Hardware includes, but is not limited to, any data processing devices, such as central

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 45
processing units, memory typewriters and self-contained laptop or notebook computers; internal
and peripheral storage devices, transistor-like binary devices and other memory storage devices,
such as floppy disks, removable disks, compact disks, digital video disks, magnetic tape, hard
drive, optical disks and digital memory; local area networks, such as two or more computers
connected together to a central computer server via cable or modem; peripheral input or output
devices, such as keyboards, printers, scanners, plotters, video display monitors and optical
readers; and related communication devices, such as modems, cables and connections, recording
equipment, RAM or ROM units, acoustic couplers, automatic dialers, speed dialers,
programmable telephone dialing or signaling devices and electronic tone-generating devices; as
well as any devices, mechanisms or parts that can be used to restrict access to computer
hardware, such as physical keys and locks;
(8) "Computer network", two or more interconnected computers or computer systems;
(9) "Computer program", a set of instructions, statements, or related data that directs or
is intended to direct a computer to perform certain functions;
(10) "Computer software", digital information which can be interpreted by a computer
and any of its related components to direct the way they work. Software is stored in electronic,
magnetic, optical or other digital form. The term commonly includes programs to run operating
systems and applications, such as word processing, graphic, or spreadsheet programs, utilities,
compilers, interpreters and communications programs;
(11) "Computer-related documentation", written, recorded, printed or electronically
stored material which explains or illustrates how to configure or use computer hardware,
software or other related items;
(12) "Computer system", a set of related, connected or unconnected, computer
equipment, data, or software;
(13) "Confinement":
(a) A person is in confinement when such person is held in a place of confinement
pursuant to arrest or order of a court, and remains in confinement until:
a. A court orders the person's release; or
b. The person is released on bail, bond, or recognizance, personal or otherwise; or
c. A public servant having the legal power and duty to confine the person authorizes his
release without guard and without condition that he return to confinement;
(b) A person is not in confinement if:
a. The person is on probation or parole, temporary or otherwise; or
b. The person is under sentence to serve a term of confinement which is not continuous,
or is serving a sentence under a work-release program, and in either such case is not being held
in a place of confinement or is not being held under guard by a person having the legal power
and duty to transport the person to or from a place of confinement;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 46
(14) "Consent": consent or lack of consent may be expressed or implied. Assent does
not constitute consent if:
(a) It is given by a person who lacks the mental capacity to authorize the conduct
charged to constitute the offense and such mental incapacity is manifest or known to the actor;
or
(b) It is given by a person who by reason of youth, mental disease or defect, intoxication,
a drug-induced state, or any other reason is manifestly unable or known by the actor to be unable
to make a reasonable judgment as to the nature or harmfulness of the conduct charged to
constitute the offense; or
(c) It is induced by force, duress or deception;
(15) "Controlled substance", a drug, substance, or immediate precursor in Schedules I
through V as defined in chapter 195;
(16) "Criminal negligence", failure to be aware of a substantial and unjustifiable risk that
circumstances exist or a result will follow, and such failure constitutes a gross deviation from
the standard of care which a reasonable person would exercise in the situation;
(17) "Custody", a person is in custody when he or she has been arrested but has not been
delivered to a place of confinement;
(18) "Damage", when used in relation to a computer system or network, means any
alteration, deletion, or destruction of any part of the computer system or network;
(19) "Dangerous felony", the felonies [of] requiring eighty-five percent of the
imposed sentence to be served prior to parole eligibility, which are arson in the first degree,
assault in the first degree, attempted rape in the first degree if physical injury results, attempted
forcible rape if physical injury results, attempted sodomy in the first degree if physical injury
results, attempted forcible sodomy if physical injury results, rape in the first degree, forcible
rape, sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy, assault in the second degree if the victim of
such assault is a special victim as defined in subdivision (14) of section 565.002, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping, murder in the second degree, assault of a law enforcement officer
in the first degree, domestic assault in the first degree, elder abuse in the first degree, robbery
100 in the first degree, armed criminal action, conspiracy to commit an offense when the offense is
101 a dangerous felony, vehicle hijacking when punished as a class A felony, statutory rape in the
102 first degree [when the victim is a child less than twelve years of age at the time of the
103 commission of the act giving rise to the offense], statutory sodomy in the first degree [when the
104 victim is a child less than twelve years of age at the time of the commission of the act giving rise
105 to the offense], child molestation in the first or second degree, abuse of a child if the child dies
106 as a result of injuries sustained from conduct chargeable under section 568.060, child
107 kidnapping, parental kidnapping committed by detaining or concealing the whereabouts of the
108 child for not less than one hundred twenty days under section 565.153, bus hijacking when

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 47
109 punished as a class A felony, planting a bomb or explosive in or near a bus or terminal, [and]
110 an "intoxication-related traffic offense" or "intoxication-related boating offense" if the person
111 is found to be a "habitual offender" or "habitual boating offender" as such terms are defined in
112 section 577.001, abuse through forced labor when punished under subsection 4 of section
113 566.203, trafficking for the purposes of slavery, involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced
114 labor or the attempt of such when punished under subsection 4 of section 566.206,
115 trafficking for the purposes of sexual exploitation or the attempt of such when the offense
116 was effected by force, abduction, or coercion, sexual trafficking of a child in the first
117 degree, sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree, a third violation of failure to
118 register as a sexual offender, and endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree
119 when punished under section 568.045;
120 (20) "Dangerous instrument", any instrument, article or substance, which, under the
121 circumstances in which it is used, is readily capable of causing death or other serious physical
122 injury;
123 (21) "Data", a representation of information, facts, knowledge, concepts, or instructions
124 prepared in a formalized or other manner and intended for use in a computer or computer
125 network. Data may be in any form including, but not limited to, printouts, microfiche, magnetic
126 storage media, punched cards and as may be stored in the memory of a computer;
127 (22) "Deadly weapon", any firearm, loaded or unloaded, or any weapon from which a
128 shot, readily capable of producing death or serious physical injury, may be discharged, or a
129 switchblade knife, dagger, billy club, blackjack or metal knuckles;
130 (23) "Digital camera", a camera that records images in a format which enables the
131 images to be downloaded into a computer;
132 (24) "Disability", a mental, physical, or developmental impairment that substantially
133 limits one or more major life activities or the ability to provide adequately for one's care or
134 protection, whether the impairment is congenital or acquired by accident, injury or disease,
135 where such impairment is verified by medical findings;
136 (25) "Elderly person", a person sixty years of age or older;
137 (26) "Felony", an offense so designated or an offense for which persons found guilty
138 thereof may be sentenced to death or imprisonment for a term of more than one year;
139 (27) "Forcible compulsion" either:
140 (a) Physical force that overcomes reasonable resistance; or
141 (b) A threat, express or implied, that places a person in reasonable fear of death, serious
142 physical injury or kidnapping of such person or another person;
143 (28) "Incapacitated", a temporary or permanent physical or mental condition in which
144 a person is unconscious, unable to appraise the nature of his or her conduct, or unable to
145 communicate unwillingness to an act;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 48
146 (29) "Infraction", a violation defined by this code or by any other statute of this state if
147 it is so designated or if no sentence other than a fine, or fine and forfeiture or other civil penalty,
148 is authorized upon conviction;
149 (30) "Inhabitable structure", a vehicle, vessel or structure:
150 (a) Where any person lives or carries on business or other calling; or
151 (b) Where people assemble for purposes of business, government, education, religion,
152 entertainment, or public transportation; or
153 (c) Which is used for overnight accommodation of persons.
154
155 Any such vehicle, vessel, or structure is inhabitable regardless of whether a person is actually
156 present. If a building or structure is divided into separately occupied units, any unit not occupied
157 by the actor is an inhabitable structure of another;
158 (31) "Knowingly", when used with respect to:
159 (a) Conduct or attendant circumstances, means a person is aware of the nature of his or
160 her conduct or that those circumstances exist; or
161 (b) A result of conduct, means a person is aware that his or her conduct is practically
162 certain to cause that result;
163 (32) "Law enforcement officer", any public servant having both the power and duty to
164 make arrests for violations of the laws of this state, and federal law enforcement officers
165 authorized to carry firearms and to make arrests for violations of the laws of the United States;
166 (33) "Misdemeanor", an offense so designated or an offense for which persons found
167 guilty thereof may be sentenced to imprisonment for a term of which the maximum is one year
168 or less;
169 (34) "Of another", property that any entity, including but not limited to any natural
170 person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, governmental
171 subdivision or instrumentality, other than the actor, has a possessory or proprietary interest
172 therein, except that property shall not be deemed property of another who has only a security
173 interest therein, even if legal title is in the creditor pursuant to a conditional sales contract or
174 other security arrangement;
175 (35) "Offense", any felony or misdemeanor;
176 (36) "Physical injury", slight impairment of any function of the body or temporary loss
177 of use of any part of the body;
178 (37) "Place of confinement", any building or facility and the grounds thereof wherein
179 a court is legally authorized to order that a person charged with or convicted of a crime be held;
180 (38) "Possess" or "possessed", having actual or constructive possession of an object with
181 knowledge of its presence. A person has actual possession if such person has the object on his
182 or her person or within easy reach and convenient control. A person has constructive possession

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 49
183 if such person has the power and the intention at a given time to exercise dominion or control
184 over the object either directly or through another person or persons. Possession may also be sole
185 or joint. If one person alone has possession of an object, possession is sole. If two or more
186 persons share possession of an object, possession is joint;
187 (39) "Property", anything of value, whether real or personal, tangible or intangible, in
188 possession or in action;
189 (40) "Public servant", any person employed in any way by a government of this state
190 who is compensated by the government by reason of such person's employment, any person
191 appointed to a position with any government of this state, or any person elected to a position
192 with any government of this state. It includes, but is not limited to, legislators, jurors, members
193 of the judiciary and law enforcement officers. It does not include witnesses;
194 (41) "Purposely", when used with respect to a person's conduct or to a result thereof,
195 means when it is his or her conscious object to engage in that conduct or to cause that result;
196 (42) "Recklessly", consciously disregarding a substantial and unjustifiable risk that
197 circumstances exist or that a result will follow, and such disregard constitutes a gross deviation
198 from the standard of care which a reasonable person would exercise in the situation;
199 (43) "Serious emotional injury", an injury that creates a substantial risk of temporary or
200 permanent medical or psychological damage, manifested by impairment of a behavioral,
201 cognitive or physical condition. Serious emotional injury shall be established by testimony of
202 qualified experts upon the reasonable expectation of probable harm to a reasonable degree of
203 medical or psychological certainty;
204 (44) "Serious physical injury", physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or
205 that causes serious disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any part of
206 the body;
207 (45) "Services", when used in relation to a computer system or network, means use of
208 a computer, computer system, or computer network and includes, but is not limited to, computer
209 time, data processing, and storage or retrieval functions;
210 (46) "Sexual orientation", male or female heterosexuality, homosexuality or bisexuality
211 by inclination, practice, identity or expression, or having a self-image or identity not traditionally
212 associated with one's gender;
213 (47) "Vehicle", a self-propelled mechanical device designed to carry a person or persons,
214 excluding vessels or aircraft;
215 (48) "Vessel", any boat or craft propelled by a motor or by machinery, whether or not
216 such motor or machinery is a principal source of propulsion used or capable of being used as a
217 means of transportation on water, or any boat or craft more than twelve feet in length which is
218 powered by sail alone or by a combination of sail and machinery, and used or capable of being

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 50
219 used as a means of transportation on water, but not any boat or craft having, as the only means
220 of propulsion, a paddle or oars;
221 (49) "Voluntary act":
222 (a) A bodily movement performed while conscious as a result of effort or determination.
223 Possession is a voluntary act if the possessor knowingly procures or receives the thing
224 possessed, or having acquired control of it was aware of his or her control for a sufficient time
225 to have enabled him or her to dispose of it or terminate his or her control; or
226 (b) An omission to perform an act of which the actor is physically capable. A person
227 is not guilty of an offense based solely upon an omission to perform an act unless the law
228 defining the offense expressly so provides, or a duty to perform the omitted act is otherwise
229 imposed by law;
230 (50) "Vulnerable person", any person in the custody, care, or control of the department
231 of mental health who is receiving services from an operated, funded, licensed, or certified
232 program.
[557.011. 1. Every person found guilty of an offense shall be dealt
with by the court in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, except that
for offenses defined outside this code and not repealed, the term of
imprisonment or the fine that may be imposed is that provided in the statute
defining the offense; however, the conditional release term of any sentence of
a term of years shall be determined as provided in subsection [4] 7 of section
558.011.
2. Whenever any person has been found guilty of a felony or a
misdemeanor the court shall make one or more of the following dispositions
of the offender in any appropriate combination. The court may:
(1) Sentence the person to a term of imprisonment as authorized by
chapter 558;
(2) Sentence the person to pay a fine as authorized by chapter 560;
(3) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or without placing the
person on probation;
(4) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution, placing the person
on probation;
(5) Impose a period of detention as a condition of probation, as
authorized by section 559.026.
3. Whenever any person has been found guilty of an infraction, the
court shall make one or more of the following dispositions of the offender in
any appropriate combination. The court may:
(1) Sentence the person to pay a fine as authorized by chapter 560;
(2) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or without placing the
person on probation;
(3) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution, placing the person
on probation.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 51
4. Whenever any organization has been found guilty of an offense, the
court shall make one or more of the following dispositions of the organization
in any appropriate combination. The court may:
(1) Sentence the organization to pay a fine as authorized by chapter
560;
(2) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or without placing the
organization on probation;
(3) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution, placing the
organization on probation;
(4) Impose any special sentence or sanction authorized by law.
5. This chapter shall not be construed to deprive the court of any
authority conferred by law to decree a forfeiture of property, suspend or
cancel a license, remove a person from office, or impose any other civil
penalty. An appropriate order exercising such authority may be included as
part of any sentence.
6. In the event a sentence of confinement is ordered executed, a court
may order that an individual serve all or any portion of such sentence on
electronic monitoring; except that all costs associated with the electronic
monitoring shall be charged to the person on house arrest. If the judge finds
the person unable to afford the costs associated with electronic monitoring, the
judge may order that the person be placed on house arrest with electronic
monitoring if the county commission agrees to pay the costs of such
monitoring. If the person on house arrest is unable to afford the costs
associated with electronic monitoring and the county commission does not
agree to pay from the general revenue of the county the costs of such
electronic monitoring, the judge shall not order that the person be placed on
house arrest with electronic monitoring.]
557.011. 1. Every person found guilty of an offense shall be dealt with by the court in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, except that for offenses defined outside this code
and not repealed, the term of imprisonment or the fine that may be imposed is that provided in
the statute defining the offense; however, the conditional release term of any sentence of a term
of years shall be determined as provided in subsection [4] 7 of section 558.011.
2. Whenever any person has been found guilty of a felony or a misdemeanor the court
shall make one or more of the following dispositions of the offender in any appropriate
combination. The court may:
(1) Sentence the person to a term of imprisonment as authorized by chapter 558;
(2) Sentence the person to pay a fine as authorized by chapter 560;
(3) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or without placing the person on probation;
(4) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution, placing the person on probation;
(5) Impose a period of detention as a condition of probation, as authorized by section
559.026.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 52
3. Whenever any person has been found guilty of an infraction, the court shall make one
or more of the following dispositions of the offender in any appropriate combination. The court
may:
(1) Sentence the person to pay a fine as authorized by chapter 560;
(2) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or without placing the person on probation;
(3) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution, placing the person on probation.
4. Whenever any organization has been found guilty of an offense, the court shall make
one or more of the following dispositions of the organization in any appropriate combination.
The court may:
(1) Sentence the organization to pay a fine as authorized by chapter 560;
(2) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or without placing the organization on
probation;
(3) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution, placing the organization on
probation;
(4) Impose any special sentence or sanction authorized by law.
5. This chapter shall not be construed to deprive the court of any authority conferred by
law to decree a forfeiture of property, suspend or cancel a license, remove a person from office,
or impose any other civil penalty. An appropriate order exercising such authority may be
included as part of any sentence.
6. In the event a sentence of confinement is ordered executed, a court may order that an
individual serve all or any portion of such sentence on electronic monitoring; except that all
costs associated with the electronic monitoring shall be charged to the person on house arrest.
If the judge finds the person unable to afford the costs associated with electronic monitoring, the
judge may order that the person be placed on house arrest with electronic monitoring if the
county commission agrees to pay the costs of such monitoring. If the person on house arrest is
unable to afford the costs associated with electronic monitoring and the county commission does
not agree to pay from the general revenue of the county the costs of such electronic monitoring,
the judge shall not order that the person be placed on house arrest with electronic monitoring.
[557.021. 1. Any offense defined outside this code [which] that is
declared to be a misdemeanor without specification of the penalty therefor is
a class A misdemeanor.
2. Any offense defined outside this code [which] that is declared to
be a felony without specification of the penalty therefor is a class E felony
and subject to the terms as provided in chapter 558.
3. For the purpose of applying the extended term provisions of section
558.016 [and the minimum prison term provisions of] , the parole eligibility
provisions pursuant to section [558.019] 558.011 and for determining the
penalty for attempts, offenses defined outside of this code shall be classified

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 53
as follows:
(1) If the offense is a felony:
(a) It is a class A felony if the authorized penalty includes death, life
imprisonment or imprisonment for a term of twenty years or more;
(b) It is a class B felony if the maximum term of imprisonment
authorized exceeds ten years but is less than twenty years;
(c) It is a class C felony if the maximum term of imprisonment
authorized is ten years;
(d) It is a class D felony if the maximum term of imprisonment
exceeds four years but is less than ten years;
(e) It is a class E felony if the maximum term of imprisonment is four
years or less;
(2) If the offense is a misdemeanor:
(a) It is a class A misdemeanor if the authorized imprisonment
exceeds six months in jail;
(b) It is a class B misdemeanor if the authorized imprisonment
exceeds thirty days but is not more than six months;
(c) It is a class C misdemeanor if the authorized imprisonment is thirty
days or less;
(d) It is a class D misdemeanor if it includes a mental state as an
element of the offense and there is no authorized imprisonment;
(e) It is an infraction if there is no authorized imprisonment.]
557.021. 1. Any offense defined outside this code [which] that is declared to be a
misdemeanor without specification of the penalty therefor is a class A misdemeanor.
2. Any offense defined outside this code [which] that is declared to be a felony without
specification of the penalty therefor is a class E felony and subject to the terms as provided
in chapter 558.
3. For the purpose of applying the extended term provisions of section 558.016 [and the
minimum prison term provisions of], the parole eligibility provisions pursuant to section
[558.019] 558.011 and for determining the penalty for attempts, offenses defined outside of this
code shall be classified as follows:
(1) If the offense is a felony:
(a) It is a class A felony if the authorized penalty includes death, life imprisonment or
imprisonment for a term of twenty years or more;
(b) It is a class B felony if the maximum term of imprisonment authorized exceeds ten
years but is less than twenty years;
(c) It is a class C felony if the maximum term of imprisonment authorized is ten years;
(d) It is a class D felony if the maximum term of imprisonment exceeds four years but
is less than ten years;
(e) It is a class E felony if the maximum term of imprisonment is four years or less;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 54
(2) If the offense is a misdemeanor:
(a) It is a class A misdemeanor if the authorized imprisonment exceeds six months in
jail;
(b) It is a class B misdemeanor if the authorized imprisonment exceeds thirty days but
is not more than six months;
(c) It is a class C misdemeanor if the authorized imprisonment is thirty days or less;
(d) It is a class D misdemeanor if it includes a mental state as an element of the offense
and there is no authorized imprisonment;
(e) It is an infraction if there is no authorized imprisonment.
[558.011. 1. The authorized terms of imprisonment, including both
prison and conditional release terms, for all offenses are as follows:
(1) For a class A felony, a term of years not less than ten years and not
to exceed thirty years, or life imprisonment, for which an offender shall
serve seventy percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility;
(2) For a class B felony, a term of years not less than five years and
not to exceed fifteen years, for which an offender shall serve fifty percent
of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility;
(3) For a class C felony, a term of years not less than three years and
not to exceed ten years, for which an offender shall serve:
(a) Forty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole
eligibility for an offense under chapters 566, 568, and 573 that requires
registration as a sex offender under chapter 589;
(b) Thirty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole
eligibility for a first offense other than an offense under paragraph (a) of
this subdivision;
(c) Thirty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole
eligibility for a second offense other than an offense under paragraph (a)
of this subdivision;
(d) Fifty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility
for a third or subsequent offense other than an offense under paragraph
(a) of this subdivision;
(4) For a class D felony, a term of years not to exceed seven years, for
which an offender shall serve:
(a) Twenty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole
eligibility for an offense under chapters 566, 568, and 573 that requires
registration as a sex offender under chapter 589;
(b) Twenty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole
eligibility for a first offense other than an offense under paragraph (a) of
this subdivision;
(c) Twenty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole
eligibility for a second offense other than an offense under paragraph (a)
of this subdivision;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 55
(d) Fifty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility
for a third or subsequent offense other than an offense under paragraph
(a) of this subdivision;
(5) For a class E felony, a term of years not to exceed four years, for
which an offender shall serve:
(a) Twenty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole
eligibility for an offense under chapters 566, 568, and 573 that requires
registration as a sex offender under chapter 589;
(b) Fifteen percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole
eligibility for a first offense other than an offense under paragraph (a) of
this subdivision;
(c) Twenty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole
eligibility for a second offense other than an offense under paragraph (a)
of this subdivision;
(d) Fifty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility
for a third or subsequent offense other than an offense under paragraph
(a) of this subdivision;
(6) For a class A misdemeanor, a term not to exceed one year;
(7) For a class B misdemeanor, a term not to exceed six months;
(8) For a class C misdemeanor, a term not to exceed fifteen days.
2. When a person is sentenced to the authorized term of
imprisonment for a higher class than the offense for which the person was
found guilty under sections 558.016, 565.079, and 579.170, the person
shall also be sentenced to the parole eligibility percentage of the higher
class.
3. The authorized terms of imprisonment under subsections 1 and
2 of this section shall apply to all offenses, except if the terms for parole
eligibility otherwise provided by statute result in a higher parole
eligibility percentage, in which case the statute resulting in the higher
parole eligibility percentage shall apply.
4. The authorized terms of imprisonment under subsection 1 of
this section shall not apply to any offense where a suspended imposition
of sentence is imposed or where the matter is referred to an adult
treatment court as provided in chapter 478.
5. In cases of class D and E felonies, the court shall have discretion
to imprison for a special term not to exceed one year in the county jail or other
authorized penal institution, and the place of confinement shall be fixed by the
court. If the court imposes a sentence of imprisonment for a term longer than
one year upon a person convicted of a class D or E felony, it shall commit the
person to the custody of the department of corrections.
[3.] 6. (1) When a regular sentence of imprisonment for a felony is
imposed, the court shall commit the person to the custody of the department
of corrections for the term imposed under section 557.036, or until released
under procedures established elsewhere by law.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 56
(2) A sentence of imprisonment for a misdemeanor shall be for a
definite term and the court shall commit the person to the county jail or other
authorized penal institution for the term of his or her sentence or until released
under procedure established elsewhere by law.
[4.] 7. (1) Except as otherwise provided, a sentence of imprisonment
for a term of years for felonies other than dangerous felonies as defined in
section 556.061, and other than sentences of imprisonment which involve the
individual's fourth or subsequent remand to the department of corrections shall
consist of a prison term and a conditional release term. The conditional
release term of any term imposed under section 557.036 shall be:
(a) One-third for terms of nine years or less;
(b) Three years for terms between nine and fifteen years;
(c) Five years for terms more than fifteen years; and the prison term
shall be the remainder of such term. The prison term may be extended by the
parole board pursuant to subsection [5] 8 of this section.
(2) "Conditional release" means the conditional discharge of an
offender by the parole board, subject to conditions of release that the parole
board deems reasonable to assist the offender to lead a law-abiding life, and
subject to the supervision under the division of probation and parole. The
conditions of release shall include avoidance by the offender of any other
offense, federal or state, and other conditions that the parole board in its
discretion deems reasonably necessary to assist the releasee in avoiding
100 further violation of the law.
101 [5.] 8. The date of conditional release from the prison term may be
102 extended up to a maximum of the entire sentence of imprisonment by the
103 parole board. The director of any division of the department of corrections
104 except the division of probation and parole may file with the parole board a
105 petition to extend the conditional release date when an offender fails to follow
106 the rules and regulations of the division or commits an act in violation of such
107 rules. Within ten working days of receipt of the petition to extend the
108 conditional release date, the parole board shall convene a hearing on the
109 petition. The offender shall be present and may call witnesses in his or her
110 behalf and cross-examine witnesses appearing against the offender. The
111 hearing shall be conducted as provided in section 217.670. If the violation
112 occurs in close proximity to the conditional release date, the conditional
113 release may be held for a maximum of fifteen working days to permit
114 necessary time for the division director to file a petition for an extension with
115 the parole board and for the parole board to conduct a hearing, provided some
116 affirmative manifestation of an intent to extend the conditional release has
117 occurred prior to the conditional release date. If at the end of a fifteen-
118 working-day period a parole board decision has not been reached, the offender
119 shall be released conditionally. The decision of the parole board shall be final.
120 9. Any person who commits a class A or B felony or an offense
121 under chapters 566, 568, and 573 that requires registration as a sex

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 57
122 offender under chapter 589, on or after January 1, 2028, shall not be
123 eligible for conditional release for that offense.
124 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
125 any offender who has been found guilty of a dangerous felony as defined
126 in section 556.061 and is committed to the department of corrections shall
127 be required to serve eighty-five percent of the sentence imposed by the
128 court prior to parole eligibility.
129 11. For the purpose of determining the minimum time required
130 to be served by the offender before he or she is eligible for parole, the
131 following calculations shall apply:
132 (1) A sentence of life shall be calculated to be thirty years; and
133 (2) Any sentence either alone or in the aggregate with other
134 consecutive sentences for offenses committed at or near the same time
135 that is over seventy-five years shall be calculated to be seventy-five years.
136 12. When consecutive sentences are imposed by a court, the
137 minimum percentage for each respective felony shall be met prior to
138 parole eligibility.
139 13. When concurrent sentences are imposed by a court, the person
140 shall serve the minimum required percentage for the longest sentence
141 prior to parole eligibility.]
558.011. 1. The authorized terms of imprisonment, including both prison and
conditional release terms, for all offenses are as follows:
(1) For a class A felony, a term of years not less than ten years and not to exceed thirty
years, or life imprisonment, for which an offender shall serve seventy percent of the imposed
sentence prior to parole eligibility;
(2) For a class B felony, a term of years not less than five years and not to exceed fifteen
years, for which an offender shall serve fifty percent of the imposed sentence prior to
parole eligibility;
(3) For a class C felony, a term of years not less than three years and not to exceed ten
years, for which an offender shall serve:
(a) Forty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a conviction
under chapter 566, 568, or 573 that requires registration as a sex offender under chapter
589;
(b) Thirty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a first
conviction other than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(c) Thirty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a
second conviction other than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(d) Fifty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a third or
subsequent conviction other than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 58
(4) For a class D felony, a term of years not to exceed seven years, for which an
offender shall serve:
(a) Twenty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a
conviction under chapter 566, 568, or 573 that requires registration as a sex offender under
chapter 589;
(b) Twenty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a first
conviction other than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(c) Twenty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a
second conviction other than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(d) Fifty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a third or
subsequent conviction other than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(5) For a class E felony, a term of years not to exceed four years, for which an offender
shall serve:
(a) Twenty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a
conviction under chapter 566, 568, or 573 that requires registration as a sex offender under
chapter 589;
(b) Fifteen percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a first
conviction other than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(c) Twenty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a second
conviction other than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(d) Fifty percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility for a third or
subsequent conviction other than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(6) For a class A misdemeanor, a term not to exceed one year;
(7) For a class B misdemeanor, a term not to exceed six months;
(8) For a class C misdemeanor, a term not to exceed fifteen days.
2. When a person is sentenced to the authorized term of imprisonment for a higher
class than the offense for which the person was found guilty under section 558.016, 565.079,
or 579.170, the person shall also be sentenced to the parole eligibility percentage of the
higher class.
3. The authorized terms of imprisonment under subsections 1 and 2 of this section
shall apply to all offenses, except if the terms for parole eligibility otherwise provided by
statute result in a higher parole eligibility percentage, in which case the statute resulting
in the higher parole eligibility percentage shall apply.
4. The authorized terms of imprisonment under subsection 1 of this section shall
not apply to any offense where a suspended imposition of sentence is imposed or where the
matter is referred to an adult treatment court as provided in chapter 478.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 59
5. In cases of class D and E felonies, the court shall have discretion to imprison for a
special term not to exceed one year in the county jail or other authorized penal institution, and
the place of confinement shall be fixed by the court. If the court imposes a sentence of
imprisonment for a term longer than one year upon a person convicted of a class D or E felony,
it shall commit the person to the custody of the department of corrections.
[3.] 6. (1) When a regular sentence of imprisonment for a felony is imposed, the court
shall commit the person to the custody of the department of corrections for the term imposed
under section 557.036, or until released under procedures established elsewhere by law.
(2) A sentence of imprisonment for a misdemeanor shall be for a definite term and the
court shall commit the person to the county jail or other authorized penal institution for the term
of his or her sentence or until released under procedure established elsewhere by law.
[4.] 7. (1) Except as otherwise provided, a sentence of imprisonment for a term of years
for felonies other than dangerous felonies as defined in section 556.061, and other than sentences
of imprisonment which involve the individual's fourth or subsequent remand to the department
of corrections shall consist of a prison term and a conditional release term. The conditional
release term of any term imposed under section 557.036 shall be:
(a) One-third for terms of nine years or less;
(b) Three years for terms between nine and fifteen years;
(c) Five years for terms more than fifteen years; and the prison term shall be the
remainder of such term. The prison term may be extended by the parole board pursuant to
subsection [5] 8 of this section.
(2) "Conditional release" means the conditional discharge of an offender by the parole
board, subject to conditions of release that the parole board deems reasonable to assist the
offender to lead a law-abiding life, and subject to the supervision under the division of probation
and parole. The conditions of release shall include avoidance by the offender of any other
offense, federal or state, and other conditions that the parole board in its discretion deems
reasonably necessary to assist the releasee in avoiding further violation of the law.
[5.] 8. The date of conditional release from the prison term may be extended up to a
maximum of the entire sentence of imprisonment by the parole board. The director of any
division of the department of corrections except the division of probation and parole may file
with the parole board a petition to extend the conditional release date when an offender fails to
follow the rules and regulations of the division or commits an act in violation of such rules.
Within ten working days of receipt of the petition to extend the conditional release date, the
parole board shall convene a hearing on the petition. The offender shall be present and may call
witnesses in his or her behalf and cross-examine witnesses appearing against the offender. The
hearing shall be conducted as provided in section 217.670. If the violation occurs in close

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 60
proximity to the conditional release date, the conditional release may be held for a maximum of
fifteen working days to permit necessary time for the division director to file a petition for an
extension with the parole board and for the parole board to conduct a hearing, provided some
affirmative manifestation of an intent to extend the conditional release has occurred prior to the
conditional release date. If at the end of a fifteen-working-day period a parole board decision
has not been reached, the offender shall be released conditionally. The decision of the parole
board shall be final.
9. Any person who commits a class A or B felony or an offense under chapter 566,
100 568, or 573 that requires registration as a sex offender under chapter 589, on or after
101 January 1, 2028, shall not be eligible for conditional release for that offense.
102 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any offender who
103 has been found guilty of a dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061 and is committed
104 to the department of corrections shall be required to serve eighty-five percent of the
105 sentence imposed by the court prior to parole eligibility.
106 11. For the purpose of determining the minimum time required to be served by the
107 offender before he or she is eligible for parole, the following calculations shall apply:
108 (1) A sentence of life shall be calculated to be thirty years; and
109 (2) Any sentence either alone or in the aggregate with other consecutive sentences
110 for offenses committed at or near the same time that is over seventy-five years shall be
111 calculated to be seventy-five years.
112 12. When consecutive sentences are imposed by a court, the minimum percentage
113 for each respective felony shall be met prior to parole eligibility.
114 13. When concurrent sentences are imposed by a court, the person shall serve the
115 minimum required percentage for the longest sentence prior to parole eligibility.
558.016. 1. The court may sentence a person who has been found guilty of an offense
to a term of imprisonment as authorized by section 558.011 or to a term of imprisonment
authorized by a statute governing the offense if it finds the defendant is a prior offender or a
persistent misdemeanor offender. The court [may] shall sentence a person to an extended term
of imprisonment if:
(1) The defendant is a persistent offender or a dangerous offender, and the person is
sentenced under subsection 7 of this section;
(2) The statute under which the person was found guilty contains a sentencing
enhancement provision that is based on a prior finding of guilt or a finding of prior criminal
conduct and the person is sentenced according to the statute; or
(3) A more specific sentencing enhancement provision applies that is based on a prior
finding of guilt or a finding of prior criminal conduct.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 61
2. A "prior offender" is one who has been found guilty of one felony.
3. A "persistent offender" is one who has been found guilty of two or more felonies
committed at different times, or one who has been previously found guilty of a dangerous felony
as defined in subdivision (19) of section 556.061.
4. A "dangerous offender" is one who:
(1) Is being sentenced for a felony during the commission of which he knowingly
murdered or endangered or threatened the life of another person or knowingly inflicted or
attempted or threatened to inflict serious physical injury on another person; and
(2) Has been found guilty of a class A or B felony or a dangerous felony.
5. A "persistent misdemeanor offender" is one who has been found guilty of two or more
offenses, committed at different times that are classified as A or B misdemeanors under the laws
of this state.
6. The findings of guilt shall be prior to the date of commission of the present offense.
7. The court shall sentence a person, who has been found to be a persistent offender or
a dangerous offender, and is found guilty of a class B, C, D, or E felony to the authorized term
of imprisonment for the offense that is one class higher than the offense for which the person is
found guilty.
[558.019. 1. [This section shall not be construed to affect the powers
of the governor under Article IV, Section 7, of the Missouri Constitution.
This statute shall not affect those provisions of section 565.020 or section
566.125, which set minimum terms of sentences, or the provisions of section
559.115, relating to probation.
2. The provisions of subsections 2 to 5 of this section shall only be
applicable to the offenses contained in sections 565.021, 565.023, 565.024,
565.027, 565.050, 565.052, 565.054, 565.072, 565.073, 565.074, 565.090,
565.110, 565.115, 565.120, 565.153, 565.156, 565.225, 565.300, 566.030,
566.031, 566.032, 566.034, 566.060, 566.061, 566.062, 566.064, 566.067,
566.068, 566.069, 566.071, 566.083, 566.086, 566.100, 566.101, 566.103,
566.111, 566.115, 566.145, 566.151, 566.153, 566.203, 566.206, 566.209,
566.210, 566.211, 566.215, 568.030, 568.045, 568.060, 568.065, 568.175,
569.040, 569.160, 570.023, 570.025, 570.030 when punished as a class A, B,
or C felony, 570.145 when punished as a class A or B felony, 570.223 when
punished as a class B or C felony, 571.020, 571.030, 571.070, 573.023,
573.025, 573.035, 573.037, 573.200, 573.205, 574.070, 574.080, 574.115,
575.030, 575.150, 575.153, 575.155, 575.157, 575.200 when punished as a
class A felony, 575.210, 575.230 when punished as a class B felony, 575.240
when punished as a class B felony, 576.070, 576.080, 577.010, 577.013,
577.078, 577.703, 577.706, 579.065, and 579.068 when punished as a class
A or B felony. For the purposes of this section, "prison commitment" means
and is the receipt by the department of corrections of an offender after

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 62
sentencing. For purposes of this section, prior prison commitments to the
department of corrections shall not include an offender's first incarceration
prior to release on probation under section 217.362 or 559.115. Other
provisions of the law to the contrary notwithstanding, any offender who has
been found guilty of a felony other than a dangerous felony as defined in
section 556.061 and is committed to the department of corrections shall be
required to serve the following minimum prison terms:
(1) If the offender has one previous prison commitment to the
department of corrections for a felony offense, the minimum prison term
which the offender must serve shall be forty percent of his or her sentence or
until the offender attains seventy years of age, and has served at least thirty
percent of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs first;
(2) If the offender has two previous prison commitments to the
department of corrections for felonies unrelated to the present offense, the
minimum prison term which the offender must serve shall be fifty percent of
his or her sentence or until the offender attains seventy years of age, and has
served at least forty percent of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs first;
(3) If the offender has three or more previous prison commitments to
the department of corrections for felonies unrelated to the present offense, the
minimum prison term which the offender must serve shall be eighty percent
of his or her sentence or until the offender attains seventy years of age, and
has served at least forty percent of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs
first.
3. Other provisions of the law to the contrary notwithstanding, any
offender who has been found guilty of a dangerous felony as defined in
section 556.061 and is committed to the department of corrections shall be
required to serve a minimum prison term of eighty-five percent of the sentence
imposed by the court or until the offender attains seventy years of age, and has
served at least forty percent of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs first.
4. For the purpose of determining the minimum prison term to be
served, the following calculations shall apply:
(1) A sentence of life shall be calculated to be thirty years;
(2) Any sentence either alone or in the aggregate with other
consecutive sentences for offenses committed at or near the same time which
is over seventy-five years shall be calculated to be seventy-five years.
5. For purposes of this section, the term "minimum prison term" shall
mean time required to be served by the offender before he or she is eligible for
parole, conditional release or other early release by the department of
corrections.
6. An offender who was convicted of, or pled guilty to, a felony
offense other than those offenses listed in subsection 2 of this section prior to
August 28, 2019, shall no longer be subject to the minimum prison term
provisions under subsection 2 of this section, and shall be eligible for parole,
conditional release, or other early release by the department of corrections

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 63
according to the rules and regulations of the department.
7.] (1) A sentencing advisory commission is hereby created to consist
of eleven members. One member shall be appointed by the speaker of the
house. One member shall be appointed by the president pro tem of the senate.
One member shall be the director of the department of corrections. Six
members shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor from
among the following: the public defender commission; private citizens; a
private member of the Missouri Bar; the board of probation and parole; and
a prosecutor. Two members shall be appointed by the supreme court, one
from a metropolitan area and one from a rural area. All members shall be
appointed to a four-year term. All members of the sentencing commission
appointed prior to August 28, 1994, shall continue to serve on the sentencing
advisory commission at the pleasure of the governor.
(2) The commission shall study sentencing practices in the circuit
courts throughout the state for the purpose of determining whether and to what
extent disparities exist among the various circuit courts with respect to the
length of sentences imposed and the use of probation for offenders convicted
of the same or similar offenses and with similar criminal histories. The
commission shall also study and examine whether and to what extent
sentencing disparity among economic and social classes exists in relation to
the sentence of death and if so, the reasons therefor, if sentences are
comparable to other states, if the length of the sentence is appropriate, and the
rate of rehabilitation based on sentence. It shall compile statistics, examine
cases, draw conclusions, and perform other duties relevant to the research and
investigation of disparities in death penalty sentencing among economic and
social classes.
(3) The commission shall study alternative sentences, prison work
programs, work release, home-based incarceration, probation and parole
options, and any other programs and report the feasibility of these options in
Missouri.
(4) The governor shall select a chairperson who shall call meetings of
the commission as required or permitted pursuant to the purpose of the
100 sentencing commission.
101 (5) The members of the commission shall not receive compensation
102 for their duties on the commission, but shall be reimbursed for actual and
103 necessary expenses incurred in the performance of these duties and for which
104 they are not reimbursed by reason of their other paid positions.
105 (6) The circuit and associate circuit courts of this state, the office of
106 the state courts administrator, the department of public safety, and the
107 department of corrections shall cooperate with the commission by providing
108 information or access to information needed by the commission. The office
109 of the state courts administrator will provide needed staffing resources.
110 [8.] 2. Courts shall retain discretion to lower or exceed the sentence
111 recommended by the commission as otherwise allowable by law, and to order

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 64
112 restorative justice methods, when applicable.
113 [9.] 3. If the imposition or execution of a sentence is suspended, the
114 court may order any or all of the following restorative justice methods, or any
115 other method that the court finds just or appropriate:
116 (1) Restitution to any victim or a statutorily created fund for costs
117 incurred as a result of the offender's actions;
118 (2) Offender treatment programs;
119 (3) Mandatory community service;
120 (4) Work release programs in local facilities; and
121 (5) Community-based residential and nonresidential programs.
122 [10.] 4. Pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection [9] 3 of this section,
123 the court may order the assessment and payment of a designated amount of
124 restitution to a county law enforcement restitution fund established by the
125 county commission pursuant to section 50.565. Such contribution shall not
126 exceed three hundred dollars for any charged offense. Any restitution moneys
127 deposited into the county law enforcement restitution fund pursuant to this
128 section shall only be expended pursuant to the provisions of section 50.565.
129 [11.] 5. A judge may order payment to a restitution fund only if such
130 fund had been created by ordinance or resolution of a county of the state of
131 Missouri prior to sentencing. A judge shall not have any direct supervisory
132 authority or administrative control over any fund to which the judge is
133 ordering a person to make payment.
134 [12.] 6. A person who fails to make a payment to a county law
135 enforcement restitution fund may not have his or her probation revoked solely
136 for failing to make such payment unless the judge, after evidentiary hearing,
137 makes a finding supported by a preponderance of the evidence that the person
138 either willfully refused to make the payment or that the person willfully,
139 intentionally, and purposefully failed to make sufficient bona fide efforts to
140 acquire the resources to pay.
141 [13.] 7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the
142 sentencing advisory commission to issue recommended sentences in specific
143 cases pending in the courts of this state.]
558.019. 1. [This section shall not be construed to affect the powers of the governor
under Article IV, Section 7, of the Missouri Constitution. This statute shall not affect those
provisions of section 565.020 or section 566.125, which set minimum terms of sentences, or the
provisions of section 559.115, relating to probation.
2. The provisions of subsections 2 to 5 of this section shall only be applicable to the
offenses contained in sections 565.021, 565.023, 565.024, 565.027, 565.050, 565.052, 565.054,
565.072, 565.073, 565.074, 565.090, 565.110, 565.115, 565.120, 565.153, 565.156, 565.225,
565.300, 566.030, 566.031, 566.032, 566.034, 566.060, 566.061, 566.062, 566.064, 566.067,
566.068, 566.069, 566.071, 566.083, 566.086, 566.100, 566.101, 566.103, 566.111, 566.115,

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 65
566.145, 566.151, 566.153, 566.203, 566.206, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 566.215, 568.030,
568.045, 568.060, 568.065, 568.175, 569.040, 569.160, 570.023, 570.025, 570.030 when
punished as a class A, B, or C felony, 570.145 when punished as a class A or B felony, 570.223
when punished as a class B or C felony, 571.020, 571.030, 571.070, 573.023, 573.025, 573.035,
573.037, 573.200, 573.205, 574.070, 574.080, 574.115, 575.030, 575.150, 575.153, 575.155,
575.157, 575.200 when punished as a class A felony, 575.210, 575.230 when punished as a class
B felony, 575.240 when punished as a class B felony, 576.070, 576.080, 577.010, 577.013,
577.078, 577.703, 577.706, 579.065, and 579.068 when punished as a class A or B felony. For
the purposes of this section, "prison commitment" means and is the receipt by the department
of corrections of an offender after sentencing. For purposes of this section, prior prison
commitments to the department of corrections shall not include an offender's first incarceration
prior to release on probation under section 217.362 or 559.115. Other provisions of the law to
the contrary notwithstanding, any offender who has been found guilty of a felony other than a
dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061 and is committed to the department of
corrections shall be required to serve the following minimum prison terms:
(1) If the offender has one previous prison commitment to the department of corrections
for a felony offense, the minimum prison term which the offender must serve shall be forty
percent of his or her sentence or until the offender attains seventy years of age, and has served
at least thirty percent of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs first;
(2) If the offender has two previous prison commitments to the department of corrections
for felonies unrelated to the present offense, the minimum prison term which the offender must
serve shall be fifty percent of his or her sentence or until the offender attains seventy years of
age, and has served at least forty percent of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs first;
(3) If the offender has three or more previous prison commitments to the department of
corrections for felonies unrelated to the present offense, the minimum prison term which the
offender must serve shall be eighty percent of his or her sentence or until the offender attains
seventy years of age, and has served at least forty percent of the sentence imposed, whichever
occurs first.
3. Other provisions of the law to the contrary notwithstanding, any offender who has
been found guilty of a dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061 and is committed to the
department of corrections shall be required to serve a minimum prison term of eighty-five
percent of the sentence imposed by the court or until the offender attains seventy years of age,
and has served at least forty percent of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs first.
4. For the purpose of determining the minimum prison term to be served, the following
calculations shall apply:
(1) A sentence of life shall be calculated to be thirty years;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 66
(2) Any sentence either alone or in the aggregate with other consecutive sentences for
offenses committed at or near the same time which is over seventy-five years shall be calculated
to be seventy-five years.
5. For purposes of this section, the term "minimum prison term" shall mean time
required to be served by the offender before he or she is eligible for parole, conditional release
or other early release by the department of corrections.
6. An offender who was convicted of, or pled guilty to, a felony offense other than those
offenses listed in subsection 2 of this section prior to August 28, 2019, shall no longer be subject
to the minimum prison term provisions under subsection 2 of this section, and shall be eligible
for parole, conditional release, or other early release by the department of corrections according
to the rules and regulations of the department.
7.] (1) A sentencing advisory commission is hereby created to consist of eleven
members. One member shall be appointed by the speaker of the house. One member shall be
appointed by the president pro tem of the senate. One member shall be the director of the
department of corrections. Six members shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the
governor from among the following: the public defender commission; private citizens; a private
member of the Missouri Bar; the board of probation and parole; and a prosecutor. Two members
shall be appointed by the supreme court, one from a metropolitan area and one from a rural area.
All members shall be appointed to a four-year term. All members of the sentencing commission
appointed prior to August 28, 1994, shall continue to serve on the sentencing advisory
commission at the pleasure of the governor.
(2) The commission shall study sentencing practices in the circuit courts throughout the
state for the purpose of determining whether and to what extent disparities exist among the
various circuit courts with respect to the length of sentences imposed and the use of probation
for offenders convicted of the same or similar offenses and with similar criminal histories. The
commission shall also study and examine whether and to what extent sentencing disparity among
economic and social classes exists in relation to the sentence of death and if so, the reasons
therefor, if sentences are comparable to other states, if the length of the sentence is appropriate,
and the rate of rehabilitation based on sentence. It shall compile statistics, examine cases, draw
conclusions, and perform other duties relevant to the research and investigation of disparities in
death penalty sentencing among economic and social classes.
(3) The commission shall study alternative sentences, prison work programs, work
release, home-based incarceration, probation and parole options, and any other programs and
report the feasibility of these options in Missouri.
(4) The governor shall select a chairperson who shall call meetings of the commission
as required or permitted pursuant to the purpose of the sentencing commission.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 67
(5) The members of the commission shall not receive compensation for their duties on
the commission, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of these duties and for which they are not reimbursed by reason of their other paid
positions.
(6) The circuit and associate circuit courts of this state, the office of the state courts
administrator, the department of public safety, and the department of corrections shall cooperate
with the commission by providing information or access to information needed by the
commission. The office of the state courts administrator will provide needed staffing resources.
[8.] 2. Courts shall retain discretion to lower or exceed the sentence recommended by
the commission as otherwise allowable by law, and to order restorative justice methods, when
applicable.
[9.] 3. If the imposition or execution of a sentence is suspended, the court may order any
or all of the following restorative justice methods, or any other method that the court finds just
or appropriate:
(1) Restitution to any victim or a statutorily created fund for costs incurred as a result
of the offender's actions;
(2) Offender treatment programs;
(3) Mandatory community service;
100 (4) Work release programs in local facilities; and
101 (5) Community-based residential and nonresidential programs.
102 [10.] 4. Pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection [9] 3 of this section, the court may
103 order the assessment and payment of a designated amount of restitution to a county law
104 enforcement restitution fund established by the county commission pursuant to section 50.565.
105 Such contribution shall not exceed three hundred dollars for any charged offense. Any
106 restitution moneys deposited into the county law enforcement restitution fund pursuant to this
107 section shall only be expended pursuant to the provisions of section 50.565.
108 [11.] 5. A judge may order payment to a restitution fund only if such fund had been
109 created by ordinance or resolution of a county of the state of Missouri prior to sentencing. A
110 judge shall not have any direct supervisory authority or administrative control over any fund to
111 which the judge is ordering a person to make payment.
112 [12.] 6. A person who fails to make a payment to a county law enforcement restitution
113 fund may not have his or her probation revoked solely for failing to make such payment unless
114 the judge, after evidentiary hearing, makes a finding supported by a preponderance of the
115 evidence that the person either willfully refused to make the payment or that the person willfully,
116 intentionally, and purposefully failed to make sufficient bona fide efforts to acquire the resources
117 to pay.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 68
118 [13.] 7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the sentencing advisory
119 commission to issue recommended sentences in specific cases pending in the courts of this state.
[558.026. 1. Multiple sentences of imprisonment shall run
concurrently unless the court specifies that they shall run consecutively;
except in the case of multiple sentences of imprisonment imposed for any
offense committed during or at the same time as, or multiple offenses of, the
following felonies:
(1) Rape in the first degree, forcible rape, or rape;
(2) Statutory rape in the first degree;
(3) Sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy, or sodomy;
(4) Statutory sodomy in the first degree; or
(5) An attempt to commit any of the felonies listed in this subsection.
In such case, the sentence of imprisonment imposed for any felony listed in
this subsection or an attempt to commit any of the aforesaid shall run
consecutively to the other sentences. The sentences imposed for any other
offense may run concurrently.
2. If a person who is on probation, parole or conditional release is
sentenced to a term of imprisonment for an offense committed after the
granting of probation or parole or after the start of his or her conditional
release term, the court shall direct the manner in which the sentence or
sentences imposed by the court shall run with respect to any resulting
probation, parole or conditional release revocation term or terms. If the
subsequent sentence to imprisonment is in another jurisdiction, the court shall
specify how any resulting probation, parole or conditional release revocation
term or terms shall run with respect to the foreign sentence of imprisonment.
3. A court may cause any sentence it imposes to run concurrently with
a sentence an individual is serving or is to serve in another state or in a federal
correctional center. If the Missouri sentence is served in another state or in
a federal correctional center, subsection [4] 7 of section 558.011 and section
217.690 shall apply as if the individual were serving his or her sentence within
the department of corrections of the state of Missouri, except that a personal
hearing before the parole board shall not be required for parole consideration.]
558.026. 1. Multiple sentences of imprisonment shall run concurrently unless the court
specifies that they shall run consecutively; except in the case of multiple sentences of
imprisonment imposed for any offense committed during or at the same time as, or multiple
offenses of, the following felonies:
(1) Rape in the first degree, forcible rape, or rape;
(2) Statutory rape in the first degree;
(3) Sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy, or sodomy;
(4) Statutory sodomy in the first degree; or
(5) An attempt to commit any of the felonies listed in this subsection. In such case, the

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 69
sentence of imprisonment imposed for any felony listed in this subsection or an attempt to
commit any of the aforesaid shall run consecutively to the other sentences. The sentences
imposed for any other offense may run concurrently.
2. If a person who is on probation, parole or conditional release is sentenced to a term
of imprisonment for an offense committed after the granting of probation or parole or after the
start of his or her conditional release term, the court shall direct the manner in which the
sentence or sentences imposed by the court shall run with respect to any resulting probation,
parole or conditional release revocation term or terms. If the subsequent sentence to
imprisonment is in another jurisdiction, the court shall specify how any resulting probation,
parole or conditional release revocation term or terms shall run with respect to the foreign
sentence of imprisonment.
3. A court may cause any sentence it imposes to run concurrently with a sentence an
individual is serving or is to serve in another state or in a federal correctional center. If the
Missouri sentence is served in another state or in a federal correctional center, subsection [4] 7
of section 558.011 and section 217.690 shall apply as if the individual were serving his or her
sentence within the department of corrections of the state of Missouri, except that a personal
hearing before the parole board shall not be required for parole consideration.
[558.031. 1. A sentence of imprisonment shall commence when a
person convicted of an offense in this state is received into the custody of the
department of corrections or other place of confinement where the offender
is sentenced.
2. [Such] When placing a person on probation for a suspended
imposition of sentence, probation for a suspended execution of sentence,
or when executing a sentence of imprisonment, the court shall record, as
part of each judgment, the number of days the person [shall receive credit
toward the service of a sentence of imprisonment for all time] was in prison,
jail, or custody, that was related to the offense, after the offense occurred
and before [the commencement of the sentence, when the time in custody was
related to that offense] being sentenced to imprisonment and the defendant
shall be awarded credit toward the service of a sentence of imprisonment
for that number of days. [This] The jail time credit calculation shall be
based upon the certification of the sheriff as provided in subdivision (3) of
subsection 2 of section 217.305 and may be supplemented by a certificate of
a sheriff or other custodial officer from another jurisdiction having held the
person on the charge of the offense for which the sentence of imprisonment
is ordered and shall be pronounced at the time of the judgment, the
execution of a suspended sentence, or the suspension of imposition of
sentence, shall be included in the record, and shall include both the dates
the person was in custody and the number of days to be credited toward
the service of the sentence.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 70
3. For purposes of this section, time in custody related to an
offense includes time during which the offense was charged in a criminal
proceeding, there was an arrest warrant issued in said criminal
proceeding, and the arrest warrant was served upon the person, and
includes time served on house arrest. The person shall not be entitled to
any credit toward the service of a sentence of imprisonment for any time
such person was not being held on said arrest warrant because such
person posted bond, the arrest warrant was recalled, or the person was
otherwise released.
4. The court may take judicial notice of all time the person has
served in prison, jail, or custody, or on house arrest for a criminal
proceeding by comparing dates of service on arrest warrants with
evidence contained within the court file of dates of release and the
prosecution and defense attorney may enter into a stipulation with regard
to credit for the service of a sentence of imprisonment for all time in
prison, jail, or custody, or on house arrest except in no event may the
court approve a stipulation that is greater than or less than the time in
custody related to an offense.
5. Upon motion and notice by defendant or defense counsel, for
any such person who was held in a juvenile detention facility for an
offense for which such person was subsequently adjudicated to stand trial
as an adult, the court may also award credit toward the service of a
sentence of imprisonment for any time such person was confined in a
juvenile detention facility.
6. In the event a criminal proceeding related to an offense is
dismissed without prejudice by a court or nolle prossed by the state, upon
motion and notice by defendant or defense counsel, the proceeding may
be consolidated into the present matter for purposes of calculating credit
for the service of a sentence of imprisonment.
7. The officer required by law to deliver a person convicted of an
offense in this state to the department of corrections shall endorse upon the
papers required by section 217.305 both the dates the offender was in custody
and the period of time to be credited toward the service of the sentence of
imprisonment, [except as endorsed by such officer] included in the judgment
or suspended imposition of sentence and such additional days after the
pronouncement of sentence and before the delivery of the person to the
department of corrections.
[4.] 8. If a person convicted of an offense escapes from custody, such
escape shall interrupt the sentence. The interruption shall continue until such
person is returned to the correctional center where the sentence was being
served, or in the case of a person committed to the custody of the department
of corrections, to any correctional center operated by the department of
corrections. An escape shall also interrupt the jail time credit to be applied to
a sentence which had not commenced when the escape occurred.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 71
[5.] 9. If a sentence of imprisonment is vacated and a new sentence
imposed upon the offender for that offense, all time served under the vacated
sentence shall be credited against the new sentence, unless the time has
already been credited to another sentence as provided in subsection 1 of this
section.
[6.] 10. If a person released from imprisonment on parole or serving
a conditional release term violates any of the conditions of his or her parole
or release, he or she may be treated as a parole violator. If the parole board
revokes the parole or conditional release, the paroled person shall serve the
remainder of the prison term and conditional release term, as an additional
prison term, and the conditionally released person shall serve the remainder
of the conditional release term as a prison term, unless released on parole.
[7. Subsection 2 of this section shall be applicable to offenses for
which the offender was sentenced on or after August 28, 2023.
8. The total amount of credit given shall not exceed the number of
days spent in prison, jail, or custody after the offense occurred and before the
commencement of the sentence.]
11. A person may only challenge credit awarded or not awarded
pursuant to this section by the filing of a petition for a writ of habeas
corpus. ]
558.031. 1. A sentence of imprisonment shall commence when a person convicted of
an offense in this state is received into the custody of the department of corrections or other
place of confinement where the offender is sentenced.
2. [Such] When placing a person on probation for a suspended imposition of
sentence, probation for a suspended execution of sentence, or when executing a sentence
of imprisonment, the court shall record, as part of each judgment, the number of days the
person [shall receive credit toward the service of a sentence of imprisonment for all time] was
in prison, jail, or custody, that was related to the offense, after the offense occurred and before
[the commencement of the sentence, when the time in custody was related to that offense] being
sentenced to imprisonment and the defendant shall be awarded credit toward the service
of a sentence of imprisonment for that number of days. [This] The jail time credit
calculation shall be based upon the certification of the sheriff as provided in subdivision (3) of
subsection 2 of section 217.305 and may be supplemented by a certificate of a sheriff or other
custodial officer from another jurisdiction having held the person on the charge of the offense
for which the sentence of imprisonment is ordered and shall be pronounced at the time of the
judgment, the execution of a suspended sentence, or the suspension of imposition of
sentence, shall be included in the record, and shall include both the dates the person was
in custody and the number of days to be credited toward the service of the sentence.
3. For purposes of this section, time in custody related to an offense includes time

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 72
during which the offense was charged in a criminal proceeding, there was an arrest
warrant issued in said criminal proceeding, and the arrest warrant was served upon the
person, and includes time served on house arrest. The person shall not be entitled to any
credit toward the service of a sentence of imprisonment for any time such person was not
being held on said arrest warrant because such person posted bond, the arrest warrant was
recalled, or the person was otherwise released.
4. The court may take judicial notice of all time the person has served in prison,
jail, or custody, or on house arrest for a criminal proceeding by comparing dates of service
on arrest warrants with evidence contained within the court file of dates of release and the
prosecution and defense attorney may enter into a stipulation with regard to credit for the
service of a sentence of imprisonment for all time in prison, jail, or custody, or on house
arrest except in no event may the court approve a stipulation that is greater than or less
than the time in custody related to an offense.
5. Upon motion and notice by defendant or defense counsel, for any such person
who was held in a juvenile detention facility for an offense for which such person was
subsequently adjudicated to stand trial as an adult, the court may also award credit toward
the service of a sentence of imprisonment for any time such person was confined in a
juvenile detention facility.
6. In the event a criminal proceeding related to an offense is dismissed without
prejudice by a court or nolle prossed by the state, upon motion and notice by defendant or
defense counsel, the proceeding may be consolidated into the present matter for purposes
of calculating credit for the service of a sentence of imprisonment.
7. The officer required by law to deliver a person convicted of an offense in this state
to the department of corrections shall endorse upon the papers required by section 217.305 both
the dates the offender was in custody and the period of time to be credited toward the service of
the sentence of imprisonment, [except as endorsed by such officer] included in the judgment
or suspended imposition of sentence and such additional days after the pronouncement of
sentence and before the delivery of the person to the department of corrections.
[4.] 8. If a person convicted of an offense escapes from custody, such escape shall
interrupt the sentence. The interruption shall continue until such person is returned to the
correctional center where the sentence was being served, or in the case of a person committed
to the custody of the department of corrections, to any correctional center operated by the
department of corrections. An escape shall also interrupt the jail time credit to be applied to a
sentence which had not commenced when the escape occurred.
[5.] 9. If a sentence of imprisonment is vacated and a new sentence imposed upon the
offender for that offense, all time served under the vacated sentence shall be credited against the

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 73
new sentence, unless the time has already been credited to another sentence as provided in
subsection 1 of this section.
[6.] 10. If a person released from imprisonment on parole or serving a conditional
release term violates any of the conditions of his or her parole or release, he or she may be
treated as a parole violator. If the parole board revokes the parole or conditional release, the
paroled person shall serve the remainder of the prison term and conditional release term, as an
additional prison term, and the conditionally released person shall serve the remainder of the
conditional release term as a prison term, unless released on parole.
[7. Subsection 2 of this section shall be applicable to offenses for which the offender was
sentenced on or after August 28, 2023.
8. The total amount of credit given shall not exceed the number of days spent in prison,
jail, or custody after the offense occurred and before the commencement of the sentence.]
11. A person may only challenge credit awarded or not awarded pursuant to this
section by the filing of a petition for a writ of habeas corpus.
[558.046. The sentencing court may, upon petition, reduce any term
of sentence or probation pronounced by the court or a term of conditional
release or parole pronounced by the parole board if the court determines that:
(1) The convicted person was:
(a) Convicted of an offense that did not involve violence or the threat
of violence; and
(b) Convicted of an offense that involved alcohol or illegal drugs; and
(2) Since the commission of such offense, the convicted person has
successfully completed a detoxification and rehabilitation program; and
(3) The convicted person is not:
(a) A prior offender, a persistent offender, a dangerous offender or a
persistent misdemeanor offender as defined by section 558.016; or
(b) A persistent sexual offender as defined in section 566.125[; or
(c) A prior offender, a persistent offender or a class X offender as
defined in section 558.019].]
558.046. The sentencing court may, upon petition, reduce any term of sentence or
probation pronounced by the court or a term of conditional release or parole pronounced by the
parole board if the court determines that:
(1) The convicted person was:
(a) Convicted of an offense that did not involve violence or the threat of violence; and
(b) Convicted of an offense that involved alcohol or illegal drugs; and
(2) Since the commission of such offense, the convicted person has successfully
completed a detoxification and rehabilitation program; and
(3) The convicted person is not:

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 74
(a) A prior offender, a persistent offender, a dangerous offender or a persistent
misdemeanor offender as defined by section 558.016; or
(b) A persistent sexual offender as defined in section 566.125[; or
(c) A prior offender, a persistent offender or a class X offender as defined in section
558.019].
[559.115. 1. Neither probation nor parole shall be granted by the
circuit court between the time the transcript on appeal from the offender's
conviction has been filed in appellate court and the disposition of the appeal
by such court.
2. Unless otherwise prohibited by subsection [8] 7 of this section, a
circuit court only upon its own motion and not that of the state or the offender
shall have the power to grant probation to an offender anytime up to one
hundred twenty days after such offender has been delivered to the department
of corrections but not thereafter. The court may request information and a
recommendation from the department concerning the offender and such
offender's behavior during the period of incarceration. Except as provided in
this section, the court may place the offender on probation in a program
created pursuant to section 217.777, or may place the offender on probation
with any other conditions authorized by law.
3. The court may recommend placement of an offender in a
department of corrections one hundred twenty-day program under this
subsection. The department of corrections shall assess each offender to
determine the appropriate one hundred twenty-day program in which to place
the offender, which may include placement in the structured cognitive
behavioral intervention program or institutional treatment program. The
placement of an offender in the structured cognitive behavioral intervention
program or institutional treatment program shall be at the sole discretion of the
department based on the assessment of the offender and available bed space.
When the court recommends and receives placement of an offender in a
department of corrections one hundred twenty-day program, the offender shall
be released on probation if the department of corrections determines that the
offender has successfully completed the program except as follows. Upon
successful completion of a program under this subsection, the division of
probation and parole shall advise the sentencing court of an offender's
probationary release date thirty days prior to release. The court shall follow
the recommendation of the department unless the court determines that
probation is not appropriate. If the court determines that probation is not
appropriate, the court may order the execution of the offender's sentence only
after conducting a hearing on the matter within ninety to one hundred twenty
days from the date the offender was delivered to the department of
corrections. If the department determines the offender has not successfully
completed a one hundred twenty-day program under this subsection, the
division of probation and parole shall advise the prosecuting attorney and the

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 75
sentencing court of the defendant's unsuccessful program exit and the
defendant shall be removed from the program. The department shall report
on the offender's participation in the program and may provide
recommendations for terms and conditions of an offender's probation. The
court shall then have the power to grant probation or order the execution of
the offender's sentence.
4. If the court is advised that an offender is not eligible for placement
in a one hundred twenty-day program under subsection 3 of this section, the
court shall consider other authorized dispositions. If the department of
corrections one hundred twenty-day program under subsection 3 of this
section is full, the court may place the offender in a private program approved
by the department of corrections or the court, the expenses of such program
to be paid by the offender, or in an available program offered by another
organization. If the offender is convicted of a class C, class D, or class E
nonviolent felony, the court may order probation while awaiting appointment
to treatment.
5. Except when the offender has been found to be a predatory sexual
offender pursuant to section 566.125, the court shall request the department
of corrections to conduct a sexual offender assessment if the defendant has
been found guilty of sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony. Upon
completion of the assessment, the department shall provide to the court a
report on the offender and may provide recommendations for terms and
conditions of an offender's probation. The assessment shall not be considered
a one hundred twenty-day program as provided under subsection 3 of this
section. The process for granting probation to an offender who has completed
the assessment shall be as provided under subsections 2 and 6 of this section.
6. Unless the offender is being granted probation pursuant to
successful completion of a one hundred twenty-day program the circuit court
shall notify the state in writing when the court intends to grant probation to the
offender pursuant to the provisions of this section. The state may, in writing,
request a hearing within ten days of receipt of the court's notification that the
court intends to grant probation. Upon the state's request for a hearing, the
court shall grant a hearing as soon as reasonably possible. If the state does not
respond to the court's notice in writing within ten days, the court may proceed
upon its own motion to grant probation.
7. [An offender's first incarceration under this section prior to release
on probation shall not be considered a previous prison commitment for the
purpose of determining a minimum prison term under the provisions of section
558.019.
8.] Notwithstanding any other provision of law, probation may not be
granted pursuant to this section to offenders who have been convicted of
murder in the second degree pursuant to section 565.021; forcible rape
pursuant to section 566.030 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013; rape in the
first degree under section 566.030; forcible sodomy pursuant to section

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 76
566.060 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013; sodomy in the first degree
under section 566.060; statutory rape in the first degree pursuant to section
566.032; statutory sodomy in the first degree pursuant to section 566.062;
child molestation in the first degree pursuant to section 566.067 when
classified as a class A felony; abuse of a child pursuant to section 568.060
when classified as a class A felony; or an offender who has been found to be
a predatory sexual offender pursuant to section 566.125; any offense under
section 557.045; or any offense in which there exists a statutory prohibition
against either probation or parole.]
559.115. 1. Neither probation nor parole shall be granted by the circuit court between
the time the transcript on appeal from the offender's conviction has been filed in appellate court
and the disposition of the appeal by such court.
2. Unless otherwise prohibited by subsection [8] 7 of this section, a circuit court only
upon its own motion and not that of the state or the offender shall have the power to grant
probation to an offender anytime up to one hundred twenty days after such offender has been
delivered to the department of corrections but not thereafter. The court may request information
and a recommendation from the department concerning the offender and such offender's
behavior during the period of incarceration. Except as provided in this section, the court may
place the offender on probation in a program created pursuant to section 217.777, or may place
the offender on probation with any other conditions authorized by law.
3. The court may recommend placement of an offender in a department of corrections
one hundred twenty-day program under this subsection. The department of corrections shall
assess each offender to determine the appropriate one hundred twenty-day program in which to
place the offender, which may include placement in the structured cognitive behavioral
intervention program or institutional treatment program. The placement of an offender in the
structured cognitive behavioral intervention program or institutional treatment program shall be
at the sole discretion of the department based on the assessment of the offender and available
bed space. When the court recommends and receives placement of an offender in a department
of corrections one hundred twenty-day program, the offender shall be released on probation if
the department of corrections determines that the offender has successfully completed the
program except as follows. Upon successful completion of a program under this subsection, the
division of probation and parole shall advise the sentencing court of an offender's probationary
release date thirty days prior to release. The court shall follow the recommendation of the
department unless the court determines that probation is not appropriate. If the court determines
that probation is not appropriate, the court may order the execution of the offender's sentence
only after conducting a hearing on the matter within ninety to one hundred twenty days from the
date the offender was delivered to the department of corrections. If the department determines

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 77
the offender has not successfully completed a one hundred twenty-day program under this
subsection, the division of probation and parole shall advise the prosecuting attorney and the
sentencing court of the defendant's unsuccessful program exit and the defendant shall be
removed from the program. The department shall report on the offender's participation in the
program and may provide recommendations for terms and conditions of an offender's probation.
The court shall then have the power to grant probation or order the execution of the offender's
sentence.
4. If the court is advised that an offender is not eligible for placement in a one hundred
twenty-day program under subsection 3 of this section, the court shall consider other authorized
dispositions. If the department of corrections one hundred twenty-day program under subsection
3 of this section is full, the court may place the offender in a private program approved by the
department of corrections or the court, the expenses of such program to be paid by the offender,
or in an available program offered by another organization. If the offender is convicted of a class
C, class D, or class E nonviolent felony, the court may order probation while awaiting
appointment to treatment.
5. Except when the offender has been found to be a predatory sexual offender pursuant
to section 566.125, the court shall request the department of corrections to conduct a sexual
offender assessment if the defendant has been found guilty of sexual abuse when classified as
a class B felony. Upon completion of the assessment, the department shall provide to the court
a report on the offender and may provide recommendations for terms and conditions of an
offender's probation. The assessment shall not be considered a one hundred twenty-day program
as provided under subsection 3 of this section. The process for granting probation to an offender
who has completed the assessment shall be as provided under subsections 2 and 6 of this section.
6. Unless the offender is being granted probation pursuant to successful completion of
a one hundred twenty-day program the circuit court shall notify the state in writing when the
court intends to grant probation to the offender pursuant to the provisions of this section. The
state may, in writing, request a hearing within ten days of receipt of the court's notification that
the court intends to grant probation. Upon the state's request for a hearing, the court shall grant
a hearing as soon as reasonably possible. If the state does not respond to the court's notice in
writing within ten days, the court may proceed upon its own motion to grant probation.
7. [An offender's first incarceration under this section prior to release on probation shall
not be considered a previous prison commitment for the purpose of determining a minimum
prison term under the provisions of section 558.019.
8.] Notwithstanding any other provision of law, probation may not be granted pursuant
to this section to offenders who have been convicted of murder in the second degree pursuant
to section 565.021; forcible rape pursuant to section 566.030 as it existed prior to August 28,

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 78
2013; rape in the first degree under section 566.030; forcible sodomy pursuant to section
566.060 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013; sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
statutory rape in the first degree pursuant to section 566.032; statutory sodomy in the first degree
pursuant to section 566.062; child molestation in the first degree pursuant to section 566.067
when classified as a class A felony; abuse of a child pursuant to section 568.060 when classified
as a class A felony; or an offender who has been found to be a predatory sexual offender
pursuant to section 566.125; any offense under section 557.045; or any offense in which there
exists a statutory prohibition against either probation or parole.
565.002. As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is otherwise plainly required
the following terms mean:
(1) "Adequate cause", cause that would reasonably produce a degree of passion in a
person of ordinary temperament sufficient to substantially impair an ordinary person's capacity
for self-control;
(2) "Bodily harm", physical pain or injury, illness, or any impairment of physical
condition;
(3) "Child", a person under [seventeen] eighteen years of age;
[(3)] (4) "Conduct", includes any act or omission;
[(4)] (5) "Course of conduct", a pattern of conduct composed of two or more acts, which
may include communication by any means, over a period of time, however short, evidencing a
continuity of purpose. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of
course of conduct. Such constitutionally protected activity includes picketing or other organized
protests;
[(5)] (6) "Deliberation", cool reflection for any length of time no matter how brief;
[(6)] (7) "Domestic victim", a household or family member as the term "family" or
"household member" is defined in section 455.010, including any child who is a member of the
household or family;
[(7)] (8) "Emotional distress", something markedly greater than the level of uneasiness,
nervousness, unhappiness, or the like which are commonly experienced in day-to-day living;
[(8)] (9) "Full or partial nudity", the showing of all or any part of the human genitals,
pubic area, buttock, or any part of the nipple of the breast of any female person, with less than
a fully opaque covering;
[(9)] (10) "Great bodily harm", bodily injury which creates a high probability of
death, or which causes serious permanent or protracted loss or impairment of function of
any bodily member or organ, or other serious bodily harm;
(11) "Legal custody", the right to the care, custody and control of a child;
[(10)] (12) "Parent", either a biological parent or a parent by adoption;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 79
[(11)] (13) "Person having a right of custody", a parent or legal guardian of the child;
[(12)] (14) "Photographs" or "films", the making of any photograph, motion picture film,
videotape, or any other recording or transmission of the image of a person;
[(13)] (15) "Place where a person would have a reasonable expectation of privacy", any
place where a reasonable person would believe that a person could disrobe in privacy, without
being concerned that the person's undressing was being viewed, photographed or filmed by
another;
[(14)] (16) "Special victim", any of the following:
(a) A law enforcement officer assaulted in the performance of his or her official duties
or as a direct result of such official duties;
(b) Emergency personnel, any paid or volunteer firefighter, emergency room, hospital,
or trauma center personnel, or emergency medical technician, assaulted in the performance of
his or her official duties or as a direct result of such official duties;
(c) A probation and parole officer assaulted in the performance of his or her official
duties or as a direct result of such official duties;
(d) An elderly person;
(e) A person with a disability;
(f) A vulnerable person;
(g) Any jailer or corrections officer of the state or one of its political subdivisions
assaulted in the performance of his or her official duties or as a direct result of such official
duties;
(h) A highway worker in a construction or work zone as the terms "highway worker",
"construction zone", and "work zone" are defined under section 304.580;
(i) Any utility worker, meaning any employee of a utility that provides gas, heat,
electricity, water, steam, telecommunications services, or sewer services, whether privately,
municipally, or cooperatively owned, while in the performance of his or her job duties, including
any person employed under a contract;
(j) Any cable worker, meaning any employee of a cable operator, as such term is defined
in section 67.2677, including any person employed under contract, while in the performance of
his or her job duties; and
(k) Any employee of a mass transit system, including any employee of public bus or
light rail companies, while in the performance of his or her job duties;
[(15)] (17) "Substantial bodily harm", bodily injury which involves a temporary
but substantial disfigurement, or which causes temporary but substantial loss or
impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ, or which causes a fracture of
any bodily member;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 80
(18) "Sudden passion", passion directly caused by and arising out of provocation by the
victim or another acting with the victim which passion arises at the time of the offense and is not
solely the result of former provocation;
[(16)] (19) "Technological abuse conduct", an act or pattern of behavior that is
intended to harm, threaten, intimidate, control, stalk, harass, monitor, except as otherwise
permitted by law, another person, that occurs using any form of technology, including
internet enabled devices, online platforms, computers, mobile devices, cameras and
imaging programs, apps, location tracking devices, or any other emerging technologies;
(20) "Trier", the judge or jurors to whom issues of fact, guilt or innocence, or the
assessment and declaration of punishment are submitted for decision;
[(17)] (21) "Views", the looking upon of another person, with the unaided eye or with
any device designed or intended to improve visual acuity, for the purpose of arousing or
gratifying the sexual desire of any person.
565.050. 1. A person commits the offense of assault in the first degree if he or she
attempts to kill or knowingly causes or attempts to cause [serious physical injury] great bodily
harm to another person.
2. The offense of assault in the first degree is a class B felony unless in the course
thereof the person inflicts [serious physical injury] great bodily harm on the victim, or if the
victim of such assault is a special victim, as the term "special victim" is defined under section
565.002, in which case it is a class A felony.
565.052. 1. A person commits the offense of assault in the second degree if he or she:
(1) Attempts to kill or knowingly causes or attempts to cause [serious physical injury]
great bodily harm to another person under the influence of sudden passion arising out of
adequate cause; or
(2) Attempts to cause or knowingly causes [physical injury] bodily harm to another
person by means of a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument; or
(3) Recklessly causes [serious physical injury] great bodily harm to another person;
or
(4) Recklessly causes [physical injury] bodily harm to another person by means of
discharge of a firearm.
2. The defendant shall have the burden of injecting the issue of influence of sudden
passion arising from adequate cause under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section.
3. The offense of assault in the second degree is a class D felony, unless the victim of
such assault is a special victim, as the term "special victim" is defined under section 565.002,
in which case it is a class B felony.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 81
565.054. 1. A person commits the offense of assault in the third degree if he or she
knowingly causes [physical injury] bodily harm to another person.
2. The offense of assault in the third degree is a class E felony, unless the victim of such
assault is a special victim, as the term "special victim" is defined under section 565.002, in
which case it is a class D felony.
565.056. 1. A person commits the offense of assault in the fourth degree if:
(1) The person attempts to cause or recklessly causes [physical injury, physical pain, or
illness] bodily harm to another person;
(2) With criminal negligence the person causes [physical injury] bodily harm to another
person by means of a firearm;
(3) The person purposely places another person in apprehension of immediate [physical
injury] bodily harm;
(4) The person recklessly engages in conduct which creates a substantial risk of death
or [serious physical injury] great bodily harm to another person;
(5) The person knowingly causes or attempts to cause physical contact with a person
with a disability, which a reasonable person, who does not have a disability, would consider
offensive or provocative; or
(6) The person knowingly causes physical contact with another person knowing the
other person will regard the contact as offensive or provocative.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, assault in the fourth degree is a
class A misdemeanor.
3. Violation of the provisions of subdivision (3) or (6) of subsection 1 of this section is
a class C misdemeanor unless the victim is a special victim, as the term "special victim" is
defined under section 565.002, in which case a violation of such provisions is a class A
misdemeanor.
565.072. 1. A person commits the offense of domestic assault in the first degree if he
or she attempts to kill or knowingly causes or attempts to cause [serious physical injury] great
bodily harm to a domestic victim, as the term "domestic victim" is defined under section
565.002.
2. The offense of domestic assault in the first degree is a class B felony unless in the
course thereof the person inflicts serious physical injury on the victim, in which case it is a class
A felony.
565.073. 1. A person commits the offense of domestic assault in the second degree if
the act involves a domestic victim, as the term "domestic victim" is defined under section
565.002, and he or she:
(1) Knowingly causes [physical injury] bodily harm to such domestic victim by any

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 82
means, including but not limited to, use of a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument, or by
choking or strangulation; or
(2) Recklessly causes [serious physical injury] great bodily harm to such domestic
victim; or
(3) Recklessly causes [physical injury] bodily harm to such domestic victim by means
of any deadly weapon.
2. The offense of domestic assault in the second degree is a class D felony.
565.074. 1. A person commits the offense of domestic assault in the third degree if he
or she attempts to cause [physical injury] substantial bodily harm or knowingly causes
[physical pain or illness] bodily harm to a domestic victim, as the term "domestic victim" is
defined under section 565.002.
2. The offense of domestic assault in the third degree is a class E felony.
565.076. 1. A person commits the offense of domestic assault in the fourth degree if the
act involves a domestic victim, as the term "domestic victim" is defined under section 565.002,
and:
(1) The person attempts to cause or recklessly causes [physical injury, physical pain, or
illness] bodily harm to such domestic victim;
(2) With criminal negligence the person causes [physical injury] bodily harm to such
domestic victim by means of a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument;
(3) The person purposely places such domestic victim in apprehension of immediate
[physical injury] bodily harm by any means;
(4) The person recklessly engages in conduct which creates a substantial risk of death
or [serious physical injury] great bodily harm to such domestic victim;
(5) The person knowingly causes physical contact with such domestic victim knowing
he or she will regard the contact as offensive; or
(6) The person knowingly attempts to cause or causes the isolation of such domestic
victim by unreasonably and substantially restricting or limiting his or her access to other
persons, telecommunication devices or transportation for the purpose of isolation.
2. The offense of domestic assault in the fourth degree is a class A misdemeanor, unless
the person has previously been found guilty of the offense of domestic assault, of any assault
offense under this chapter, or of any offense against a domestic victim committed in violation
of any county or municipal ordinance in any state, any state law, any federal law, or any military
law which if committed in this state two or more times would be a violation of this section, in
which case it is a class E felony. The offenses described in this subsection may be against the
same domestic victim or against different domestic victims.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 83
565.090. 1. A person commits the offense of harassment in the first degree if he or she,
without good cause, engages in any act with the purpose to cause emotional distress to another
person, and such act does cause such person to suffer emotional distress.
2. The offense of harassment in the first degree is a class E felony, unless the defendant
has previously been found guilty of a violation of this section or section 565.091, or any
offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be
chargeable or indictable as a violation of any offense listed in this section or section
565.091, in which case harassment in the first degree is a class D felony.
3. This section shall not apply to activities of federal, state, county, or municipal law
enforcement officers conducting investigations of violation of federal, state, county, or
municipal law.
565.091. 1. A person commits the offense of harassment in the second degree if he or
she, without good cause, engages in any act with the purpose to cause emotional distress to
another person.
2. The offense of harassment in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor, unless the
[person has previously pleaded guilty to or been found guilty of a violation of this section, of any
offense committed in violation of any county or municipal ordinance in any state, any state law,
any federal law, or any military law which if committed in this state would be chargeable or
indictable as a violation of any offense listed in this subsection, in which case it is a class E
felony] defendant has previously been found guilty of a violation of this section or section
565.090, or of any offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this
state, would be chargeable or indictable as a violation of any offense listed in this section
or section 565.090, in which case harassment in the second degree is a class E felony.
3. This section shall not apply to activities of federal, state, county, or municipal law
enforcement officers conducting investigations of violations of federal, state, county, or
municipal law.
565.225. 1. [As used in this section and section 565.227, the term "disturbs" shall mean
to engage in a course of conduct directed at a specific person that serves no legitimate purpose
and that would cause a reasonable person under the circumstances to be frightened, intimidated,
or emotionally distressed.
2.] A person commits the offense of stalking in the first degree if he or she [purposely]
knowingly, through [his or her] a course of conduct[, disturbs or follows with the intent of
disturbing] that is directed at another person [and] or through technological abuse conduct,
engages in conduct that would cause a reasonable person under similar circumstances to:
(1) [Makes a threat communicated with the intent to cause the person who is the target
of the threat to reasonably] Fear [for his or her safety, the safety of his or her family or

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 84
household member, or the safety of domestic animals or livestock as defined in section 276.606
kept at such person's residence or on such person's property. The threat shall be against the life
of, or a threat to cause physical] death or bodily injury to[, or the kidnapping of] the person[,]
;
(2) Fear that an offense will be committed against a member of the person's family
or household members, or [the person's domestic animals or livestock as defined in section
276.606 kept at such person's residence or on such person's property] an individual with whom
the person has a dating relationship; [or
(2) At least one of the acts constituting the course of conduct is in violation of an order
of protection and the person has received actual notice of such order; or]
(3) [At least one of the actions constituting the course of conduct is in violation of a
condition of probation, parole, pretrial release, or release on bond pending appeal] Fear that an
offense will be committed against the person's property; or
(4) [At any time during the course of conduct, the other person is seventeen years of age
or younger and the person disturbing the other person is twenty-one years of age or older; or
(5) He or she has previously been found guilty of domestic assault, violation of an order
of protection, or any other crime where the other person was the victim; or
(6) At any time during the course of conduct, the other person is a participant of the
address confidentiality program under sections 589.660 to 589.681, and the person disturbing
the other person knowingly accesses or attempts to access the address of the other person] Feel
harassed, terrified, or intimidated.
[3.] 2. Any law enforcement officer may arrest, without a warrant, any person he or she
has probable cause to believe has violated the provisions of this section.
[4.] 3. This section shall not apply to activities of federal, state, county, or municipal law
enforcement officers conducting investigations of any violation of federal, state, county, or
municipal law.
[5.] 4. The offense of stalking in the first degree is a class E felony, unless the defendant
has previously been found guilty of a violation of this section or section 565.227, or any offense
committed in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be chargeable or
indictable as a violation of any offense listed in this section or section 565.227, or unless the
victim is intentionally targeted as a law enforcement officer, as defined in section 556.061, or
the victim is targeted because he or she is a relative within the second degree of consanguinity
or affinity to a law enforcement officer, in which case stalking in the first degree is a class D
felony.
565.227. 1. A person commits the offense of stalking in the second degree if he or she
[purposely, through his or her course of] knowingly engages in a course of conduct[, disturbs,

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 85
or follows with the intent to disturb another person] directed at a specific person or
technological abuse conduct which would cause a reasonable person under the
circumstances to feel harassed, terrified, or intimidated.
2. This section shall not apply to activities of federal, state, county, or municipal law
enforcement officers conducting investigations of any violation of federal, state, county, or
municipal law.
3. Any law enforcement officer may arrest, without a warrant, any person he or she has
probable cause to believe has violated the provisions of this section.
4. The offense of stalking in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor, unless the
defendant has previously been found guilty of a violation of this section or section 565.225, or
of any offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be
chargeable or indictable as a violation of any offense listed in this section or section 565.225,
or unless the victim is intentionally targeted as a law enforcement officer, as defined in section
556.061, or the victim is targeted because he or she is a relative within the second degree of
consanguinity or affinity to a law enforcement officer, in which case stalking in the second
degree is a class E felony.
565.260. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, a person commits the
offense of unlawful tracking of a motor vehicle if the person knowingly installs, conceals,
or otherwise places an electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle without the
consent of all owners of the vehicle for the purpose of monitoring or following an occupant
or occupants of the vehicle. As used in this section, "person" does not include the
manufacturer of the motor vehicle.
2. (1) It shall not be an offense under this section if the installing, concealing, or
placing of an electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by, or at the direction
of, a law enforcement officer in furtherance of a criminal investigation and such
investigation is carried out in accordance with applicable state and federal law.
(2) If the installing, concealing, or placing of an electronic tracking device in or on
a motor vehicle is by, or at the direction of, a parent or legal guardian who owns or leases
the vehicle, and if the device is used solely for the purpose of monitoring the minor child
of the parent or legal guardian when the child is an occupant of the vehicle, the installation,
concealment, or placement of the device in or on the vehicle without the consent of any or
all occupants of the vehicle shall not be an offense under this section.
(3) It shall not be an offense under this section if the installing, concealing, or
placing of an electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is for the purpose of
tracking the location of stolen goods being transported in the vehicle or for the purpose of
tracking the location of the vehicle if the motor vehicle is stolen.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 86
(4) It shall not be an offense under this section if the installing, concealing, or
placing of an electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by a legally authorized
representative of a vulnerable adult. As used in this subdivision, "vulnerable adult" means
any person eighteen years of age or older who is impaired by reason of mental illness,
intellectual or developmental disability, physical illness or disability, or other causes,
including age, to the extent the adult lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make,
communicate, or carry out reasonable decisions concerning his or her well-being or has
one or more limitations that substantially impair the adult's ability to independently
provide for his or her daily needs or safeguard his or her person, property, or legal
interests.
(5) If the installing, concealing, or placing of an electronic tracking device in or on
a motor vehicle is by, or at the direction of, a person who obtains consent from all owners
of the vehicle, the installation, concealment, or placement of the device in or on the vehicle
shall not be an offense under this section.
(6) It shall not be an offense under this section if the installing, concealing, or
placing of an electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by a vehicle rental,
sharing, or leasing company that rents motor vehicles for the purpose of tracking or
managing the motor vehicles owned by such company or providing services to customers.
(7) It shall not be an offense under this section if the installing, concealing, or
placing of an electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by a lienholder or agent
of a lienholder acting to track the movement or location of a motor vehicle in order to
repossess the motor vehicle.
(8) It shall not be an offense under this section if the installing, concealing, or
placing of an electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is for any party to
participate in a voluntary usage-based insurance program. "Voluntary usage-based
insurance program" shall mean any program implemented by, or on behalf of, an
insurance company that collects, records, or transmits information relating to driving
behavior of an insured party.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a tracking system installed by the
manufacturer of a motor vehicle.
4. The offense of unlawful tracking of a motor vehicle is a class A misdemeanor for
a first offense and a class E felony for any second or subsequent offense.
565.400. 1. A person commits the offense of cyberharassment if such person
purposely or knowingly engages in a threatening, aggressive, or otherwise fear-inducing,
course of conduct by using digital technology, internet service providers, electronic service

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 87
providers or other electronic communications and devices to cause reasonable fear, alarm,
anxiety, undue stress, or terror to others by repeated contact with no legitimate purpose.
2. The first offense of cyberharassment shall be a class B misdemeanor. A second
and any subsequent offense shall be a class A misdemeanor.
565.405. 1. A person commits the offense of cyberstalking if such person purposely
or knowingly engages in a threatening, aggressive, or otherwise fear-inducing, course of
conduct by using digital technology, internet service providers, electronic service providers
or other electronic communications and devices to enhance the ability to intimidate, track,
follow or cause reasonable fear, alarm, anxiety, undue stress, or terror to another person.
2. The first offense of cyberstalking shall be a class A misdemeanor. A second and
any subsequent offense shall be a class E felony.
[566.030. 1. A person commits the offense of rape in the first degree
if he or she has sexual intercourse with another person who is incapacitated,
incapable of consent, or lacks the capacity to consent, or by the use of forcible
compulsion. Forcible compulsion includes the use of a substance
administered without a victim's knowledge or consent which renders the
victim physically or mentally impaired so as to be incapable of making an
informed consent to sexual intercourse.
2. The offense of rape in the first degree or an attempt to commit rape
in the first degree is a class A felony for which the authorized term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment or a term of years not less than [five] ten
years, not to exceed thirty years, unless:
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, in which case the
authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment as defined in section
558.011 or [a term of years not less than fifteen years] life imprisonment
without eligibility for probation or parole;
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual offender as defined
in section 566.125 and subjected to an extended term of imprisonment under
said section;
(3) The victim is a child less than twelve years of age, in which case
the required term of imprisonment is life imprisonment as defined in section
558.011 or life imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole [until
the offender has served not less than thirty years of such sentence or unless the
offender has reached the age of seventy-five years and has served at least
fifteen years of such sentence, unless such rape in the first degree is described
under subdivision (4) of this subsection]; or
(4) The victim is a child less than twelve years of age and such rape
in the first degree or attempt to commit rape in the first degree was
outrageously or wantonly vile, horrible or inhumane, in that it involved torture
or depravity of mind, in which case the required term of imprisonment is life
imprisonment without eligibility for probation, parole or conditional release.
3. [Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to the sentence of

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 88
a person who has been found guilty of rape in the first degree or attempt to
commit rape in the first degree when the victim is less than twelve years of
age, and "life imprisonment" shall mean imprisonment for the duration of a
person's natural life for the purposes of this section.
4.] No person found guilty of rape in the first degree or an attempt to
commit rape in the first degree shall be granted a suspended imposition of
sentence or suspended execution of sentence.]
566.030. 1. A person commits the offense of rape in the first degree if he or she has
sexual intercourse with another person who is incapacitated, incapable of consent, or lacks the
capacity to consent, or by the use of forcible compulsion. Forcible compulsion includes the use
of a substance administered without a victim's knowledge or consent which renders the victim
physically or mentally impaired so as to be incapable of making an informed consent to sexual
intercourse.
2. The offense of rape in the first degree or an attempt to commit rape in the first degree
is a class A felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or a term
of years not less than [five] ten years, not to exceed thirty years, unless:
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, in which case the authorized term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment as defined in section 558.011 or [a term of years not less
than fifteen years] life imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole;
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual offender as defined in section 566.125
and subjected to an extended term of imprisonment under said section;
(3) The victim is a child less than twelve years of age, in which case the required term
of imprisonment is life imprisonment as defined in section 558.011 or life imprisonment
without eligibility for probation or parole [until the offender has served not less than thirty years
of such sentence or unless the offender has reached the age of seventy-five years and has served
at least fifteen years of such sentence, unless such rape in the first degree is described under
subdivision (4) of this subsection]; or
(4) The victim is a child less than twelve years of age and such rape in the first degree
or attempt to commit rape in the first degree was outrageously or wantonly vile, horrible or
inhumane, in that it involved torture or depravity of mind, in which case the required term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for probation, parole or conditional release.
3. [Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to the sentence of a person who has
been found guilty of rape in the first degree or attempt to commit rape in the first degree when
the victim is less than twelve years of age, and "life imprisonment" shall mean imprisonment for
the duration of a person's natural life for the purposes of this section.
4.] No person found guilty of rape in the first degree or an attempt to commit rape in the
first degree shall be granted a suspended imposition of sentence or suspended execution of

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 89
sentence.
566.032. 1. A person commits the offense of statutory rape in the first degree if he or
she has sexual intercourse with another person who is less than fourteen years of age.
2. The offense of statutory rape in the first degree or an attempt to commit statutory rape
in the first degree is a felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment
or a term of years not less than [five] ten years, unless:
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, or the victim is less than twelve years
of age in which case the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or a term of years
not less than [ten] fifteen years; or
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual offender as defined in section 566.125
and subjected to an extended term of imprisonment under said section.
[566.060. 1. A person commits the offense of sodomy in the first
degree if he or she has deviate sexual intercourse with another person who is
incapacitated, incapable of consent, or lacks the capacity to consent, or by the
use of forcible compulsion. Forcible compulsion includes the use of a
substance administered without a victim's knowledge or consent which
renders the victim physically or mentally impaired so as to be incapable of
making an informed consent to sexual intercourse.
2. The offense of sodomy in the first degree or an attempt to commit
sodomy in the first degree is a felony for which the authorized term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment or a term of years not less than five years,
unless:
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, in which case the
authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or a term of years not
less than ten years;
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual offender as defined
in section 566.125 and subjected to an extended term of imprisonment under
said section;
(3) The victim is a child less than twelve years of age, in which case
the required term of imprisonment is life imprisonment as defined in section
558.011 or life imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole [until
the offender has served not less than thirty years of such sentence or unless the
offender has reached the age of seventy-five years and has served at least
fifteen years of such sentence, unless such sodomy in the first degree is
described under subdivision (4) of this subsection]; or
(4) The victim is a child less than twelve years of age and such
sodomy in the first degree or attempt to commit sodomy in the first degree
was outrageously or wantonly vile, horrible or inhumane, in that it involved
torture or depravity of mind, in which case the required term of imprisonment
is life imprisonment without eligibility for probation, parole or conditional
release.
3. [Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to the sentence of

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 90
a person who has been found guilty of sodomy in the first degree or an attempt
to commit sodomy in the first degree when the victim is less than twelve years
of age, and "life imprisonment" shall mean imprisonment for the duration of
a person's natural life for the purposes of this section.
4.] No person found guilty of sodomy in the first degree or an attempt
to commit sodomy in the first degree shall be granted a suspended imposition
of sentence or suspended execution of sentence.]
566.060. 1. A person commits the offense of sodomy in the first degree if he or she has
deviate sexual intercourse with another person who is incapacitated, incapable of consent, or
lacks the capacity to consent, or by the use of forcible compulsion. Forcible compulsion
includes the use of a substance administered without a victim's knowledge or consent which
renders the victim physically or mentally impaired so as to be incapable of making an informed
consent to sexual intercourse.
2. The offense of sodomy in the first degree or an attempt to commit sodomy in the first
degree is a felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or a term
of years not less than five years, unless:
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, in which case the authorized term of
imprisonment is life imprisonment or a term of years not less than ten years;
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual offender as defined in section 566.125
and subjected to an extended term of imprisonment under said section;
(3) The victim is a child less than twelve years of age, in which case the required term
of imprisonment is life imprisonment as defined in section 558.011 or life imprisonment
without eligibility for probation or parole [until the offender has served not less than thirty years
of such sentence or unless the offender has reached the age of seventy-five years and has served
at least fifteen years of such sentence, unless such sodomy in the first degree is described under
subdivision (4) of this subsection]; or
(4) The victim is a child less than twelve years of age and such sodomy in the first
degree or attempt to commit sodomy in the first degree was outrageously or wantonly vile,
horrible or inhumane, in that it involved torture or depravity of mind, in which case the required
term of imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for probation, parole or conditional
release.
3. [Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to the sentence of a person who has
been found guilty of sodomy in the first degree or an attempt to commit sodomy in the first
degree when the victim is less than twelve years of age, and "life imprisonment" shall mean
imprisonment for the duration of a person's natural life for the purposes of this section.
4.] No person found guilty of sodomy in the first degree or an attempt to commit sodomy
in the first degree shall be granted a suspended imposition of sentence or suspended execution

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 91
of sentence.
566.103. 1. A person or entity commits the offense of promoting online sexual
solicitation if such person or entity knowingly permits a web-based classified service owned or
operated by such person or entity to be used by individuals to post advertisements promoting
prostitution, enticing a child to engage in sexual conduct, or promoting sexual trafficking of a
child after receiving notice under this section.
2. As used in this section, the term "web-based classified service" means a person or
entity in whose name a specific URL or internet domain name is registered which has
advertisements for goods and services or personal advertisements.
3. An advertisement may be deemed to promote prostitution, entice a child to engage
in sexual conduct, or promote sexual trafficking of a child, if the content of such advertisement
would be interpreted by a reasonable person as offering to exchange sexual conduct for goods
or services in violation of chapter 567, as seeking a child for the purpose of sexual conduct or
commercial sex act, or as offering a child as a participant in sexual conduct or commercial sex
act in violation of section 566.151, 566.210, or 566.211.
4. It shall be prima facie evidence that a person or entity acts knowingly if an
advertisement is not removed from the web-based classified service within seventy-two hours
of that person or entity being notified that an advertisement has been posted on that service
which is prohibited under this section.
5. Notice under this section may be provided by certified mail or facsimile transmission
by the attorney general or any prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney.
6. A violation of this section shall be a class E felony, punishable by imprisonment or
a fine in the amount of five thousand dollars per day that the advertisement remains posted on
the web-based classified service after seventy-two hours of when notice has been provided
pursuant to this section, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
7. Original jurisdiction for prosecution of a violation of this section shall be with the
local prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney.
[566.125. 1. The court shall sentence a person to an extended term of
imprisonment if it finds the defendant is a persistent sexual offender and has
been found guilty of attempting to commit or committing the following
offenses:
(1) Statutory rape in the first degree or statutory sodomy in the first
degree;
(2) Rape in the first degree or sodomy in the first degree;
(3) Forcible rape;
(4) Forcible sodomy;
(5) Rape;
(6) Sodomy.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 92
2. A "persistent sexual offender" is one who has previously been
found guilty of attempting to commit or committing any of the offenses listed
in subsection 1 of this section or one who has previously been found guilty of
an offense in any other jurisdiction which would constitute any of the offenses
listed in subsection 1 of this section.
3. The term of imprisonment for one found to be a persistent sexual
offender shall be imprisonment for life without eligibility for probation or
parole. [Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to any person
imprisoned under this subsection, and] "Imprisonment for life" shall mean
imprisonment for the duration of the person's natural life.
4. The court shall sentence a person to an extended term of
imprisonment as provided for in this section if it finds the defendant is a
predatory sexual offender and has been found guilty of committing or
attempting to commit any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section
or committing child molestation in the first or second degree or sexual abuse
when classified as a class B felony.
5. For purposes of this section, a "predatory sexual offender" is a
person who:
(1) Has previously been found guilty of committing or attempting to
commit any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section, or
committing child molestation in the first or second degree, or sexual abuse
when classified as a class B felony; or
(2) Has previously committed an act which would constitute an
offense listed in subsection 4 of this section, whether or not the act resulted in
a conviction; or
(3) Has committed an act or acts against more than one victim which
would constitute an offense or offenses listed in subsection 4 of this section,
whether or not the defendant was charged with an additional offense or
offenses as a result of such act or acts.
6. A person found to be a predatory sexual offender shall be
imprisoned for life with eligibility for parole[, however subsection 4 of section
558.019 shall not apply to persons found to be predatory sexual offenders for
the purposes of determining the minimum prison term or the length of
sentence as defined or used in such subsection]. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, in no event shall a person found to be a predatory sexual
offender receive a final discharge from parole.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court shall set the
minimum time required to be served before a predatory sexual offender is
eligible for parole, conditional release or other early release by the department
of corrections. The minimum time to be served by a person found to be a
predatory sexual offender who:
(1) Has previously been found guilty of committing or attempting to
commit any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section and is found
guilty of committing or attempting to commit any of the offenses listed in

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 93
subsection 1 of this section shall be any number of years but not less than
thirty years;
(2) Has previously been found guilty of child molestation in the first
or second degree, or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony and is
found guilty of attempting to commit or committing any of the offenses listed
in subsection 1 of this section shall be any number of years but not less than
fifteen years;
(3) Has previously been found guilty of committing or attempting to
commit any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section, or
committing child molestation in the first or second degree, or sexual abuse
when classified as a class B felony shall be any number of years but not less
than fifteen years;
(4) Has previously been found guilty of child molestation in the first
degree or second degree, or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony,
and is found guilty of child molestation in the first or second degree, or sexual
abuse when classified as a class B felony shall be any number of years but not
less than fifteen years;
(5) Is found to be a predatory sexual offender pursuant to subdivision
(2) or (3) of subsection 5 of this section shall be any number of years within
the range to which the person could have been sentenced pursuant to the
applicable law if the person was not found to be a predatory sexual offender.
8. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
department of corrections, or any division thereof, may not furlough an
individual found to be and sentenced as a persistent sexual offender or a
predatory sexual offender.]
566.125. 1. The court shall sentence a person to an extended term of imprisonment if
it finds the defendant is a persistent sexual offender and has been found guilty of attempting to
commit or committing the following offenses:
(1) Statutory rape in the first degree or statutory sodomy in the first degree;
(2) Rape in the first degree or sodomy in the first degree;
(3) Forcible rape;
(4) Forcible sodomy;
(5) Rape;
(6) Sodomy.
2. A "persistent sexual offender" is one who has previously been found guilty of
attempting to commit or committing any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section or
one who has previously been found guilty of an offense in any other jurisdiction which would
constitute any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section.
3. The term of imprisonment for one found to be a persistent sexual offender shall be
imprisonment for life without eligibility for probation or parole. [Subsection 4 of section

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 94
558.019 shall not apply to any person imprisoned under this subsection, and] "Imprisonment for
life" shall mean imprisonment for the duration of the person's natural life.
4. The court shall sentence a person to an extended term of imprisonment as provided
for in this section if it finds the defendant is a predatory sexual offender and has been found
guilty of committing or attempting to commit any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this
section or committing child molestation in the first or second degree or sexual abuse when
classified as a class B felony.
5. For purposes of this section, a "predatory sexual offender" is a person who:
(1) Has previously been found guilty of committing or attempting to commit any of the
offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section, or committing child molestation in the first or
second degree, or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony; or
(2) Has previously committed an act which would constitute an offense listed in
subsection 4 of this section, whether or not the act resulted in a conviction; or
(3) Has committed an act or acts against more than one victim which would constitute
an offense or offenses listed in subsection 4 of this section, whether or not the defendant was
charged with an additional offense or offenses as a result of such act or acts.
6. A person found to be a predatory sexual offender shall be imprisoned for life with
eligibility for parole[, however subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to persons found
to be predatory sexual offenders for the purposes of determining the minimum prison term or
the length of sentence as defined or used in such subsection]. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, in no event shall a person found to be a predatory sexual offender receive a
final discharge from parole.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court shall set the minimum time
required to be served before a predatory sexual offender is eligible for parole, conditional release
or other early release by the department of corrections. The minimum time to be served by a
person found to be a predatory sexual offender who:
(1) Has previously been found guilty of committing or attempting to commit any of the
offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section and is found guilty of committing or attempting to
commit any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section shall be any number of years but
not less than thirty years;
(2) Has previously been found guilty of child molestation in the first or second degree,
or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony and is found guilty of attempting to commit
or committing any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section shall be any number of
years but not less than fifteen years;
(3) Has previously been found guilty of committing or attempting to commit any of the
offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section, or committing child molestation in the first or

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 95
second degree, or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony shall be any number of years
but not less than fifteen years;
(4) Has previously been found guilty of child molestation in the first degree or second
degree, or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony, and is found guilty of child
molestation in the first or second degree, or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony
shall be any number of years but not less than fifteen years;
(5) Is found to be a predatory sexual offender pursuant to subdivision (2) or (3) of
subsection 5 of this section shall be any number of years within the range to which the person
could have been sentenced pursuant to the applicable law if the person was not found to be a
predatory sexual offender.
8. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the department of corrections,
or any division thereof, may not furlough an individual found to be and sentenced as a persistent
sexual offender or a predatory sexual offender.
566.203. 1. A person commits the offense of abusing an individual through forced labor
by knowingly providing or obtaining the labor or services of a person:
(1) By causing or threatening to cause serious physical injury to any person;
(2) By physically restraining or threatening to physically restrain another person;
(3) By blackmail;
(4) By means of any scheme, plan, or pattern of behavior intended to cause such person
to believe that, if the person does not perform the labor services, the person or another person
will suffer serious physical injury, physical restraint, or financial harm; or
(5) By means of the abuse or threatened abuse of the law or the legal process.
2. A person who is found guilty of the crime of abuse through forced labor shall not be
required to register as a sexual offender pursuant to the provisions of section 589.400, unless
such person is otherwise required to register pursuant to the provisions of such section.
3. The offense of abuse through forced labor is a felony punishable by imprisonment for
a term of years not less than five years and not more than twenty years and a fine not to exceed
two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
4. If death results from a violation of this section, or if the violation includes kidnapping
or an attempt to kidnap, sexual abuse when punishable as a class B felony, or an attempt to
commit sexual abuse when punishable as a class B felony, or an attempt to kill, it shall be
punishable for a term of years not less than [five] ten years or life and a fine not to exceed two
hundred fifty thousand dollars.
566.209. 1. A person commits the [crime] offense of trafficking for the purposes of
sexual exploitation if a person knowingly recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides,
advertises the availability of or obtains by any means, including but not limited to through the

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 96
use of force, intoxicating or inhibiting substances, abduction, coercion, fraud, deception,
blackmail, or causing or threatening to cause financial harm, another person for the use or
employment of such person in a commercial sex act, sexual conduct, a sexual performance, or
the production of explicit sexual material as defined in section 573.010, without his or her
consent, or benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value, from participation in such
activities.
2. The [crime] offense of trafficking for the purposes of sexual exploitation is a felony
punishable by imprisonment for a term of years not less than five years and not more than twenty
years and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars. If a violation of this section
was effected by force, abduction, or coercion, the crime of trafficking for the purposes of sexual
exploitation is a felony punishable by imprisonment for a term of years not less than ten years
or life and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
[566.210. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual trafficking of a
child in the first degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any
means, including but not limited to through the use of force, abduction,
coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail, or causing or threatening to cause
financial harm, a person under the age of fourteen to participate in a
commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
material as defined in section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving
anything of value, from participation in such activities;
(2) Causes a person under the age of fourteen to engage in a
commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
material as defined in section 573.010; or
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the age of fourteen
to participate in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production
of explicit sexual material as defined in section 573.010.
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant believed that the person
was fourteen years of age or older.
3. The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree is a
felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment
without eligibility for probation or parole until the offender has served not less
than thirty years of such sentence. [Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not
apply to the sentence of a person who has been found guilty of sexual
trafficking of a child less than fourteen years of age, and "life imprisonment"
shall mean imprisonment for the duration of a person's natural life for the
purposes of this section.]]
566.210. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the first
degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, including

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 97
but not limited to through the use of force, abduction, coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail, or
causing or threatening to cause financial harm, a person under the age of fourteen to participate
in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as
defined in section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value, from
participation in such activities;
(2) Causes a person under the age of fourteen to engage in a commercial sex act, a
sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as defined in section 573.010;
or
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the age of fourteen to participate in a
commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as
defined in section 573.010.
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant believed that the person was fourteen years
of age or older.
3. The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree is a felony for which the
authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole
until the offender has served not less than thirty years of such sentence. [Subsection 4 of section
558.019 shall not apply to the sentence of a person who has been found guilty of sexual
trafficking of a child less than fourteen years of age, and "life imprisonment" shall mean
imprisonment for the duration of a person's natural life for the purposes of this section.]
[566.211. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual trafficking of a
child in the second degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any
means, including but not limited to through the use of force, abduction,
coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail, or causing or threatening to cause
financial harm, a person under the age of eighteen to participate in a
commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
material as defined in section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving
anything of value, from participation in such activities;
(2) Causes a person under the age of eighteen to engage in a
commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
material as defined in section 573.010; or
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the age of eighteen
to participate in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production
of explicit sexual material as defined in section 573.010.
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant believed that the person
was eighteen years of age or older.
3. The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree is
a felony punishable by imprisonment for a term of years not less than twenty
years or life and a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars if the
child is under the age of eighteen. If a violation of this section was effected

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 98
by force, abduction, or coercion, the [crime] offense of sexual trafficking of
a child shall be a felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life
imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole until the defendant
has served [not less than twenty-five years] eighty-five percent of such
sentence as provided under section 558.011.]
566.211. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the second
degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, including
but not limited to through the use of force, abduction, coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail, or
causing or threatening to cause financial harm, a person under the age of eighteen to participate
in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as
defined in section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value, from
participation in such activities;
(2) Causes a person under the age of eighteen to engage in a commercial sex act, a
sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as defined in section 573.010;
or
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the age of eighteen to participate in a
commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as
defined in section 573.010.
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant believed that the person was eighteen years
of age or older.
3. The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree is a felony punishable
by imprisonment for a term of years not less than twenty years or life and a fine not to exceed
two hundred fifty thousand dollars if the child is under the age of eighteen. If a violation of this
section was effected by force, abduction, or coercion, the [crime] offense of sexual trafficking
of a child shall be a felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment
without eligibility for probation or parole until the defendant has served [not less than twenty-
five years] eighty-five percent of such sentence as provided under section 558.011.
568.045. 1. A person commits the offense of endangering the welfare of a child in the
first degree if he or she:
(1) Knowingly acts in a manner that creates a substantial risk to the life, body, or health
of a child less than [seventeen] eighteen years of age;
(2) Knowingly engages in sexual conduct with a person under the age of eighteen years
over whom the person is a parent, guardian, or otherwise charged with the care and custody;
(3) Knowingly encourages, aids or causes a child less than [seventeen] eighteen years
of age to engage in any conduct which violates the provisions of chapter 571 or 579; or
(4) In the presence of a child less than [seventeen] eighteen years of age or in a

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 99
residence where a child less than [seventeen] eighteen years of age resides, unlawfully
manufactures or attempts to manufacture compounds, possesses, produces, prepares, sells,
transports, tests or analyzes any of the following: fentanyl, carfentanil, amphetamine, or
methamphetamine, or any analogue thereof.
2. The offense of endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree is a class D felony
unless the offense:
(1) Is committed as part of an act or series of acts performed by two or more persons as
part of an established or prescribed pattern of activity, or where physical injury to the child
results, or the offense is a second or subsequent offense under this section, in which case the
offense is a class C felony;
(2) Involves fentanyl or carfentanil, or any analogue thereof, in which case:
(a) The offense is a class B felony; and
(b) A person sentenced under this subdivision shall not be eligible for conditional release
or parole until he or she has served at least five years of imprisonment;
(3) Results in serious physical injury to the child, in which case the offense is a class B
felony; or
(4) Results in the death of a child, in which case the offense is a class A felony.
[568.060. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or mental injury against
a child by any person eighteen years of age or older. For purposes of this
section, abuse shall not include injury inflicted on a child by accidental means
by a person with care, custody, or control of the child, or discipline of a child
by a person with care, custody, or control of the child, including spanking, in
a reasonable manner;
(2) "Abusive head trauma", a serious physical injury to the head or
brain caused by any means, including but not limited to shaking, jerking,
pushing, pulling, slamming, hitting, or kicking;
(3) "Mental injury", an injury to the intellectual or psychological
capacity or the emotional condition of a child as evidenced by an observable
and substantial impairment of the ability of the child to function within his or
her normal range of performance or behavior;
(4) "Neglect", the failure to provide, by those responsible for the care,
custody, and control of a child under the age of eighteen years, the care
reasonable and necessary to maintain the physical and mental health of the
child, when such failure presents a substantial probability that death or
physical injury or sexual injury would result;
(5) "Physical injury", physical pain, illness, or any impairment of
physical condition, including but not limited to bruising, lacerations,
hematomas, welts, or permanent or temporary disfigurement and impairment
of any bodily function or organ;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 100
(6) "Serious emotional injury", an injury that creates a substantial risk
of temporary or permanent medical or psychological damage, manifested by
impairment of a behavioral, cognitive, or physical condition. Serious
emotional injury shall be established by testimony of qualified experts upon
the reasonable expectation of probable harm to a reasonable degree of medical
or psychological certainty;
(7) "Serious physical injury", a physical injury that creates a
substantial risk of death or that causes serious disfigurement or protracted loss
or impairment of the function of any part of the body.
2. A person commits the offense of abuse or neglect of a child if such
person knowingly causes a child who is less than eighteen years of age:
(1) To suffer physical or mental injury as a result of abuse or neglect;
or
(2) To be placed in a situation in which the child may suffer physical
or mental injury as the result of abuse or neglect.
3. A person commits the offense of abuse or neglect of a child if such
person recklessly causes a child who is less than eighteen years of age to
suffer from abusive head trauma.
4. A person does not commit the offense of abuse or neglect of a child
by virtue of the sole fact that the person delivers or allows the delivery of a
child to a provider of emergency services.
5. (1) A person does not commit the offense of abuse or neglect of a
child by virtue of the sole fact that the person allows the child to engage in
independent activities without adult supervision and the person is a parent to
the child or is responsible for the child's care, provided that the:
(a) Independent activities are appropriate based on the child's age,
maturity, and physical and mental abilities; and
(b) Lack of adult supervision does not constitute conduct that is so
grossly negligent as to endanger the health or safety of the child.
(2) As used in this subsection, "independent activities" shall include
traveling to or from school or nearby locations by bicycle or on foot, playing
outdoors, or remaining at home for a reasonable period of time without adult
supervision.
6. The offense of abuse or neglect of a child is:
(1) A class D felony[, without eligibility for probation, parole, or
conditional release until the defendant has served no less than one year of such
sentence], unless the person has previously been found guilty of a violation of
this section or of a violation of the law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct or the injury inflicted on the child is a serious
emotional injury or a serious physical injury, in which case abuse or neglect
of a child is a class B felony, without eligibility for probation or parole until
the defendant has served not less than five years of such sentence; or
(2) A class A felony if the child dies as a result of injuries sustained
from conduct chargeable under the provisions of this section.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 101
7. Notwithstanding subsection 6 of this section to the contrary, the
offense of abuse or neglect of a child is a class A felony, without eligibility for
probation, parole, or conditional release until the defendant has served not less
than fifteen years of such sentence, if:
(1) The injury is a serious emotional injury or a serious physical
injury;
(2) The child is less than fourteen years of age; and
(3) The injury is the result of sexual abuse or sexual abuse in the first
degree as defined under section 566.100 or sexual exploitation of a minor as
defined under section 573.023.
8. The circuit or prosecuting attorney may refer a person who is
suspected of abuse or neglect of a child to an appropriate public or private
agency for treatment or counseling so long as the agency has consented to
taking such referrals. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the discretion of
the circuit or prosecuting attorney to prosecute a person who has been referred
for treatment or counseling pursuant to this subsection.
9. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the requirement
that every element of any crime referred to herein must be proven beyond a
reasonable doubt.
10. Discipline, including spanking administered in a reasonable
manner, shall not be construed to be abuse under this section.]
568.060. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or mental injury against a child by any
person eighteen years of age or older. For purposes of this section, abuse shall not include injury
inflicted on a child by accidental means by a person with care, custody, or control of the child,
or discipline of a child by a person with care, custody, or control of the child, including
spanking, in a reasonable manner;
(2) "Abusive head trauma", a serious physical injury to the head or brain caused by any
means, including but not limited to shaking, jerking, pushing, pulling, slamming, hitting, or
kicking;
(3) "Mental injury", an injury to the intellectual or psychological capacity or the
emotional condition of a child as evidenced by an observable and substantial impairment of the
ability of the child to function within his or her normal range of performance or behavior;
(4) "Neglect", the failure to provide, by those responsible for the care, custody, and
control of a child under the age of eighteen years, the care reasonable and necessary to maintain
the physical and mental health of the child, when such failure presents a substantial probability
that death or physical injury or sexual injury would result;
(5) "Physical injury", physical pain, illness, or any impairment of physical condition,
including but not limited to bruising, lacerations, hematomas, welts, or permanent or temporary

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 102
disfigurement and impairment of any bodily function or organ;
(6) "Serious emotional injury", an injury that creates a substantial risk of temporary or
permanent medical or psychological damage, manifested by impairment of a behavioral,
cognitive, or physical condition. Serious emotional injury shall be established by testimony of
qualified experts upon the reasonable expectation of probable harm to a reasonable degree of
medical or psychological certainty;
(7) "Serious physical injury", a physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or
that causes serious disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any part of
the body.
2. A person commits the offense of abuse or neglect of a child if such person knowingly
causes a child who is less than eighteen years of age:
(1) To suffer physical or mental injury as a result of abuse or neglect; or
(2) To be placed in a situation in which the child may suffer physical or mental injury
as the result of abuse or neglect.
3. A person commits the offense of abuse or neglect of a child if such person recklessly
causes a child who is less than eighteen years of age to suffer from abusive head trauma.
4. A person does not commit the offense of abuse or neglect of a child by virtue of the
sole fact that the person delivers or allows the delivery of a child to a provider of emergency
services.
5. (1) A person does not commit the offense of abuse or neglect of a child by virtue of
the sole fact that the person allows the child to engage in independent activities without adult
supervision and the person is a parent to the child or is responsible for the child's care, provided
that the:
(a) Independent activities are appropriate based on the child's age, maturity, and physical
and mental abilities; and
(b) Lack of adult supervision does not constitute conduct that is so grossly negligent as
to endanger the health or safety of the child.
(2) As used in this subsection, "independent activities" shall include traveling to or from
school or nearby locations by bicycle or on foot, playing outdoors, or remaining at home for a
reasonable period of time without adult supervision.
6. The offense of abuse or neglect of a child is:
(1) A class D felony[, without eligibility for probation, parole, or conditional release
until the defendant has served no less than one year of such sentence], unless the person has
previously been found guilty of a violation of this section or of a violation of the law of any
other jurisdiction that prohibits the same or similar conduct or the injury inflicted on the child
is a serious emotional injury or a serious physical injury, in which case abuse or neglect of a

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 103
child is a class B felony, without eligibility for probation or parole until the defendant has served
not less than five years of such sentence; or
(2) A class A felony if the child dies as a result of injuries sustained from conduct
chargeable under the provisions of this section.
7. Notwithstanding subsection 6 of this section to the contrary, the offense of abuse or
neglect of a child is a class A felony, without eligibility for probation, parole, or conditional
release until the defendant has served not less than fifteen years of such sentence, if:
(1) The injury is a serious emotional injury or a serious physical injury;
(2) The child is less than fourteen years of age; and
(3) The injury is the result of sexual abuse or sexual abuse in the first degree as defined
under section 566.100 or sexual exploitation of a minor as defined under section 573.023.
8. The circuit or prosecuting attorney may refer a person who is suspected of abuse or
neglect of a child to an appropriate public or private agency for treatment or counseling so long
as the agency has consented to taking such referrals. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the
discretion of the circuit or prosecuting attorney to prosecute a person who has been referred for
treatment or counseling pursuant to this subsection.
9. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the requirement that every element
of any crime referred to herein must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt.
10. Discipline, including spanking administered in a reasonable manner, shall not be
construed to be abuse under this section.
573.570. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Depicted individual", an individual who, as a result of digitization or by means
of digital manipulation, appears in whole or in part in an intimate digital depiction and
who is identifiable by virtue of the individual's face, likeness, or other distinguishing
characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other recognizable feature, or from
information displayed in connection with the digital depiction;
(2) "Digital depiction", a realistic visual depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation;
(3) "Information content providers", any person or entity that is responsible, in
whole or in part, for the creation or development of information provided through the
internet or any other interactive computer service;
(4) "Intimate digital depiction", a digital depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation and that depicts:
(a) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple of an
identifiable individual;
(b) The display or transfer of bodily sexual fluids:

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 104
a. Onto any part of the body of an identifiable individual; or
b. From the body of an identifiable individual; or
(c) An identifiable individual engaging in sexually explicit conduct;
(5) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-
anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person.
2. A person commits the offense of disclosure of an intimate digital depiction if the
person:
(1) Discloses an intimate digital depiction:
(a) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm, or cause substantial harm to
the finances or reputation of the depicted individual; or
(b) With the actual knowledge that, or reckless disregard for whether, such
disclosure will cause physical, emotional, reputational, or economic harm to the depicted
individual; or
(2) Threatens to disclose an intimate digital depiction:
(a) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm, or cause substantial harm to
the finances or reputation of the depicted individual; or
(b) With the actual knowledge that, or reckless disregard for whether, such
threatened disclosure will cause physical, emotional, reputational, or economic harm to the
depicted individual.
3. (1) A violation of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section shall be a class
D felony.
(2) A violation of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section shall be a class E
felony.
(3) A violation of subsection 2 of this section shall be a class C felony if:
(a) The violation is a second or other subsequent violation of subsection 2 of this
section; or
(b) The violation is such that the digital depiction could be reasonably expected to:
a. Affect the conduct of any administrative, legislative, or judicial proceeding of a
federal, state, local, or tribal government agency, including the administration of an
election or the conduct of foreign relations; or
b. Facilitate violence.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 105
4. It shall not be a defense to an offense of disclosure of an intimate digital depiction
under this section that there is a disclaimer stating that the intimate digital depiction of the
depicted individual was unauthorized or that the depicted individual did not participate
in the creation or development of the digital depiction.
5. For the purposes of this section, a provider of an interactive computer service
shall not be held to have committed the offense of disclosure of an intimate digital
depiction due to:
(1) Any action voluntarily taken in good faith to restrict access to or availability of
intimate digital depictions; or
(2) Any action taken to enable or make available to information content providers
or other persons the technical means to restrict access to intimate digital depictions.
573.575. 1. A person commits the offense of sadistic online exploitation if he or she:
(1) Uses the internet to manipulate, intimidate, hurt, scare, control, or threaten a
victim to undergo suffering through forcing their submission, use of violence, self-harm,
or destruction for sadistic or sinister purposes;
(2) Coerces a victim into performing self-harm, animal harm, harming another
person, sharing personal information, or suicidal actions or ideations;
(3) Uses non-physical forms of coercion, manipulation, shame or fear to extort
another person into providing sexually explicit content then using such content to further
extort, threaten, or control the victim; or
(4) Uses intimate depictions as devices to threaten or coerce a victim by demanding
any kind of financial gain.
2. The offense of sadistic online exploitation shall be a class E felony.
577.800. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful use of unmanned aircraft over
an open-air facility or critical infrastructure facility if he or she purposely:
(1) Operates an unmanned aircraft within a vertical distance of four hundred feet from
the ground and within the property line of an open-air facility; [or]
(2) Uses an unmanned aircraft with the purpose of delivering to a person within an open-
air facility any object described in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 4 of this section;
(3) Uses an unmanned aircraft within the boundary of any critical infrastructure
facility; or
(4) Operates an unmanned aircraft within a vertical distance of four hundred feet
from the ground and within the property line of a critical infrastructure facility in
furtherance of any violation of criminal law.
2. For purposes of this section, "open-air facility" shall mean any sports, theater, music,
performing arts, or other entertainment facility with a capacity of five [thousand] hundred

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 106
people or more and not completely enclosed by a roof or other structure. For purposes of this
section, "critical infrastructure facility" shall have the same meaning as section 569.086.
3. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit the operation of an unmanned aircraft
by:
(1) An employee, owner, or operator of an open-air facility [at the direction of the
president or chief executive officer of the open-air facility] or critical infrastructure facility
for the purpose of monitoring, inspecting, operating, or maintaining the facility;
(2) A person who has written consent from the president or chief executive officer of
the open-air facility or critical infrastructure facility;
(3) An employee of a law enforcement agency, fire department, or emergency medical
service in the exercise of official duties;
(4) A government official or employee in the exercise of official duties;
(5) A public utility or a rural electric cooperative if:
(a) The unmanned aircraft is used for the purpose of inspecting, repairing, or
maintaining utility transmission or distribution lines or other utility equipment or infrastructure;
(b) The utility or cooperative notifies the open-air facility or critical infrastructure
facility before flying the unmanned aircraft, except during an emergency; and
(c) The person operating the unmanned aircraft does not physically enter the prohibited
space without an escort provided by the open-air facility or critical infrastructure facility; or
(6) An employee of a railroad in the exercise of official duties on any land owned or
operated by a railroad corporation regulated by the Federal Railroad Administration.
4. The offense of unlawful use of unmanned aircraft over an open-air facility or critical
infrastructure facility shall be punishable as an infraction unless the person uses an unmanned
aircraft for:
(1) Delivering a gun, knife, weapon, or other article, including any explosive device
or material, that may be used in such manner to endanger the life of an employee or guest at
an open-air facility or critical infrastructure facility, in which case the offense is a class B
felony; or
(2) Delivering a controlled substance, as that term is defined under section 195.010, in
which case the offense is a class D felony.
5. Each open-air facility or critical infrastructure facility shall post a sign warning of
the provisions of this section. The sign shall be at least eleven inches by fourteen inches and
posted in a conspicuous place.
6. This section shall not apply to an operator of an unmanned aircraft that is being
used for a commercial purpose that is otherwise operating lawfully, provided the operator
is authorized by the Federal Aviation Administration to conduct lawful operations in that

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 107
airspace.
[589.400. 1. Sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall apply to:
(1) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter
adjudicated for an offense referenced in section 589.414, unless such person
is exempt from registering under subsection 9 or 10 of this section or section
589.401;
(2) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter
convicted of, been found guilty of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to
committing, attempting to commit, or conspiring to commit one or more of the
following offenses: kidnapping or kidnapping in the first degree when the
victim was a child and the defendant was not a parent or guardian of the child;
abuse of a child under section 568.060 when such abuse is sexual in nature;
felonious restraint or kidnapping in the second degree when the victim was a
child and the defendant is not a parent or guardian of the child; sexual contact
or sexual intercourse with a resident of a nursing home or sexual conduct with
a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first or second degree;
endangering the welfare of a child under section 568.045 when the
endangerment is sexual in nature; genital mutilation of a female child, under
section 568.065; promoting prostitution in the first degree; promoting
prostitution in the second degree; promoting prostitution in the third degree;
sexual exploitation of a minor; promoting child pornography in the first
degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026; promoting child sexual abuse
material in the first degree; promoting child pornography in the second
degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026; promoting child sexual abuse
material in the second degree; possession of child pornography as it existed
prior to August 28, 2026; possession of child sexual abuse material;
furnishing pornographic material to minors; public display of explicit sexual
material; coercing acceptance of obscene material; promoting obscenity in the
first degree; promoting pornography for minors or obscenity in the second
degree; incest; use of a child in a sexual performance; or promoting sexual
performance by a child; patronizing prostitution if the individual the person
patronizes is less than eighteen years of age; grooming of a minor;
nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images; or threatening the
nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images;
(3) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been committed to the
department of mental health as a criminal sexual psychopath;
(4) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been found not guilty as
a result of mental disease or defect of any offense referenced in section
589.414;
(5) Any juvenile certified as an adult and transferred to a court of
general jurisdiction who has been adjudicated for an offense listed under
section 589.414;
(6) Any juvenile fourteen years of age or older at the time of the
offense who has been adjudicated for an offense which is equal to or more

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 108
severe than aggravated sexual abuse under 18 U.S.C. Section 2241, which
shall include any attempt or conspiracy to commit such offense;
(7) Any person who is a resident of this state who has, since July 1,
1979, been or is hereafter adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District
of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military
jurisdiction for an offense which, if committed in this state, would constitute
an offense listed under section 589.414, or has been or is required to register
in another state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has
been or is required to register under tribal, federal, or military law; or
(8) Any person who has been or is required to register in another state,
territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is
required to register under tribal, federal, or military law and who works or
attends an educational institution, whether public or private in nature,
including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or
institution of higher education on a full-time or on a part-time basis or has a
temporary residence in Missouri. "Part-time" in this subdivision means for
more than seven days in any twelve-month period.
2. Any person to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply shall,
within three business days of adjudication, release from incarceration, or
placement upon probation, register with the chief law enforcement official of
the county or city not within a county in which such person resides unless
such person has already registered in that county for the same offense. For
any juvenile under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of this section, within three
business days of adjudication or release from commitment to the division of
youth services, the department of mental health, or other placement, such
juvenile shall register with the chief law enforcement official of the county or
city not within a county in which he or she resides unless he or she has already
registered in such county or city not within a county for the same offense.
Any person to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply if not currently
registered in their county of residence shall register with the chief law
enforcement official of such county or city not within a county within three
business days. The chief law enforcement official shall forward a copy of the
registration form required by section 589.407 to a city, town, village, or
campus law enforcement agency located within the county of the chief law
enforcement official.
3. The registration requirements of sections 589.400 through 589.425
shall be as provided under subsection 4 of this section unless:
(1) All offenses requiring registration are reversed, vacated, or set
aside;
(2) The registrant is no longer required to register and his or her name
shall be removed from the registry under the provisions of section 589.414;
or
(3) The court orders the removal or exemption of such person from the
registry under section 589.401.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 109
4. The registration requirements shall be as follows:
(1) Fifteen years if the offender is a tier I sex offender as provided
under section 589.414;
(2) Twenty-five years if the offender is a tier II sex offender as
provided under section 589.414; or
(3) The life of the offender if the offender is a tier III sex offender.
5. (1) The registration period shall be reduced as described in
subdivision (3) of this subsection for a sex offender who maintains a clean
record for the periods described under subdivision (2) of this subsection by:
(a) Not being adjudicated of any offense for which imprisonment for
more than one year may be imposed;
(b) Not being adjudicated of any sex offense;
100 (c) Successfully completing any periods of supervised release,
101 probation, or parole; and
102 (d) Successfully completing an appropriate sex offender treatment
103 program certified by the attorney general.
104 (2) In the case of a:
105 (a) Tier I sex offender, the period during which the clean record shall
106 be maintained is ten years;
107 (b) Tier III sex offender adjudicated delinquent for the offense which
108 required registration in a sex offender registry under sections 589.400 to
109 589.425, the period during which the clean record shall be maintained is
110 twenty-five years.
111 (3) In the case of a:
112 (a) Tier I sex offender, the reduction is five years;
113 (b) Tier III sex offender adjudicated delinquent, the reduction is from
114 life to that period for which the clean record under paragraph (b) of
115 subdivision (2) of this subsection is maintained.
116 6. For processing an initial sex offender registration the chief law
117 enforcement officer of the county or city not within a county may charge the
118 offender registering a fee of up to ten dollars.
119 7. For processing any change in registration required pursuant to
120 section 589.414 the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not
121 within a county may charge the person changing their registration a fee of five
122 dollars for each change made after the initial registration.
123 8. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who
124 otherwise would be required to register for being adjudicated for the offense
125 of felonious restraint of a nonsexual nature when the victim was a child and
126 he or she was the parent or guardian of the child, nonsexual child abuse that
127 was committed under section 568.060, or kidnapping of a nonsexual nature
128 when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the
129 child shall be removed from the registry. However, such person shall remain
130 on the sexual offender registry for any other offense for which he or she is
131 required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 110
132 9. The following persons shall be exempt from registering as a sexual
133 offender upon petition to the court of jurisdiction under section 589.401;
134 except that, such person shall remain on the sexual offender registry for any
135 other offense for which he or she is required to register under sections 589.400
136 to 589.425:
137 (1) Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who
138 otherwise would be required to register for a sexual offense involving:
139 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed
140 toward the victim or any other individual involved, if the victim was an adult,
141 unless the adult was under the custodial authority of the offender at the time
142 of the offense; or
143 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed
144 toward the victim, the victim was at least fourteen years of age, and the
145 offender was not more than four years older than the victim at the time of the
146 offense; or
147 (2) Any person currently required to register for the following sexual
148 offenses:
149 (a) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under section 573.020;
150 (b) Promoting obscenity in the second degree under section 573.030;
151 (c) Furnishing pornographic materials to minors under section
152 573.040;
153 (d) Public display of explicit sexual material under section 573.060;
154 (e) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065;
155 (f) Trafficking for the purpose of slavery, involuntary servitude,
156 peonage, or forced labor under section 566.206;
157 (g) Abusing an individual through forced labor under section 566.203;
158 (h) Contributing to human trafficking through the misuse of
159 documentation under section 566.215; or
160 (i) Acting as an international marriage broker and failing to provide
161 the information and notice as required under section 578.475.
162 10. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry for having
163 been adjudicated for a tier I or II offense or adjudicated delinquent for a tier
164 III offense or other comparable offenses listed under section 589.414 may file
165 a petition under section 589.401.
166 11. Any nonresident worker, including work as a volunteer or intern,
167 or nonresident student shall register for the duration of such person's
168 employment, including participation as a volunteer or intern, or attendance at
169 any school of higher education whether public or private, including any
170 secondary school, trade school, professional school, or institution of higher
171 education on a full-time or part-time basis in this state unless granted relief
172 under section 589.401. Any registered offender shall provide information
173 regarding any place in which the offender is staying when away from his or
174 her residence for seven or more days, including the period of time the offender
175 is staying in such place. Any registered offender from another state who has

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 111
176 a temporary residence in this state and resides more than seven days in a
177 twelve-month period shall register for the duration of such person's temporary
178 residency unless granted relief under section 589.401.]
589.400. 1. Unless exempt from registering under section 589.401, sections 589.400
to 589.425 shall apply to:
(1) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter adjudicated for an
offense [referenced in section 589.414, unless such person is exempt from registering under
subsection 9 or 10 of this section or section 589.401] that would classify the person as a tier
I offender, tier II offender, or tier III offender in this state;
(2) [Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter convicted of, been
found guilty of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to committing, attempting to commit, or
conspiring to commit one or more of the following offenses: kidnapping or kidnapping in the
first degree when the victim was a child and the defendant was not a parent or guardian of the
child; abuse of a child under section 568.060 when such abuse is sexual in nature; felonious
restraint or kidnapping in the second degree when the victim was a child and the defendant is
not a parent or guardian of the child; sexual contact or sexual intercourse with a resident of a
nursing home or sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
or second degree; endangering the welfare of a child under section 568.045 when the
endangerment is sexual in nature; genital mutilation of a female child, under section 568.065;
promoting prostitution in the first degree; promoting prostitution in the second degree;
promoting prostitution in the third degree; sexual exploitation of a minor; promoting child
pornography in the first degree; promoting child pornography in the second degree; possession
of child pornography; furnishing pornographic material to minors; public display of explicit
sexual material; coercing acceptance of obscene material; promoting obscenity in the first
degree; promoting pornography for minors or obscenity in the second degree; incest; use of a
child in a sexual performance; or promoting sexual performance by a child; patronizing
prostitution if the individual the person patronizes is less than eighteen years of age;
(3)] Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been committed to the department of
mental health as a criminal sexual psychopath;
[(4)] (3) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been found not guilty as a result of
mental disease or defect of any offense [referenced in section 589.414] that would classify the
person as a tier I offender, tier II offender, or tier III offender;
[(5)] (4) Any juvenile certified as an adult and transferred to a court of general
jurisdiction who has been adjudicated for an offense [listed under section 589.414] that would
classify the juvenile as a tier I offender, tier II offender, or tier III offender;
[(6)] (5) Any juvenile fourteen years of age or older at the time of the offense who has

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 112
been adjudicated for an offense which is equal to or more severe than aggravated sexual abuse
under 18 U.S.C. Section 2241, which shall include any attempt or conspiracy to commit such
offense. Juveniles registering under this subdivision shall be assigned a tier under the
provisions of section 589.414 and eligible for removal when meeting all other qualifications
in sections 589.400 to 589.425. The tier assignment under section 589.414 shall be only for
the purposes of registration visit frequency and removal eligibility and shall not otherwise
affect the analysis of whether registration is required under this section;
[(7)] (6) Any person who is a resident of this state who has, since July 1, 1979, been or
is hereafter adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country,
or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense which, if committed in this state,
would constitute an offense [listed under section 589.414] that would classify the person as
a tier I offender, tier II offender, or tier III offender, or has been or is required to register in
another state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is required
to register under tribal, federal, or military law. Persons registering under this subdivision
shall be assigned a tier under the provisions of section 589.414 and eligible for removal
when meeting all other qualifications in sections 589.400 to 589.425. The tier assignment
under section 589.414 shall be only for the purposes of registration visit frequency and
removal eligibility and shall not otherwise affect the analysis of whether registration is
required under this section; or
[(8)] (7) Any person who has been or is required to register in another state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is required to register under tribal,
federal, or military law and who works or attends an educational institution, whether public or
private in nature, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or
institution of higher education on a full-time or on a part-time basis or has a temporary residence
in Missouri. ["Part-time" in this subdivision means for more than seven days in any twelve-
month period.] Persons registering under this subdivision shall be assigned a tier under the
provisions of section 589.414 and eligible for removal when meeting all other qualifications
in sections 589.400 to 589.425. The tier assignment under section 589.414 shall be only for
the purposes of registration visit frequency and removal eligibility and shall not otherwise
affect the analysis of whether registration is required under this section.
2. Any person or juvenile to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply shall, within three
business days of adjudication, release from incarceration, [or] placement upon probation, release
from commitment to the division of youth services, release from the department of mental
health, or release from other placement, register with the [chief law enforcement]
registration official of the county or city not within a county in which such person or juvenile
resides unless such person has already registered in that county for the same offense. [For any

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 113
juvenile under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of this section, within three business days of
adjudication or release from commitment to the division of youth services, the department of
mental health, or other placement, such juvenile shall register with the chief law enforcement
official of the county or city not within a county in which he or she resides unless he or she has
already registered in such county or city not within a county for the same offense.] Any person
or juvenile to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply if not currently registered in their county
of residence shall register with the [chief law enforcement] registration official [of such county
or city not within a county] within three business days. The [chief law enforcement]
registration official shall forward a copy of the registration form required by section 589.407
to a city, town, village, or campus law enforcement agency located within the county of the
[chief law enforcement] registration official.
3. [The registration requirements of sections 589.400 through 589.425 shall be as
provided under subsection 4 of this section unless:
(1) All offenses requiring registration are reversed, vacated, or set aside;
(2) The registrant is no longer required to register and his or her name shall be removed
from the registry under the provisions of section 589.414; or
(3) The court orders the removal or exemption of such person from the registry under
section 589.401.
4.] The registration requirements shall be as follows:
(1) Fifteen years if the offender is a tier I [sex] offender [as provided under section
589.414];
(2) Twenty-five years if the offender is a tier II [sex] offender [as provided under section
589.414]; or
(3) The life of the offender if the offender is a tier III [sex] offender.
[5.] 4. (1) The registration period shall be reduced as described in subdivision (3) of this
subsection for a sex offender who maintains a clean record for the periods described under
subdivision (2) of this subsection by:
(a) Not being adjudicated of any offense for which imprisonment for more than one year
may be imposed;
(b) Not being adjudicated of any sex offense;
100 (c) Successfully completing any periods of supervised release, probation, or parole; and
101 (d) Successfully completing an appropriate sex offender treatment program certified by
102 a jurisdiction or the attorney general, regardless of whether such program was court
103 ordered or voluntary. If records of program completion are unavailable and completion
104 of such program was required as a term of probation, an order discharging the offender
105 from probation or other record acknowledging satisfactory completion of probation shall

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 114
106 constitute prima facie evidence that the offender successfully completed the necessary sex
107 offender treatment program unless rebutted by evidence to the contrary.
108 (2) In the case of a:
109 (a) Tier I [sex] offender, the period during which the clean record shall be maintained
110 is ten years;
111 (b) Tier III [sex] offender adjudicated delinquent for the offense which required
112 registration in a sex offender registry under sections 589.400 to 589.425, the period during
113 which the clean record shall be maintained is twenty-five years.
114 (3) In the case of a:
115 (a) Tier I [sex] offender, the reduction is five years;
116 (b) Tier III [sex] offender adjudicated delinquent, the reduction is from life to that period
117 for which the clean record under paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of this subsection is
118 maintained.
119 [6.] 5. For processing an initial sex offender registration, the [chief law enforcement
120 officer of the county or city not within a county] registration official may charge the offender
121 registering a fee of up to ten dollars.
122 [7.] 6. For processing any change in registration required pursuant to section 589.414,
123 the [chief law enforcement] registration official [of the county or city not within a county] may
124 charge the person changing their registration a fee of five dollars for each change made after the
125 initial registration.
126 [8. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who otherwise would be
127 required to register for being adjudicated for the offense of felonious restraint of a nonsexual
128 nature when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the child,
129 nonsexual child abuse that was committed under section 568.060, or kidnapping of a nonsexual
130 nature when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the child shall
131 be removed from the registry. However, such person shall remain on the sexual offender
132 registry for any other offense for which he or she is required to register under sections 589.400
133 to 589.425.
134 9. The following persons shall be exempt from registering as a sexual offender upon
135 petition to the court of jurisdiction under section 589.401; except that, such person shall remain
136 on the sexual offender registry for any other offense for which he or she is required to register
137 under sections 589.400 to 589.425:
138 (1) Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who otherwise would be
139 required to register for a sexual offense involving:
140 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim or
141 any other individual involved, if the victim was an adult, unless the adult was under the custodial

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 115
142 authority of the offender at the time of the offense; or
143 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim, the
144 victim was at least fourteen years of age, and the offender was not more than four years older
145 than the victim at the time of the offense; or
146 (2) Any person currently required to register for the following sexual offenses:
147 (a) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under section 573.020;
148 (b) Promoting obscenity in the second degree under section 573.030;
149 (c) Furnishing pornographic materials to minors under section 573.040;
150 (d) Public display of explicit sexual material under section 573.060;
151 (e) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065;
152 (f) Trafficking for the purpose of slavery, involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced labor
153 under section 566.206;
154 (g) Abusing an individual through forced labor under section 566.203;
155 (h) Contributing to human trafficking through the misuse of documentation under
156 section 566.215; or
157 (i) Acting as an international marriage broker and failing to provide the information and
158 notice as required under section 578.475.
159 10. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry for having been adjudicated for
160 a tier I or II offense or adjudicated delinquent for a tier III offense or other comparable offenses
161 listed under section 589.414 may file a petition under section 589.401.]
162 7. Any person with a primary residence outside this state who has a temporary
163 residence in this state in which he or she resides for more than a part-time period shall
164 register with the registration official in the jurisdiction of the temporary residence in
165 accordance with this section for the duration of such person's temporary residency.
166 [11.] 8. Any [nonresident worker] person who is not a resident of this state and not
167 currently registered due to temporary residence under subsection 7 of this section and who
168 works, including work as a volunteer or intern, or is a nonresident student shall register for the
169 duration of such person's employment, including participation as a volunteer or intern, or
170 attendance at any school of higher education, whether public or private, including any secondary
171 school, trade school, professional school, or institution of higher education on a full-time or part-
172 time basis [in this state unless granted relief under section 589.401. Any registered offender
173 shall provide information regarding any place in which the offender is staying when away from
174 his or her residence for seven or more days, including the period of time the offender is staying
175 in such place. Any registered offender from another state who has a temporary residence in this
176 state and resides more than seven days in a twelve-month period shall register for the duration
177 of such person's temporary residency unless granted relief under section 589.401], as long as

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 116
178 the status requiring registration remains active. Such registration shall occur in the county
179 or city not within a county where the status requiring registration occurs. If more than one
180 county or city not within a county meets the requirement, priority shall be in the following
181 order:
182 (1) The county of work;
183 (2) The county of school; and
184 (3) The county of volunteering or any other required status;
185
186 with registration being required at only the highest priority county or city not within a
187 county where the registerable status remains.
589.401. 1. A person on the sexual offender registry of this state may file a petition in
the division of the circuit court in the county or city not within a county in which the offense
requiring registration was [committed] adjudicated to have his or her name exempted or
removed from the sexual offender registry in accordance with this section.
2. (1) A person who is required to register in this state because of an offense that was
adjudicated in another jurisdiction shall file his or her petition for removal, termination, or
relief from registration, or the declaratory judgment providing for removal, termination,
or relief from registration according to the laws of the state, federal, territory, tribal, or
military jurisdiction, the District of Columbia, or foreign country in which his or her offense was
adjudicated. Upon [the grant of the petition for removal in the] entry of a judgment by a court
of competent jurisdiction [where the offense was adjudicated] providing that the person is no
longer required to register as a sex offender under the laws of the adjudicating jurisdiction,
such judgment may be registered in this state by sending the information required under
subsection 5 of this section as well as one authenticated copy of the order granting removal from
the sexual offender registry in the jurisdiction where the offense was adjudicated to the court in
the county or city not within a county in which the offender is required to register. On receipt
of a request for registration removal, the registering court shall cause the order to be filed as a
foreign judgment, together with one copy of the documents and information, regardless of their
form. The petitioner shall be responsible for costs associated with filing the petition. Nothing
in this subdivision shall be construed to remove any requirements for a petition under this
section or to remove the requirement that a person prove he or she is entitled to removal
under Missouri law, when applicable.
(2) A person required to register as an offender in this state based solely on an
offense adjudicated in another jurisdiction may file a petition for removal from this state's
sexual offender registry, provided that:
(a) The offense did not require the person to register as an offender in the

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 117
adjudicating jurisdiction at the time the offense was adjudicated; or
(b) The person never resided, worked, or attended school in the adjudicating
jurisdiction and was never required to register in the adjudicating jurisdiction.
(3) A petition filed under subdivision (2) of this subsection shall otherwise satisfy
the requirements applicable to a petition filed under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. A person required to register as a tier III offender shall not file a petition under this
section unless the requirement to register results from a juvenile adjudication.
4. The petition shall be dismissed without prejudice if the following time periods have
not elapsed since the date the person was required to register for his or her most recent offense
under sections 589.400 to 589.425:
(1) For a tier I offense, ten years;
(2) For a tier II offense, twenty-five years; or
(3) For a tier III offense adjudicated delinquent, twenty-five years.
5. The petition shall be dismissed without prejudice if it fails to include any of the
following:
(1) The petitioner's:
(a) Full name, including any alias used by the [individual] petitioner;
(b) Sex;
(c) Race;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) Last four digits of the Social Security number;
(f) Address; and
(g) Place of employment, school, or volunteer status;
(2) The offense and tier of the offense that required the petitioner to register;
(3) The date the petitioner was adjudicated for the offense;
(4) The date the petitioner was required to register;
(5) The case number and court, including the county or city not within a county, that
entered the original order for the adjudicated sex offense;
(6) Petitioner's original fingerprints on an applicant fingerprint card;
(7) If the petitioner was pardoned or an offense requiring registration was reversed,
vacated, or set aside, an authenticated copy of the order; and
(8) If the petitioner is currently registered under applicable law and has not been
adjudicated for failure to register in any jurisdiction and does not have any charges pending for
failure to register.
6. The petition shall name as respondents the Missouri state highway patrol and the
[chief law enforcement] registration official in the county or city not within a county in which

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 118
the petition is filed.
7. All proceedings under this section shall be governed under the Missouri supreme
court rules of civil procedure.
8. The person seeking removal or exemption from the registry shall provide the
prosecuting attorney in the circuit court in which the petition is filed with notice of the petition.
The prosecuting attorney may present evidence in opposition to the requested relief or may
otherwise demonstrate the reasons why the petition should be denied. Failure of the person
seeking removal or exemption from the registry to notify the prosecuting attorney of the petition
shall result in an automatic denial of such person's petition.
9. The Missouri state highway patrol, the prosecuting attorney in the circuit court in
which the petition is filed, and the petitioner shall have access to all applicable records
concerning the petitioner including, but not limited to, criminal history records, mental health
records, juvenile records, and records of the department of corrections or probation and parole.
10. The prosecuting attorney shall make reasonable efforts to notify the victim of the
crime for which the person was required to register of the petition and the dates and times of any
hearings or other proceedings in connection with such petition.
11. The court shall not enter an order directing the removal of the petitioner's name from
the sexual offender registry unless it finds the petitioner:
(1) Has not been adjudicated or does not have charges pending for any additional
nonsexual offense for which imprisonment for more than one year may be imposed since the
date the offender was required to register for his or her current tier level;
(2) Has not been adjudicated or does not have charges pending for any additional sex
offense that would require registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 since the date the
offender was required to register for his or her current tier level, even if the offense was
punishable by less than one year imprisonment;
(3) Has successfully completed any required periods of supervised release, probation,
or parole without revocation since the date the offender was required to register for his or her
current tier level, or, in the case of lifetime supervision or probation, such term has been
reduced or terminated by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(4) Has successfully completed an appropriate sex offender treatment program as
approved by a court of competent jurisdiction or the Missouri department of corrections; and
(5) Is not a current or potential threat to public safety.
12. In order to meet the criteria required by subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection 11 of
this section, the fingerprints filed in the case shall be examined by the Missouri state highway
patrol. The petitioner shall be responsible for all costs associated with the fingerprint-based
criminal history check of both state and federal files under section 43.530.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 119
13. If the petition is denied due to an adjudication in violation of subdivision (1) or (2)
100 of subsection 11 of this section, the petitioner shall not file a new petition under this section
101 until:
102 (1) Fifteen years have passed from the date of the adjudication resulting in the denial of
103 relief if the petitioner is classified as a tier I offender;
104 (2) Twenty-five years have passed from the date of adjudication resulting in the denial
105 of relief if the petitioner is classified as a tier II offender; or
106 (3) Twenty-five years have passed from the date of the adjudication resulting in the
107 denial of relief if the petitioner is classified as a tier III offender on the basis of a juvenile
108 adjudication.
109 14. If the petition is denied due to the petitioner having charges pending in violation of
110 subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 11 of this section, the petitioner shall not file a new petition
111 under this section until:
112 (1) The pending charges resulting in the denial of relief have been finally disposed of
113 in a manner other than adjudication; or
114 (2) If the pending charges result in an adjudication, the necessary time period has
115 elapsed under subsection 13 of this section.
116 15. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, if the petition is
117 denied for reasons other than those outlined in subsection 11 of this section, no successive
118 petition requesting such relief shall be filed for at least five years from the date the judgment
119 denying relief is entered.
120 (2) If the denial was based on a statute or law that has since been amended,
121 repealed, or invalidated, a person may file a new petition within the five-year period. In
122 addition to the requirements under subsection 5 of this section, the new petition shall
123 include the case number and court of the prior petition and identify the applicable change
124 in the statute or law.
125 16. If the court finds the petitioner is entitled to have his or her name removed from the
126 sexual offender registry, the court shall enter judgment directing the removal of the name. A
127 copy of the judgment shall be provided to the respondents named in the petition.
128 17. Any person subject to the judgment requiring his or her name to be removed from
129 the sexual offender registry is not required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 unless
130 such person is required to register for an offense that was different from that listed on the
131 judgment of removal.
132 18. The court shall not deny the petition unless the petition failed to comply with the
133 provisions of sections 589.400 to 589.425 or the prosecuting attorney provided evidence
134 demonstrating the petition should be denied.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 120
135 19. (1) The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 of this section shall not apply to
136 persons filing for exemption pursuant to this subsection.
137 (2) Except as provided in this subsection, a petition for exemption shall be governed
138 by the other requirements provided in this section.
139 (3) A petition for exemption under this subsection shall be the exclusive remedy for
140 adjudicating the applicability of the exemptions in this subsection.
141 (4) A person shall be ordered exempt from registration if the person meets the
142 requirements of this section and the offense requiring registration is:
143 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim,
144 the victim was at least fourteen years of age, and the person was not more than four years
145 older than the victim at the time of the offense, unless the victim was under the custodial
146 authority of the offender at the time of the offense;
147 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim
148 or any other individual involved if the victim or other individual was eighteen years of age
149 or older, unless the victim was under the custodial authority of the offender at the time of
150 the offense;
151 (c) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under section 573.020;
152 (d) Promoting obscenity in the second degree under section 573.030;
153 (e) Furnishing pornographic materials to minors under section 573.040;
154 (f) Public display of explicit sexual material under section 573.060; or
155 (g) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065.
156 (5) The person shall have the burden of proving the person meets the requirements
157 for exemption. In determining whether the person meets the requirements, a court may
158 look beyond the offense of conviction and consider the underlying facts and conduct of the
159 offense when evaluating noncategorical exemptions.
160 (6) If a court determines a person to be exempt, the provisions of sections 589.400
161 to 589.425 shall not apply for the purposes of the exempt offense. In the event a person
162 currently registering is found to be exempt from the registration visit requirements, the
163 person shall also be removed from the sexual offender registry.
164 (7) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a person from remaining or being
165 placed on the sexual offender registry for any other nonexempt offense for which the
166 person is required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425.
167 (8) If a petition for exemption is filed before a person is required to register under
168 sections 589.400 to 589.425, the requirements of sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall be
169 automatically stayed pending the outcome. In the event a petition is denied, the
170 requirements of sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall be in effect three business days following

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 121
171 the exhaustion of all appeal rights. Nothing in this subdivision shall alter or be construed
172 to give any court authority to alter ongoing requirements for persons whose initial
173 registration requirement begins prior to the filing of a petition for exemption until a final
174 order of exemption is entered.
175 20. The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 of this section shall not apply to persons
176 filing for removal if the offense requiring registration is reversed, vacated, or set aside. A
177 petition for removal due to the offense being reversed, vacated, or set aside shall be filed
178 in accordance with all other requirements of this section and shall be the exclusive remedy
179 for removal in such situations. Such petition shall include a certified copy of the action
180 reversing, vacating, or setting aside the offense requiring registration.
181 21. This section shall be the sole remedy for removal or exemption for persons
182 adjudicated of a registerable offense. No declaratory action shall be filed for relief from
183 registration requirements, except if registration, or threat thereof, is the result of an
184 offense never requiring registration. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
185 prohibit the filing of a declaratory action solely on the issue of what tier an offender should
186 be classified under.
187 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person convicted of an offense
188 that requires him or her to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall change his or
189 her legal name for the period of time he or she is required to register. To the extent the
190 person has a prior legal name that was utilized on or after the date of conviction for any
191 offense requiring registration, such name shall be reported under this section as an alias.
589.403. 1. Any person who is required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425
and who is paroled, discharged, or otherwise released from any correctional facility of the
department of corrections, any mental health institution, private jail under section 221.095, or
other private facility recognized by or contracted with the department of corrections or
department of mental health where such person was confined shall:
(1) If the person plans to reside in this state, be informed by the official in charge of such
correctional facility, private jail, or mental health institution of the person's possible duty to
register pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425. If such person is required to register pursuant
to sections 589.400 to 589.425, the official in charge of the correctional facility, private jail, or
the mental health institution shall complete the initial registration notification at least seven days
prior to release and [forward] report the offender's initial registration[,] notification in
accordance with subsection 1 of section 589.410 within three business days of release[,] to the
Missouri state highway patrol and the [chief law enforcement] registration official of the county
or city not within a county where the person expects to reside upon discharge, parole, or release;
or

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 122
(2) If the person does not reside or plan to reside in Missouri, be informed by the official
in charge of such correctional facility, private jail, or mental health institution of the person's
possible duty to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425. If such person is required to register
under sections 589.400 to 589.425, the official in charge of the correctional facility, private jail,
or [the] mental health institution shall complete the initial registration notification at least seven
days prior to release and [forward] report the offender's initial registration[,] notification in
accordance with subsection 1 of section 589.410 within three business days of release[,] to the
Missouri state highway patrol and the [chief law enforcement] registration official [within] of
the county or city not within a county where the correctional facility, private jail, or mental
health institution is located.
2. If the offender refuses to complete and sign the registration information as outlined
in this section or fails to register with the [chief law enforcement] registration official within
three business days as directed, the offender commits the offense of failure to register under
section 589.425 within the jurisdiction where the correctional facility, private jail, or mental
health institution is located.
589.404. As used in sections 589.400 to 589.425, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adjudicated" or "adjudication", adjudication of delinquency, a finding of guilt, plea
of guilt, finding of not guilty due to mental disease or defect, or plea of nolo contendere to
committing, attempting to commit, or conspiring to commit. Adjudication does not require
the imposition of sentence for the purposes of sections 589.400 to 589.425. The term
"adjudication" shall include by reference all acts meeting the definition of "conviction"
under Section 111 of the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the
Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
(2) "Adjudicated delinquent", a person found to have committed an offense that, if
committed by an adult, would be a criminal offense;
(3) "Chief law enforcement official", the sheriff's office of each county or the police
department of a city not within a county;
(4) "Electronic mail", the transmission of information or communication by the
use of the internet, a computer, a facsimile machine, a pager, a cellular telephone or other
wireless communication device, a video recorder, or other electronic means sent to a
person identified by a unique address or address number and received by that person;
(5) "Entity", a business or organization that provides internet service, electronic
communications service, remote computing service, online service, electronic mail service,
or electronic instant message or chat services regardless of whether the business or
organization is within or outside this state;
(6) "Instant message", a form of real-time text communication between two or

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 123
more people. The communication is conveyed via computers connected over a network
such as the internet, or between cell phone or wireless communication device users, or over
a cell phone or wireless communication device network;
(7) "Offender registration", the required minimum informational content of sex offender
registries, which shall consist of, but not be limited to, a full set of fingerprints on a standard sex
offender registration card upon initial registration in Missouri, as well as all other forms and in
whatever manner required by the Missouri state highway patrol upon each initial and
subsequent registration;
(8) "Online identifier", includes all of the following: electronic mail address,
instant message screen name, user ID, cell phone number or wireless communication
device number or identifier, chat or other internet communication name, social media
profiles, IP addresses, or other identity information specified on the registration form by
the Missouri state highway patrol;
(9) "Part-time", more than seven days in any twelve-month period;
(10) "Probation officer", includes any agent of a private entity assigned to provide
probation supervision services to an offender due to the offender's status as a sexual
offender who is required to register pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425;
(11) "Registration official", the chief law enforcement official for the county or city
not within a county in which the offender is required to register;
[(5)] (12) "Residence", [any place where an offender sleeps for seven or more
consecutive or nonconsecutive days or nights within a twelve-month period] the domicile of the
offender;
[(6)] (13) "Sex offender", any person who meets the criteria to register under sections
589.400 to 589.425 or under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the
Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
(14) "Sex offender registry", a system maintained by the Missouri state highway
patrol to collect, store, and disseminate all initial notification information, registration
information, offender status, and all other information required under sections 589.400 to
589.425. The sex offender registry is a distinct system from the website maintained by the
Missouri state highway patrol, which displays a distinct set of information contained within
the sex offender registry publicly on the web in accordance with this section;
[(7)] (15) "Sex offense", any offense [which] that is listed [under section 589.414 or
comparable to those listed under section 589.414 or otherwise] as a tier I offense, tier II
offense, or tier III offense, that is comparable to offenses listed as a tier I offense, tier II
offense, or tier III offense, or that is otherwise comparable to offenses covered under the Sex
Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 124
Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
[(8)] (16) "Sexual act", any type or degree of genital, oral, or anal penetration;
[(9)] (17) "Sexual conduct", sexual intercourse, deviate sexual intercourse, or sexual
contact;
[(10)] (18) "Sexual contact", any touching of another person with the genitals or any
touching of the genitals or anus of another person, or the breast of a female person, or such
touching through the clothing, or causing semen, seminal fluid, or other ejaculate to come into
contact with another person, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any
person or for the purpose of terrorizing the victim;
[(11)] (19) "Sexual element", used for the purposes of distinguishing if sexual contact
or a sexual act was committed. Authorities shall refer to information filed by the prosecutor,
amended information filed by the prosecutor, indictment information filed by the prosecutor, or
amended indictment information filed by the prosecutor, the plea agreement, or court
documentation to determine if a sexual element exists;
[(12)] (20) "Signature", the name of the offender signed in writing or electronic form
approved by the Missouri state highway patrol;
[(13)] (21) "Student", an individual who enrolls in or attends the physical location of an
educational institution, including a public or private secondary school, trade or professional
school, or an institution of higher education;
(22) "Temporary residence", any place where a person sleeps for seven or more
consecutive or nonconsecutive days or nights within a twelve-month period, other than the
person's domicile;
(23) "Tier I offender":
(a) An individual who has been adjudicated for a tier I offense; or
(b) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction
for an offense comparable to a tier I offense or that meets the definition of a tier I offense
under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child
Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
(24) "Tier II offender":
(a) An individual who has been adjudicated for a tier II offense; or
(b) Any offender who is adjudicated for an offense comparable to a tier I offense
or failure to register offense under section 589.425 or comparable out-of-state failure to
register offense and who is already required to register as a tier I offender due to having
been adjudicated of a tier I offense on a previous occasion; or
(c) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 125
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction
for an offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to a tier II
offense or that meets the definition of a tier II offense under the Sex Offender Registration
and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006,
P.L. 109-248, as amended;
(25) "Tier III offender":
100 (a) An individual who has been adjudicated for a tier III offense;
101 (b) Any offender registered as a predatory sexual offender or a persistent sexual
102 offender, as the terms "predatory sexual offender" and "persistent sexual offender" are
103 defined in section 566.125;
104 (c) Any offender who is adjudicated for an offense comparable to a tier I offense
105 or tier II offense or failure to register offense under section 589.425, or other comparable
106 out-of-state failure to register offense, who has been or is already required to register as
107 a tier II offender because of having been adjudicated for a tier II offense, two tier I
108 offenses, or a combination of a tier I offense and a failure to register offense, on a previous
109 occasion;
110 (d) Any offender who is adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of
111 Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an
112 offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to a tier III offense
113 or that meets the definition of a tier III offense under the Sex Offender Registration and
114 Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L.
115 109-248, as amended; or
116 (e) Any offender who is adjudicated in this state for any offense of a sexual nature
117 or with a sexual element requiring registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 that is
118 not classified as a tier I offense or tier II offense in this section;
119 (26) "Tier I offense", the following adjudicated offenses:
120 (a) Kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110 with sexual motivation if
121 the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
122 (b) Kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120 with sexual motivation
123 if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
124 (c) Kidnapping in the third degree under section 565.130 with sexual motivation
125 if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
126 (d) Invasion of privacy under section 565.252 if the victim is less than eighteen
127 years of age;
128 (e) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068 as it existed prior
129 to January 1, 2017, if the punishment is less than one year;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 126
130 (f) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first offense
131 and the punishment is less than one year;
132 (g) Sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.093;
133 (h) Sexual misconduct in the second degree under section 566.095;
134 (i) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is eighteen
135 years of age or older;
136 (j) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the punishment is less
137 than a year;
138 (k) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
139 (l) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
140 degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is less than one year;
141 (m) Sexual conduct under section 566.116 with a nursing facility resident or
142 vulnerable person;
143 (n) Sexual conduct in the course of public duty under section 566.145 if the victim
144 is eighteen years of age or older;
145 (o) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
146 victim is eighteen years of age or older;
147 (p) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under section 573.020 if the victim is less
148 than eighteen years of age;
149 (q) Promoting pornography for minors or obscenity in the second degree under
150 section 573.030 if the victim is less than eighteen years of age;
151 (r) Possession of child pornography under section 573.037 as it existed prior to
152 August 28, 2026;
153 (s) Possession of child sexual abuse material under section 573.037;
154 (t) Furnishing pornographic material to minors under section 573.040;
155 (u) Public display of explicit sexual material under section 573.060 if the victim is
156 less than eighteen years of age; or
157 (v) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065 if the victim is
158 less than eighteen years of age;
159 (27) "Tier II offense", the following adjudicated offenses:
160 (a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under section 566.064 if the victim is
161 sixteen to seventeen years of age;
162 (b) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is
163 between thirteen and fourteen years of age;
164 (c) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
165 thirteen to seventeen years of age;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 127
166 (d) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first offense
167 and the penalty is a term of imprisonment of one year or more;
168 (e) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is thirteen to
169 seventeen years of age;
170 (f) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is thirteen
171 to seventeen years of age;
172 (g) Sexual conduct in the course of public duty under section 566.145 if the victim
173 is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
174 (h) Grooming or enticement of a minor under section 566.151;
175 (i) Age misrepresentation with intent to solicit a minor under section 566.153;
176 (j) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if the person patronized is
177 eighteen years of age or older;
178 (k) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under section 567.050 if the victim
179 is eighteen years of age or older;
180 (l) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under section 567.060 if the victim
181 is eighteen years of age or older;
182 (m) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under section 567.070 if the victim
183 is eighteen years of age or older;
184 (n) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and
185 the victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
186 (o) Sexual exploitation of a minor under section 573.023;
187 (p) Promoting child pornography in the first degree under section 573.025 as it
188 existed prior to August 28, 2026;
189 (q) Promoting child sexual abuse material in the first degree under section 573.025;
190 (r) Promoting child pornography in the second degree under section 573.035 as it
191 existed prior to August 28, 2026;
192 (s) Promoting child sexual abuse material in the second degree under section
193 573.035;
194 (t) Nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images under section 573.110 if
195 the victim is seventeen years of age or under or if coercion of the victim was sexual in
196 nature; or
197 (u) Threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images under
198 section 573.112 if the victim is seventeen years of age or under or if coercion of the victim
199 was sexual in nature;
200 (28) "Tier III offense", the following adjudicated offenses:
201 (a) Kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110 if the victim is under

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 128
202 eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian of a nonsexual nature;
203 (b) Kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120 if the victim is under
204 eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian of a nonsexual nature;
205 (c) Kidnapping in the third degree under section 565.130 if the victim is under
206 eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian of a nonsexual nature;
207 (d) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
208 (e) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
209 (f) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
210 (g) Statutory rape in the first degree under section 566.032;
211 (h) Statutory rape in the second degree under section 566.034;
212 (i) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
213 (j) Sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061;
214 (k) Statutory sodomy in the first degree under section 566.062;
215 (l) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under section 566.064 if the victim is
216 under sixteen years of age;
217 (m) Child molestation in the first degree under section 566.067;
218 (n) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068;
219 (o) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is
220 under thirteen years of age;
221 (p) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
222 under thirteen years of age;
223 (q) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if the offense is a
224 second or subsequent offense;
225 (r) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is under
226 thirteen years of age;
227 (s) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is under
228 thirteen years of age;
229 (t) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the penalty is a term
230 of imprisonment of one year or more;
231 (u) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
232 degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is one year or more;
233 (v) Sexual conduct in the course of public duty under section 566.145 if the victim
234 is under thirteen years of age;
235 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
236 victim is under eighteen years of age;
237 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree under section 566.210;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 129
238 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree under section 566.211;
239 (z) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if the offender is a persistent
240 offender or if the person patronized is less than eighteen years of age;
241 (aa) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under section 567.050 if the victim
242 is under eighteen years of age;
243 (bb) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under section 567.060 if the victim
244 is under eighteen years of age;
245 (cc) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under section 567.070 if the victim
246 is under eighteen years of age;
247 (dd) Promoting travel for prostitution under section 567.085 if the victim is under
248 eighteen years of age;
249 (ee) Incest under section 568.020;
250 (ff) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 if
251 the offense is sexual in nature or if the offense involves sexual intercourse or deviate sexual
252 intercourse with a victim under eighteen years of age;
253 (gg) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and
254 the victim is under thirteen years of age;
255 (hh) Genital mutilation of a female child under section 568.065;
256 (ii) Use of a child in a sexual performance under section 573.200; or
257 (jj) Promoting a sexual performance by a child under section 573.205;
258 [(14)] (29) "Vehicle", any land vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft.
589.405. 1. Any person who is required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425
and who is released on probation, discharged upon payment of a fine, or released after
confinement in a county jail shall, prior to such release or discharge and at the time of
adjudication, be informed of the possible duty to register pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425
by the court having jurisdiction over the case. If such person is required to register pursuant to
sections 589.400 to 589.425 and is placed on probation, the court shall make it a condition of
probation that the offender report within three business days to the [chief law enforcement]
registration official of the county of adjudication or city not within a county of adjudication to
complete initial registration. If such offender is not placed on probation, the court shall:
(1) If the offender resides in Missouri, complete the initial notification of duty to register
form approved by the state judicial records committee and the Missouri state highway patrol and
forward the form within three business days to the Missouri state highway patrol and the [chief
law enforcement] registration official in the county or city not within a county in which the
offender resides; or
(2) If the offender does not reside in Missouri:

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 130
(a) Order the offender to report directly to the [chief law enforcement] registration
official in the county or city not within a county where the adjudication was heard to register as
provided in sections 589.400 to 589.425; and
(b) Complete the initial notification of duty to register form approved by the state
judicial records committee and the Missouri state highway patrol and forward the form within
three business days to the Missouri state highway patrol and the [chief law enforcement]
registration official in the county or city not within a county where the offender was
adjudicated.
2. If the offender resides in Missouri and refuses to complete and sign the registration
information as provided in subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section, or if the offender
resides outside of Missouri and refuses to directly report to the [chief law enforcement]
registration official as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section, the offender
commits the offense of failure to register under section 589.425.
[589.407. 1. Any registration pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425
shall consist of completion of an offender registration form developed by the
Missouri state highway patrol or other format approved by the Missouri state
highway patrol. Such form shall consist of a statement, including the
signature of the offender, and shall include, but is not limited to, the
following:
(1) A statement in writing signed by the person, giving the name,
address, date of birth, biological sex, as defined in section 191.1720, Social
Security number, and phone number of the person, the license plate number
and vehicle description, including the year, make, model, and color of each
vehicle owned or operated by the offender, any online identifiers[, as defined
in section 43.651,] used by the person, the place of employment of such
person, enrollment within any institutions of higher education, the crime
which requires registration, whether the person was sentenced as a persistent
or predatory offender pursuant to section 566.125, the date, place, and a brief
description of such crime, the date and place of the conviction or plea
regarding such crime, the age and gender of the victim at the time of the
offense and whether the person successfully completed the Missouri sexual
offender program pursuant to section 589.040, if applicable;
(2) The fingerprints and palm prints of the person;
(3) Unless the offender's appearance has not changed significantly, a
photograph of such offender as follows:
(a) Quarterly if a tier III sex offender [under section 589.414]. Such
photograph shall be taken every ninety days beginning in the month of the
person's birth;
(b) Semiannually if a tier II sex offender. Such photograph shall be
taken in the month of the person's birth and six months thereafter; and
(c) Yearly if a tier I sex offender. Such photograph shall be taken in

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 131
the month of the person's birth; [and]
(4) A DNA sample from the individual, if a sample has not already
been obtained; and
(5) Information regarding any temporary residence where the
offender is staying away from his or her primary residence for seven or
more days, including the period of time the offender is staying in such
place, regardless of whether the temporary residence is in Missouri or
any other place.
2. The offender shall provide positive identification and
documentation to substantiate the accuracy of the information completed on
the offender registration form, including but not limited to the following:
(1) A photocopy of a valid driver's license or nondriver's identification
card;
(2) A document verifying proof of the offender's residency; and
(3) A photocopy of the vehicle registration for each of the offender's
vehicles.
3. The Missouri state highway patrol shall maintain all required
registration information in digitized form.
4. [Upon receipt of any changes to an offender's registration
information contained in this section, the Missouri state highway patrol shall
immediately notify all other jurisdictions in which the offender is either
registered or required to register.
5.] The offender shall be responsible for reviewing his or her existing
registration information for accuracy at every regular in-person appearance
and, if any inaccuracies are found, provide proof of the information in
question.
5. (1) Regular in-person appearances to the registration official
following initial registration shall be required:
(a) Annually for tier I offenders;
(b) Every six months for tier II offenders; and
(c) Every ninety days for tier III offenders.
(2) For the purposes of establishing a schedule for registration
appearances, the registration official shall ensure that the required
registration interval is followed from the date of any initial registration
until the month of an offender's birth and at the appropriate interval
beginning from the month of the offender's birth thereafter.
6. The signed offender registration form shall serve as proof that the
individual understands his or her duty to register as a sexual offender under
sections 589.400 to 589.425 and a statement to this effect shall be included on
the form that the individual is required to sign at each registration.
7. If an offender has a guardian appointed by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the guardian may sign affirming the accuracy of
the offender registration form under this section. Nothing in this
subsection shall alleviate the requirements of the offender to appear in

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 132
person, nor shall this subsection be construed to affect any restrictions
applicable to an offender because of the offender's status on the sexual
offender registry.
8. Notwithstanding subsection 1 of section 527.270, no person
required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall change his or
her name for the period of time he or she is required to be placed on the
registry.]
589.407. 1. Any registration pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall consist of
completion of an offender registration form developed by the Missouri state highway patrol or
other format approved by the Missouri state highway patrol. Such form shall consist of a
statement, including the signature of the offender, and shall include, but is not limited to, the
following:
(1) A statement in writing signed by the person, giving the name, address, date of birth,
biological sex, as designated on the birth certificate, Social Security number, and phone
number of the person, the license plate number and vehicle description, including the year,
make, model, and color of each vehicle owned or operated by the offender, any online
identifiers[, as defined in section 43.651,] used by the person, the place of employment of such
person, enrollment within any institutions of higher education, the crime which requires
registration, whether the person was sentenced as a persistent or predatory offender pursuant to
section 566.125, the date, place, and a brief description of such crime, the date and place of the
conviction or plea regarding such crime, the age and gender of the victim at the time of the
offense and whether the person successfully completed the Missouri sexual offender program
pursuant to section 589.040, if applicable;
(2) The fingerprints and palm prints of the person;
(3) Unless the offender's appearance has not changed significantly, a photograph of such
offender as follows:
(a) Quarterly if a tier III sex offender [under section 589.414]. Such photograph shall
be taken every ninety days beginning in the month of the person's birth;
(b) Semiannually if a tier II sex offender. Such photograph shall be taken in the month
of the person's birth and six months thereafter; and
(c) Yearly if a tier I sex offender. Such photograph shall be taken in the month of the
person's birth; [and]
(4) A DNA sample from the individual, if a sample has not already been obtained; and
(5) Information regarding any temporary residence where the offender is staying
away from his or her primary residence for seven or more days, including the period of
time the offender is staying in such place, regardless of whether the temporary residence
is in Missouri or any other place.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 133
2. The offender shall provide positive identification and documentation to substantiate
the accuracy of the information completed on the offender registration form, including but not
limited to the following:
(1) A photocopy of a valid driver's license or nondriver's identification card;
(2) A document verifying proof of the offender's residency; and
(3) A photocopy of the vehicle registration for each of the offender's vehicles.
3. The Missouri state highway patrol shall maintain all required registration information
in digitized form.
4. [Upon receipt of any changes to an offender's registration information contained in
this section, the Missouri state highway patrol shall immediately notify all other jurisdictions
in which the offender is either registered or required to register.
5.] The offender shall be responsible for reviewing his or her existing registration
information for accuracy at every regular in-person appearance and, if any inaccuracies are
found, provide proof of the information in question.
5. (1) Regular in-person appearances to the registration official following initial
registration shall be required:
(a) Annually for tier I offenders;
(b) Every six months for tier II offenders; and
(c) Every ninety days for tier III offenders.
(2) For the purposes of establishing a schedule for registration appearances, the
registration official shall ensure that the required registration interval is followed from the
date of any initial registration until the month of an offender's birth and at the appropriate
interval beginning from the month of the offender's birth thereafter.
6. The signed offender registration form shall serve as proof that the individual
understands his or her duty to register as a sexual offender under sections 589.400 to 589.425
and a statement to this effect shall be included on the form that the individual is required to sign
at each registration.
7. If an offender has a guardian appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction, the
guardian may sign affirming the accuracy of the offender registration form under this
section. Nothing in this subsection shall alleviate the requirements of the offender to
appear in person, nor shall this subsection be construed to affect any restrictions
applicable to an offender because of the offender's status on the sexual offender registry.
8. Notwithstanding subsection 1 of section 527.270, no person required to register
under sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall change his or her name for the period of time he
or she is required to be placed on the registry.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 134
589.410. 1. All notifications of a requirement to register shall be reported to the
sex offender registry within three days, in a manner prescribed by the Missouri state
highway patrol.
2. The [chief law enforcement] registration official shall [forward] enter the completed
offender registration [form to] forms and related updates into the sex offender registry in a
manner prescribed by the Missouri state highway patrol within three days. The Missouri state
highway patrol shall [enter] ensure the information entered into the sex offender registry is
accessible through the Missouri uniform law enforcement system (MULES) [where it is] and
forwarded to the National Crime Information Center (NCIC) in accordance with
applicable law. The information shall also be available to members of the criminal justice
system, and other entities as provided by law, upon inquiry. Certain portions of the
information shall also be published on the internet in accordance with this section.
[43.650.] 589.411. 1. The Missouri state highway patrol shall[, subject to
appropriation,] maintain a web page on the internet which shall be open to the public and shall
include a registered sexual offender search capability.
2. Except as provided in subsections 4 and 5 of this section, the registered sexual
offender search shall make it possible for any person using the internet to search for and find the
information specified in subsection 4 of this section, if known, on offenders registered in this
state pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425.
3. The registered sexual offender search shall include the capability to search for sexual
offenders by name, zip code, and by typing in an address and specifying a search within a certain
number of miles radius from that address.
4. Only the information listed in this subsection shall be provided to the public in the
registered sexual offender search:
(1) The name and any known aliases of the offender;
(2) The date of birth and any known alias dates of birth of the offender;
(3) A physical description of the offender;
(4) The residence, temporary, work, and school addresses of the offender, including the
street address, city, county, state, and zip code;
(5) Any photographs of the offender;
(6) A physical description of the offender's vehicles, including the year, make, model,
color, and license plate number;
(7) The nature and dates of all offenses qualifying the offender to register, including the
tier level assigned to the offender under sections 589.400 to 589.425;
(8) The date on which the offender was released from the department of mental health,
prison, or jail, or placed on parole, supervised release, or probation for the offenses qualifying

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 135
the offender to register;
(9) Compliance status of the offender with the provisions of section 589.400 to 589.425;
and
(10) Any online identifiers[, as defined in section 43.651,] used by the person. Such
online identifiers shall not be included in the general profile of an offender on the web page and
shall only be available to a member of the public by a search using the specific online identifier
to determine if a match exists with a registered offender.
5. Juveniles required to register under subdivision (5) of subsection 1 of section 589.400
shall be exempt from public notification on the internet to include any adjudications from
another state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country or any federal, tribal, or
military jurisdiction.
6. The Missouri state highway patrol shall regularly update the web page to remove
persons who have been ordered removed or exempt by a court in accordance with section
589.401, persons who are deceased, and persons who have moved out of the state. In the
case of a person who has moved out of the state, the entry shall remain until the Missouri
state highway patrol confirms the person has complied with all registration requirements
in the person's new state, territory, or country of residence, when applicable.
7. In addition to the web page maintained by the Missouri state highway patrol, a
registration official may maintain a web page on the internet, which shall be open to the
public and shall include a registered sexual offender search capability. Except as provided
in subsections 5 and 6 of this section, the registered sexual offender search shall make it
possible for any person using the internet to search for and find the information specified
in subsection 5 of this section, if known, on offenders registered in this state pursuant to
sections 589.400 to 589.425. The chief law enforcement officer of any county or city not
within a county may also publish in any newspaper distributed in the county or city not
within a county the offender information provided under subsection 3 of this section for
any offender residing in the county or city not within a county.
[43.651.] 589.412. [1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Electronic mail", the transmission of information or communication by the use of
the internet, a computer, a facsimile machine, a pager, a cellular telephone or other wireless
communication device, a video recorder, or other electronic means sent to a person identified
by a unique address or address number and received by that person;
(2) "Entity", a business or organization that provides internet service, electronic
communications service, remote computing service, online service, electronic mail service, or
electronic instant message or chat services whether the business or organization is within or
outside this state;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 136
(3) "Instant message", a form of real-time text communication between two or more
people. The communication is conveyed via computers connected over a network such as the
internet, or between cell phone or wireless communication device users, or over a cell phone or
wireless communication device network;
(4) "Online identifier", includes all of the following: electronic mail address and instant
message screen name, user ID, cell phone number or wireless communication device number
or identifier, chat or other internet communication name, or other identity information.
2.] Subject to appropriations, the Missouri state highway patrol shall make registry
information regarding a registered sexual offender's online identifiers available to an entity for
the purpose of allowing the entity to prescreen users or for comparison with information held
by the entity as provided by this subsection:
(1) The information obtained by an entity from the state sexual offender registry shall
not be used for any purpose other than for prescreening its users or comparing the database of
registered users of the entity against the list of online identifiers of persons in the state sexual
offender registry in order to protect children from online sexual predators. The Missouri state
highway patrol shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding the release and use of online
identifier information. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010,
that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2008, shall be invalid and void;
(2) Any entity desiring to prescreen its users or compare its database of registered users
to the list of online identifiers of persons in the state sexual offender registry may apply to the
Missouri state highway patrol to access the information. An entity that complies with the rules
and regulations promulgated by the Missouri state highway patrol regarding the release and use
of the online identifier information and pays the fee established by the Missouri state highway
patrol may screen new users or compare its database of registered users to the list of online
identifiers of persons in the state sexual offender registry as frequently as the Missouri state
highway patrol may allow for the purpose of identifying a registered user associated with an
online identifier contained in the state sexual offender registry;
(3) Any entity complying with this subsection in good faith shall be immune from any
civil or criminal liability resulting from:
(a) The entity's refusal to provide system service to a person on the basis that the entity
believed that the person was required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 137
(b) A person's criminal or tortious acts when the person is required to register pursuant
to sections 589.400 to 589.425, and the person complied with the requirement to register their
online identifiers under section 589.407, and committed the criminal or tortious acts against a
minor with whom he or she had communicated on the entity's system by using their registered
online identifier; or
(c) Any activity for which the entity would be immune from liability under 47 U.S.C.
Section 230.
[43.533.] 589.413. 1. The Missouri state highway patrol shall, subject to appropriation,
operate a toll-free telephone number in order to disseminate registration information provided
by [individuals] persons who are required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425, and
receive information from persons regarding the residency of a registered sexual offender. The
information available via the telephone number shall include only information that offenders are
required to provide under section 589.407. When the Missouri state highway patrol provides
such information regarding a sexual offender, the patrol personnel shall advise the person
making the inquiry that positive identification of a person believed to be a sexual offender
cannot be established unless a fingerprint comparison is made, and that it is illegal to use such
information regarding a registered sexual offender to facilitate the commission of a crime. The
toll-free telephone number shall be published on the Missouri state highway patrol's sexual
offender registry website maintained under section [43.650] 589.411.
2. The Missouri state highway patrol shall promulgate rules to effect the enforcement
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and
annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2006, shall be invalid and void.
[589.414. 1. Any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to
register shall, within three business days, appear in person to the chief law
enforcement officer of the county or city not within a county if there is a
change to any of the following information:
(1) Name;
(2) Residence;
(3) Employment, including status as a volunteer or intern;
(4) Student status; or
(5) A termination to any of the items listed in this subsection.
2. Any person required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425
shall, within three business days, notify the chief law enforcement official of

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 138
the county or city not within a county of any changes to the following
information:
(1) Vehicle information;
(2) Temporary lodging information;
(3) Temporary residence information;
(4) Email addresses, instant messaging addresses, and any other
designations used in internet communications, postings, or telephone
communications; or
(5) Telephone or other cellular number, including any new forms of
electronic communication.
3. The chief law enforcement official in the county or city not within
a county shall immediately forward the registration changes described under
subsections 1 and 2 of this section to the Missouri state highway patrol within
three business days.
4. If any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register
changes such person's residence or address to a different county or city not
within a county, the person shall appear in person and shall inform both the
chief law enforcement official with whom the person last registered and the
chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county having
jurisdiction over the new residence or address in writing within three business
days of such new address and phone number, if the phone number is also
changed. If any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register
changes his or her state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country,
or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of residence, the person shall appear
in person and shall inform both the chief law enforcement official with whom
the person was last registered and the chief law enforcement official of the
area in the new state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country,
or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction having jurisdiction over the new
residence or address within three business days of such new address.
Whenever a registrant changes residence, the chief law enforcement official
of the county or city not within a county where the person was previously
registered shall inform the Missouri state highway patrol of the change within
three business days. When the registrant is changing the residence to a new
state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal,
or military jurisdiction, the Missouri state highway patrol shall inform the
responsible official in the new state, territory, the District of Columbia, or
foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of residence within
three business days.
5. Tier I sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of
subsections 1 to 4 of this section, shall report in person to the chief law
enforcement official annually in the month of their birth to verify the
information contained in their statement made pursuant to section 589.407.
Tier I sexual offenders include:
(1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 139
(a) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim
is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is
a first offense and the punishment is less than one year;
(c) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the
punishment is less than a year;
(d) Kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120 with
sexual motivation;
(e) Kidnapping in the third degree under section 565.130;
(f) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable
person in the first degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is less than
one year;
(g) Sexual conduct under section 566.116 with a nursing facility
resident or vulnerable person;
(h) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the course
of public duty under section 566.145 if the victim is eighteen years of age or
older;
(i) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
(j) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section
566.209 if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
(k) Possession of child pornography under section 573.037 as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026;
(l) Possession of child sexual abuse material under section
573.037;
(m) Sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.093;
[(m)] (n) Sexual misconduct in the second degree under section
566.095;
[(n)] (o) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068
as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, if the punishment is less than one year;
[or
(o)] (p) Invasion of privacy under section 565.252 if the victim is less
than eighteen years of age; or
(q) Grooming of a minor under section 566.152;
(2) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any other state,
territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal,
or military jurisdiction of an offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual
element that is comparable to the tier I sexual offenses listed in this subsection
or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable to those
described as tier I offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and
Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act
of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
6. Tier II sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of
subsections 1 to 4 of this section, shall report semiannually in person in the
month of their birth and six months thereafter to the chief law enforcement

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 140
100 official to verify the information contained in their statement made pursuant
101 to section 589.407. Tier II sexual offenders include:
102 (1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
103 (a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under section 566.064 if
104 the victim is sixteen to seventeen years of age;
105 (b) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the
106 victim is between thirteen and fourteen years of age;
107 (c) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim
108 is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
109 (d) Enticement of a child under section 566.151;
110 (e) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual
111 nature and the victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
112 (f) Sexual exploitation of a minor under section 573.023;
113 (g) Promoting child pornography in the first degree under section
114 573.025 as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
115 (h) Promoting child sexual abuse material in the first degree
116 under section 573.025;
117 (i) Promoting child pornography in the second degree under section
118 573.035 as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
119 (j) Promoting child sexual abuse material in the second degree
120 under section 573.035;
121 [(i)] (k) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030;
122 [(j)] (l) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the
123 course of public duty under section 566.145 if the victim is thirteen to
124 seventeen years of age;
125 [(k)] (m) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071
126 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
127 [(l)] (n) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083
128 if it is a first offense and the penalty is a term of imprisonment of more than
129 a year; [or
130 (m)] (o) Age misrepresentation with intent to solicit a minor under
131 section 566.153;
132 (p) Nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images under
133 section 573.110 if the victim is seventeen years of age or under or if
134 coercion of the victim was sexual in nature; or
135 (q) Threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual
136 images under section 573.112 if the victim is seventeen years of age or
137 under or if coercion of the victim was sexual in nature;
138 (2) Any person who is adjudicated of an offense comparable to a tier
139 I offense listed in this section or failure to register offense under section
140 589.425 or comparable out-of-state failure to register offense and who is
141 already required to register as a tier I offender due to having been adjudicated
142 of a tier I offense on a previous occasion; or
143 (3) Any person who is or has been adjudicated in any other state,

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 141
144 territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal,
145 or military jurisdiction for an offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual
146 element that is comparable to the tier II sexual offenses listed in this
147 subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable to
148 those described as tier II offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and
149 Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act
150 of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
151 7. Tier III sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of
152 subsections 1 to 4 of this section, shall report in person to the chief law
153 enforcement official every ninety days to verify the information contained in
154 their statement made under section 589.407. Tier III sexual offenders include:
155 (1) Any offender registered as a predatory [sexual offender as defined
156 in section 566.123 or a] or persistent sexual offender as defined in section
157 [566.124] 566.125;
158 (2) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the crime of:
159 (a) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
160 (b) Statutory rape in the first degree under section 566.032;
161 (c) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
162 (d) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section
163 568.045 if the offense is sexual in nature;
164 (e) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
165 (f) Statutory sodomy under section 566.062;
166 (g) Statutory sodomy under section 566.064 if the victim is under
167 sixteen years of age;
168 (h) Sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061;
169 (i) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if the
170 offense is a second or subsequent offense;
171 (j) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim
172 is under thirteen years of age;
173 (k) Kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110 if the victim
174 is under eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian;
175 (l) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
176 (m) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable
177 person in the first degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is greater
178 than a year;
179 (n) Incest under section 568.020;
180 (o) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section
181 568.045 with sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse with a victim
182 under eighteen years of age;
183 (p) Child molestation in the first degree under section 566.067;
184 (q) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068;
185 (r) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the
186 victim is under thirteen years of age;
187 (s) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under section 567.050 if

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 142
188 the victim is under eighteen years of age;
189 (t) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under section 567.060
190 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
191 (u) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under section 567.070
192 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
193 (v) Promoting travel for prostitution under section 567.085 if the
194 victim is under eighteen years of age;
195 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section
196 566.209 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
197 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree under section
198 566.210;
199 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree under section
200 566.211;
201 (z) Genital mutilation of a female child under section 568.065;
202 (aa) Statutory rape in the second degree under section 566.034;
203 (bb) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if
204 the victim is under thirteen years of age;
205 (cc) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the
206 penalty is a term of imprisonment of more than a year;
207 (dd) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if the offender is
208 a persistent offender;
209 (ee) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a
210 sexual nature and the victim is under thirteen years of age;
211 (ff) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the
212 course of public duty under section 566.145 if the victim is under thirteen
213 years of age;
214 (gg) [Sexual intercourse with a prisoner or offender under section
215 566.145;
216 (hh)] Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim
217 is under thirteen years of age;
218 [(ii)] (hh) Use of a child in a sexual performance under section
219 573.200; or
220 [(jj)] (ii) Promoting a sexual performance by a child under section
221 573.205;
222 (3) Any offender who is adjudicated for a crime comparable to a tier
223 I or tier II offense listed in this section or failure to register offense under
224 section 589.425, or other comparable out-of-state failure to register offense,
225 who has been or is already required to register as a tier II offender because of
226 having been adjudicated for a tier II offense, two tier I offenses, or
227 combination of a tier I offense and failure to register offense, on a previous
228 occasion;
229 (4) Any offender who is adjudicated in any other state, territory, the
230 District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military
231 jurisdiction for an offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 143
232 comparable to a tier III offense listed in this section or a tier III offense under
233 the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh
234 Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248; or
235 (5) Any offender who is adjudicated in Missouri for any offense of a
236 sexual nature requiring registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 that is
237 not classified as a tier I or tier II offense in this section.
238 8. In addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 7 of this section,
239 all Missouri registrants who work, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern,
240 or attend any school whether public or private, including any secondary
241 school, trade school, professional school, or institution of higher education,
242 on a full-time or part-time basis or have a temporary residence in this state
243 shall be required to report in person to the chief law enforcement officer in the
244 area of the state where they work, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern,
245 or attend any school or training and register in that state. "Part-time" in this
246 subsection means for more than seven days in any twelve-month period.
247 9. If a person who is required to register as a sexual offender under
248 sections 589.400 to 589.425 changes or obtains a new online identifier as
249 defined in section 43.651, the person shall report such information in the same
250 manner as a change of residence before using such online identifier.]
589.414. 1. Any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register shall, within
three business days, appear in person to the [chief law enforcement officer of the county or city
not within a county] registration official if there is a change to any of the following
information:
(1) Name;
(2) Residence;
(3) Employment, including status as a volunteer or intern;
(4) Student status; or
(5) A termination to any of the items listed in this subsection.
2. Any person required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall, within three
business days, notify the [chief law enforcement] registration official [of the county or city not
within a county] of any changes to the following information:
(1) Vehicle information;
(2) [Temporary lodging information;
(3)] Temporary residence information;
[(4) Email addresses, instant messaging addresses, and any other designations used in
internet communications, postings, or telephone communications; or
(5)] (3) Telephone or other cellular number, including any new forms of electronic
communication; or
(4) Online identifiers.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 144
3. The [chief law enforcement] registration official [in the county or city not within a
county] shall immediately forward the registration changes described under subsections 1 and
2 of this section to the Missouri state highway patrol within three business days in accordance
with section 589.410.
4. (1) If any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register changes such
person's residence or address to a different county or city not within a county, the person shall
appear in person and shall inform both the [chief law enforcement] registration official with
whom the person last registered and the [chief law enforcement] registration official of the
county or city not within a county having jurisdiction over the new residence or address in
writing within three business days of such new address and phone number, if the phone number
is also changed.
(2) If any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register changes his or her
state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military
jurisdiction of residence, the person shall appear in person and shall inform both the [chief law
enforcement] registration official with whom the person was last registered and the [chief law
enforcement] registration official of the area in the new state, territory, the District of
Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction having jurisdiction over
the new residence or address within three business days of such new address.
(3) Whenever a registrant changes residence, the [chief law enforcement] registration
official of the county or city not within a county where the person was previously registered
shall inform the Missouri state highway patrol of the change within three business days.
(4) When the registrant is changing the residence to a new state, territory, the District
of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction, the Missouri state
highway patrol shall inform the responsible official in the new state, territory, the District of
Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of residence within three
business days.
5. Registrants shall appear in person before the registration official and complete
all forms required for such purposes by the United States Marshals Service no less than
twenty-one days before travel outside of the United States. Such information shall be
forwarded to the United States Marshals Service, and a copy shall be provided by the
registration official to the Missouri state highway patrol in a manner prescribed by the
Missouri state highway patrol.
6. Offenders shall be classified as a tier I offender, tier II offender, or tier III
offender in accordance with this section. To the extent more than one tier definition
applies to an offender, the highest tier that applies shall be the tier into which the offender
is classified.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 145
7. The initial determination as to the tier of an offender shall be made by the
registration official when an offender first appears for registration with the official. Upon
receipt of an initial offender registration from a new registration official, the Missouri state
highway patrol shall analyze the initial tier determination for accuracy. If the Missouri
state highway patrol determines the initial tier decision is inaccurate, the Missouri state
highway patrol shall notify the registration official, and the Missouri state highway patrol's
determination shall control the tier classification. Upon receipt of an updated tiering
decision, the registration official shall notify the offender no later than the next previously
scheduled in-person check-in for the offender. Upon notification of the offender or failure
of the offender to appear at the next regularly scheduled in-person check, reporting
requirements aligning with the new tier determination shall be in effect.
8. Tier I [sexual] offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to [4] 5 of
this section, shall report in person [to] before the [chief law enforcement] registration official
annually in the month of their birth to verify the information contained in their statement made
pursuant to section 589.407. [Tier I sexual offenders include:
(1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
(a) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is eighteen years
of age or older;
(b) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first offense and
the punishment is less than one year;
(c) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the punishment is less
than a year;
(d) Kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120 with sexual motivation;
(e) Kidnapping in the third degree under section 565.130;
(f) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first degree
under section 566.115 if the punishment is less than one year;
(g) Sexual conduct under section 566.116 with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable
person;
(h) Sexual contact with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145 if the victim is
eighteen years of age or older;
(i) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
(j) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the victim
is eighteen years of age or older;
(k) Possession of child pornography under section 573.037;
(l) Sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.093;
(m) Sexual misconduct in the second degree under section 566.095;

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 146
(n) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068 as it existed prior to
January 1, 2017, if the punishment is less than one year; or
(o) Invasion of privacy under section 565.252 if the victim is less than eighteen years
of age;
(2) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District
of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of an offense
of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to the tier I sexual offenses listed
100 in this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable to those described
101 as tier I offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam
102 Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
103 6.] 9. Tier II [sexual] offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to [4]
104 5 of this section, shall report semiannually in person in the month of their birth and six months
105 thereafter to the [chief law enforcement] registration official to verify the information contained
106 in their statement made pursuant to section 589.407. [Tier II sexual offenders include:
107 (1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
108 (a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under section 566.064 if the victim is sixteen
109 to seventeen years of age;
110 (b) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is between
111 thirteen and fourteen years of age;
112 (c) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is thirteen to
113 seventeen years of age;
114 (d) Enticement of a child under section 566.151;
115 (e) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
116 victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
117 (f) Sexual exploitation of a minor under section 573.023;
118 (g) Promoting child pornography in the first degree under section 573.025;
119 (h) Promoting child pornography in the second degree under section 573.035;
120 (i) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030;
121 (j) Sexual contact with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145 if the victim is
122 thirteen to seventeen years of age;
123 (k) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is thirteen
124 to seventeen years of age;
125 (l) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first offense and
126 the penalty is a term of imprisonment of more than a year; or
127 (m) Age misrepresentation with intent to solicit a minor under section 566.153;
128 (2) Any person who is adjudicated of an offense comparable to a tier I offense listed in

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 147
129 this section or failure to register offense under section 589.425 or comparable out-of-state failure
130 to register offense and who is already required to register as a tier I offender due to having been
131 adjudicated of a tier I offense on a previous occasion; or
132 (3) Any person who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District
133 of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense
134 of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to the tier II sexual offenses listed
135 in this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable to those described
136 as tier II offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam
137 Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
138 7.] 10. Tier III [sexual] offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to [4]
139 5 of this section, shall report in person [to] before the [chief law enforcement] registration
140 official every ninety days to verify the information contained in their statement made under
141 section 589.407. [Tier III sexual offenders include:
142 (1) Any offender registered as a predatory sexual offender as defined in section 566.123
143 or a persistent sexual offender as defined in section 566.124;
144 (2) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the crime of:
145 (a) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
146 (b) Statutory rape in the first degree under section 566.032;
147 (c) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
148 (d) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 if the
149 offense is sexual in nature;
150 (e) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
151 (f) Statutory sodomy under section 566.062;
152 (g) Statutory sodomy under section 566.064 if the victim is under sixteen years of age;
153 (h) Sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061;
154 (i) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if the offense is a second
155 or subsequent offense;
156 (j) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is under thirteen
157 years of age;
158 (k) Kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110 if the victim is under eighteen
159 years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian;
160 (l) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
161 (m) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
162 degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is greater than a year;
163 (n) Incest under section 568.020;
164 (o) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 with

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 148
165 sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse with a victim under eighteen years of age;
166 (p) Child molestation in the first degree under section 566.067;
167 (q) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068;
168 (r) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is under
169 thirteen years of age;
170 (s) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under section 567.050 if the victim is under
171 eighteen years of age;
172 (t) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under section 567.060 if the victim is
173 under eighteen years of age;
174 (u) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under section 567.070 if the victim is
175 under eighteen years of age;
176 (v) Promoting travel for prostitution under section 567.085 if the victim is under
177 eighteen years of age;
178 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the victim
179 is under eighteen years of age;
180 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree under section 566.210;
181 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree under section 566.211;
182 (z) Genital mutilation of a female child under section 568.065;
183 (aa) Statutory rape in the second degree under section 566.034;
184 (bb) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is under
185 thirteen years of age;
186 (cc) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the penalty is a term of
187 imprisonment of more than a year;
188 (dd) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if the offender is a persistent
189 offender;
190 (ee) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
191 victim is under thirteen years of age;
192 (ff) Sexual contact with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145 if the victim is
193 under thirteen years of age;
194 (gg) Sexual intercourse with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145;
195 (hh) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is under thirteen
196 years of age;
197 (ii) Use of a child in a sexual performance under section 573.200; or
198 (jj) Promoting a sexual performance by a child under section 573.205;
199 (3) Any offender who is adjudicated for a crime comparable to a tier I or tier II offense
200 listed in this section or failure to register offense under section 589.425, or other comparable

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 149
201 out-of-state failure to register offense, who has been or is already required to register as a tier
202 II offender because of having been adjudicated for a tier II offense, two tier I offenses, or
203 combination of a tier I offense and failure to register offense, on a previous occasion;
204 (4) Any offender who is adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of
205 Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense of
206 a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to a tier III offense listed in this
207 section or a tier III offense under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of
208 the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248; or
209 (5) Any offender who is adjudicated in Missouri for any offense of a sexual nature
210 requiring registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 that is not classified as a tier I or tier
211 II offense in this section.
212 8.] 11. In addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to [7] 5 and 8 to 10 of this
213 section, all Missouri registrants who work, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern, or attend
214 any school whether public or private, including any secondary school, trade school, professional
215 school, or institution of higher education, on a full-time or part-time basis or have a temporary
216 residence in this state shall be required to report in person [to] before the [chief law enforcement
217 officer] registration official in the area of the state where they work, including as a volunteer
218 or unpaid intern, or attend any school or training and register in that state. ["Part-time" in this
219 subsection means for more than seven days in any twelve-month period.
220 9.] 12. If a person who is required to register as a sexual offender under sections 589.400
221 to 589.425 changes or obtains a new online identifier [as defined in section 43.651], the person
222 shall report such information in the same manner as a change of residence before using such
223 online identifier.
589.415. [1.] Any probation officer or parole officer assigned to a sexual offender who
is required to register pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall notify the appropriate law
enforcement officials whenever the probation officer or parole officer has reason to believe
that the offender will be changing his or her residence. Upon obtaining the new address where
the offender expects to reside, the probation officer or parole officer shall report such address
to the [chief law enforcement] registration official with whom the offender last registered and
the [chief law enforcement] registration official of the county having jurisdiction over the new
residence, if different. The probation officer or parole officer shall also inform the offender
of the offender's duty to register. However, nothing in this section shall affect the offender's
duty to register, pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425.
[2. As used in this section, the term "probation officer" includes any agent of a private
entity assigned to provide probation supervision services to an offender due to the offender's
status as a sexual offender who is required to register pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425.]

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 150
589.417. 1. Except for the specific information listed in subsection 2 of this section, the
complete statements, photographs and fingerprints required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall
not be subject to the provisions of chapter 610 and are not public records as defined in section
610.010, and shall be available only to courts, prosecutors and law enforcement agencies.
2. [Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the chief law enforcement
official of the county] (1) The following information shall be available as an open record
under chapter 610:
(a) Any information retained by the Missouri state highway patrol required to be
published on the internet at the time of the request, as provided in section 589.411; and
(b) The name, offense requiring registration, dates of registration, and compliance
status of any offender who has been removed from the internet because of death or a move
out of the state. For offenders who have moved out of the state, the new state of residence
shall also be an open record.
(2) The registration official shall maintain, for all offenders registered in such county,
a complete list of the names, addresses and crimes for which such offenders are registered. Any
person may request such list from the [chief law enforcement] registration official of the
county.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to open any records relating to an
offender who has been removed from the sexual offender registry or found exempt under
section 589.401. Such records shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 610.
4. The metadata recorded by the sex offender registry system, website, or other
related databases utilized by the sex offender registry including activity logs, user
information, or other related information shall be a closed record, available only to
authorized users for the administration of criminal justice, as the term "administration of
criminal justice" is defined in section 43.500.
[589.425. 1. A person commits the crime of failing to register as a sex
offender when the person is required to register under sections 589.400 to
589.425 and fails to comply with any requirement of sections 589.400 to
589.425. Failing to register as a sex offender is a class E felony unless the
person is required to register based on having committed an offense in chapter
566 which was an unclassified felony, a class A or B felony, or a felony
involving a child under the age of fourteen, in which case it is a class D
felony.
2. A person commits the crime of failing to register as a sex offender
as a second offense by failing to comply with any requirement of sections
589.400 to 589.425 and he or she has previously pled guilty to or has
previously been found guilty of failing to register as a sex offender. Failing
to register as a sex offender as a second offense is a class E felony unless the
person is required to register based on having committed an offense in chapter

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 151
566, or an offense in any other state or foreign country, or under federal,
tribal, or military jurisdiction, which if committed in this state would be an
offense under chapter 566 which was an unclassified felony, a class A or B
felony, or a felony involving a child under the age of fourteen, in which case
it is a class D felony.
3. (1) A person commits the crime of failing to register as a sex
offender as a third offense by failing to meet the requirements of sections
589.400 to 589.425 and he or she has, on two or more occasions, previously
pled guilty to or has previously been found guilty of failing to register as a sex
offender. Failing to register as a sex offender as a third offense is a class A
felony, which shall be punished by a term of imprisonment of not less than ten
years and not more than thirty years.
(2) No court may suspend the imposition or execution of sentence of
a person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of failing to register as a sex
offender as a third offense. No court may sentence such person to pay a fine
in lieu of a term of imprisonment.
(3) [A person sentenced under this subsection shall not be eligible for
conditional release or parole until he or she has served at least two years of
imprisonment.
(4)] Upon release, an offender who has committed failing to register
as a sex offender as a third offense shall be electronically monitored as a
mandatory condition of supervision. Electronic monitoring may be based on
a global positioning system or any other technology which identifies and
records the offender's location at all times.]
589.425. 1. A person commits the crime of failing to register as a sex offender when the
person is required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 and fails to comply with any
requirement of sections 589.400 to 589.425. Failing to register as a sex offender is a class E
felony unless the person is required to register based on having committed an offense in chapter
566 which was an unclassified felony, a class A or B felony, or a felony involving a child under
the age of fourteen, in which case it is a class D felony.
2. A person commits the crime of failing to register as a sex offender as a second offense
by failing to comply with any requirement of sections 589.400 to 589.425 and he or she has
previously pled guilty to or has previously been found guilty of failing to register as a sex
offender. Failing to register as a sex offender as a second offense is a class E felony unless the
person is required to register based on having committed an offense in chapter 566, or an offense
in any other state or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction, which if
committed in this state would be an offense under chapter 566 which was an unclassified felony,
a class A or B felony, or a felony involving a child under the age of fourteen, in which case it
is a class D felony.
3. (1) A person commits the crime of failing to register as a sex offender as a third

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 152
offense by failing to meet the requirements of sections 589.400 to 589.425 and he or she has, on
two or more occasions, previously pled guilty to or has previously been found guilty of failing
to register as a sex offender. Failing to register as a sex offender as a third offense is a class A
felony, which shall be punished by a term of imprisonment of not less than ten years and not
more than thirty years.
(2) No court may suspend the imposition or execution of sentence of a person who
pleads guilty to or is found guilty of failing to register as a sex offender as a third offense. No
court may sentence such person to pay a fine in lieu of a term of imprisonment.
(3) [A person sentenced under this subsection shall not be eligible for conditional release
or parole until he or she has served at least two years of imprisonment.
(4)] Upon release, an offender who has committed failing to register as a sex offender
as a third offense shall be electronically monitored as a mandatory condition of supervision.
Electronic monitoring may be based on a global positioning system or any other technology
which identifies and records the offender's location at all times.
589.900. 1. For the purposes of sections 589.900 to 589.902, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Authorized individuals", peace officers, as defined in section 590.010, who are
certified in accordance with federal requirements, including the Homeland Security Act
of 2002, Pub. L. 107-296, as amended, when applicable, to conduct unmanned aircraft and
unmanned aerial system mitigation;
(2) "Mitigate", any of the following actions:
(a) During the operation of an unmanned aircraft system, to detect, identify,
monitor, or track the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft, without prior
consent, including by means of intercept or other access of a wire communication, an oral
communication, or an electronic communication used to control the unmanned aircraft
system or unmanned aircraft;
(b) To warn the operator of the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft,
including by passive or active and direct or indirect physical, electronic, radio, or
electromagnetic means, or through the use of remote identification broadcast or other
means;
(c) To disrupt control of the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft,
without prior consent, including by disabling the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned
aircraft by intercepting, interfering, or causing interference with wire, oral, electronic, or
radio communications used to control the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned
aircraft;
(d) To seize or exercise control of the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 153
aircraft; or
(e) To use reasonable force, if necessary, to disable, damage, or destroy the
unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft.
2. The terms "unmanned aircraft" and "unmanned aircraft system" shall have the
meanings given such terms in 49 U.S.C. Section 44801.
589.902. 1. To the greatest extent permissible under applicable federal law,
including the Homeland Security Act of 2002, Pub. L. 107-296, as amended, authorized
individuals in this state shall be empowered to take necessary action to mitigate a credible
threat that an unmanned aircraft or unmanned aircraft system poses to the safety or
security of people, facilities, assets, a venue or set of venues used for large-scale public
gatherings or events, critical infrastructure, or correctional facilities.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the power of a law enforcement
officer in this state to seize an unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft in the
course of their duties. A law enforcement officer may use all lawful means to effect such
a seizure, which may include the use of mitigation techniques where permissible.
3. Any unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft seized under this section
or in connection with a criminal act shall be subject to forfeiture under section 513.607.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the jamming of or
interference with any signal, except in accordance with all applicable federal laws, rules,
and regulations, including, but not limited to, the Homeland Security Act of 2002, Pub. L.
107-296, as amended.
590.192. 1. There is hereby established the "Critical Incident Stress Management
Program" within the department of public safety. The program shall provide services for peace
officers and first responders to assist in coping with stress and potential psychological trauma
resulting from a response to a critical incident or emotionally difficult event. Such services may
include consultation, risk assessment, education, intervention, and other crisis intervention
services provided by the department to peace officers and first responders affected by a critical
incident. For purposes of this section, a "critical incident" shall mean any event outside the
usual realm of human experience that is markedly distressing or evokes reactions of intense fear,
helplessness, or horror and involves the perceived threat to a person's physical integrity or the
physical integrity of someone else. For purposes of this section, the term "first responder" shall
have the same meaning as first responder in section 190.1010.
2. All peace officers and first responders shall be required to meet with a program
service provider once every three to five years for a mental health check-in, or a department
established behavioral health or mental health program that meets the requirements of
subsection 1 of this section which shall satisfy this requirement. The program service

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 154
provider shall send a notification to the peace officer's commanding officer, or first responder's
commanding officer, or first responder's director or supervisor that he or she completed such
check-in.
3. Any information disclosed by a peace officer or first responder shall be privileged and
shall not be used as evidence in criminal, administrative, or civil proceedings against the peace
officer or first responder unless:
(1) A program representative reasonably believes the disclosure is necessary to prevent
harm to a person who received services or to prevent harm to another person;
(2) The person who received the services provides written consent to the disclosure; or
(3) The person receiving services discloses information that is required to be reported
under mandatory reporting laws.
4. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "988 Public Safety Fund", which
shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and moneys in the fund shall be used
solely by the department of public safety for the purposes of providing services for peace
officers and first responders to assist in coping with stress and potential psychological trauma
resulting from a response to a critical incident or emotionally difficult event pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section. Such services may include consultation, risk assessment, education,
intervention, and other crisis intervention services provided by the department to peace officers
or first responders affected by a critical incident. The director of public safety may prescribe
rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion
of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated
in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536
to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2021, shall be invalid and void.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds
are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
632.305. 1. An application for detention for evaluation and treatment at a mental health
facility may be executed by any adult person, who need not be an attorney or represented by an

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 155
attorney, on a form provided by the court for such purpose, and shall allege under oath[, without
a notarization requirement,] that the applicant has reason to believe that the respondent is
suffering from a mental disorder and presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself
or to others. The application shall specify the factual information on which such belief is based
and should contain the names and addresses of all persons known to the applicant who have
knowledge of such facts through personal observation.
2. The filing of a written application in court by any adult person, who need not be an
attorney or represented by an attorney, shall authorize the applicant to bring the matter before
the court on an ex parte basis to determine whether the respondent should be taken into custody
and transported to a mental health facility. The application may be filed in the court having
probate jurisdiction in any county where the respondent may be found. If the court finds that
there is probable cause, either upon testimony under oath or upon a review of affidavits,
declarations, or other supporting documentation, to believe that the respondent may be suffering
from a mental disorder and presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others,
it shall direct a peace officer to take the respondent into custody and transport him or her to a
mental health facility for detention for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed
ninety-six hours unless further detention and treatment is authorized pursuant to this chapter.
Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the court, in the exercise of its discretion, from
giving the respondent an opportunity to be heard.
3. A peace officer may take a person into custody for detention for evaluation and
treatment at a mental health facility for a period not to exceed ninety-six hours only when such
peace officer has reasonable cause to believe that such person is suffering from a mental disorder
and that the likelihood of serious harm by such person to himself or herself or others is imminent
unless such person is immediately taken into custody. Upon arrival at the mental health facility,
the peace officer who conveyed such person or caused him or her to be conveyed shall either
present the application for detention for evaluation and treatment upon which the court has
issued a finding of probable cause and the respondent was taken into custody or complete an
application for initial detention for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed ninety-six
hours which shall be based upon his or her own personal observations or investigations and shall
contain the information required in subsection 1 of this section.
4. If a person presents himself or herself or is presented by others to a mental health
facility and a licensed physician, a registered professional nurse or a mental health professional
designated by the head of the facility and approved by the department for such purpose has
reasonable cause to believe that the person is mentally disordered and presents an imminent
likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others unless he or she is accepted for
detention, the licensed physician, the mental health professional or the registered professional

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 156
nurse designated by the facility and approved by the department may complete an application
for detention for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed ninety-six hours. The
application shall be based on his or her own personal observations or investigation and shall
contain the information required in subsection 1 of this section.
5. (1) No notarization shall be required for an application, or for any affidavits,
declarations, or other documents supporting an application, completed or executed, by:
(a) A peace officer under subsection 3 of this section;
(b) A licensed physician, mental health professional, or registered professional
nurse under subsection 4 of this section; or
(c) An employee acting on behalf of a hospital, as defined in section 197.020, under
subsections 1 and 2 of this section.
(2) The application and any affidavits, declarations, or other documents supporting the
application shall be subject to the provisions of section 492.060 allowing for declaration under
penalty of perjury.
632.489. 1. Upon filing a petition pursuant to section 632.484 or 632.486, the judge
shall determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the person named in the petition
is a sexually violent predator. If such probable cause determination is made, the judge shall
direct that person be taken into custody and direct that the person be transferred to an appropriate
secure facility, including, but not limited to, a county jail. If the person is ordered to the
department of mental health, the director of the department of mental health shall determine the
appropriate secure facility to house the person under the provisions of section 632.495.
2. Within seventy-two hours after a person is taken into custody pursuant to subsection
1 of this section, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, such person shall be provided
with notice of, and an opportunity to appear in person at, a hearing to contest probable cause as
to whether the detained person is a sexually violent predator. At this hearing the court shall:
(1) Verify the detainee's identity; and
(2) Determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the person is a sexually
violent predator. The state may rely upon the petition and supplement the petition with
additional documentary evidence or live testimony.
3. At the probable cause hearing as provided in subsection 2 of this section, the detained
person shall have the following rights in addition to the rights previously specified:
(1) To be represented by counsel;
(2) To present evidence on such person's behalf;
(3) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against such person; and
(4) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file, including the assessment
of the multidisciplinary team.

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 157
4. If the probable cause determination is made, the court shall direct that the person be
transferred to an appropriate secure facility, including, but not limited to, a county jail, for an
evaluation as to whether the person is a sexually violent predator. If the person is ordered to the
department of mental health, the director of the department of mental health shall determine the
appropriate secure facility, which may include the department of corrections or a county jail
as set forth in section 632.495, to house the person. The court shall direct the director of the
department of mental health to have the person examined by a psychiatrist or psychologist as
defined in section 632.005 who was not a member of the multidisciplinary team that previously
reviewed the person's records. In addition, such person may be examined by a consenting
psychiatrist or psychologist of the person's choice at the person's own expense. Any
examination shall be conducted in the facility in which the person is confined. Any
examinations ordered shall be made at such time and under such conditions as the court deems
proper; except that, if the order directs the director of the department of mental health to have
the person examined, the director shall determine the time, place and conditions under which the
examination shall be conducted. The psychiatrist or psychologist conducting such an
examination shall be authorized to interview family and associates of the person being
examined, as well as victims and witnesses of the person's offense or offenses, for use in the
examination unless the court for good cause orders otherwise. The psychiatrist or psychologist
shall have access to all materials provided to and considered by the multidisciplinary team and
to any police reports related to sexual offenses committed by the person being examined. Any
examination performed pursuant to this section shall be completed and filed with the court
within sixty days of the date the order is received by the director or other evaluator unless the
court for good cause orders otherwise. One examination shall be provided at no charge by the
department. All costs of any subsequent evaluations shall be assessed to the party requesting
the evaluation.
632.492. Within sixty days after the completion of any examination held pursuant to
section 632.489, the court shall conduct a trial to determine whether the person is a sexually
violent predator. The trial may be continued upon the request of either party and a showing of
good cause, or by the court on its own motion in the due administration of justice, and when the
respondent will not be substantially prejudiced. At all stages of the proceedings pursuant to
sections 632.480 to 632.513, any person subject to sections 632.480 to 632.513 shall be entitled
to the assistance of counsel, and if the person is indigent, the court shall appoint counsel to assist
such person. The person, the attorney general, or the judge shall have the right to demand that
the trial be before a jury. If the trial is held before a jury, the judge shall instruct the jury that
if it finds that the person is a sexually violent predator, the person shall be committed to the
custody of the director of the department of mental health to be housed in an appropriate

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 158
secure facility, as determined by the director of the department of mental health as set
forth in section 632.495, for control, care and treatment. If no demand for a jury is made, the
trial shall be before the court. The court shall conduct all trials pursuant to this section in open
court, except as otherwise provided for by the child victim witness protection law pursuant to
sections 491.675 to 491.705.
632.495. 1. The court or jury shall determine whether, by clear and convincing
evidence, the person is a sexually violent predator. If such determination that the person is a
sexually violent predator is made by a jury, such determination shall be by unanimous verdict
of such jury. Any determination as to whether a person is a sexually violent predator may be
appealed.
2. If the court or jury determines that the person is a sexually violent predator, the person
shall be committed to the custody of the director of the department of mental health for control,
care and treatment until such time as the person's mental abnormality has so changed that the
person is safe to be at large. Such control, care and treatment shall be provided or arranged by
the department of mental health in an appropriate secure facility, as determined by the
director of the department of mental health as set forth in this section.
3. At all times, persons ordered to the department of mental health after a determination
by the court that such persons may meet the definition of a sexually violent predator, persons
ordered to the department of mental health after a finding of probable cause under section
632.489, and persons committed for control, care and treatment by the department of mental
health pursuant to sections 632.480 to 632.513 shall be kept in a secure facility designated by
the director of the department of mental health and such persons shall be segregated at all times
from any other patient under the supervision of the director of the department of mental health.
The department of mental health shall not place or house a person ordered to the department of
mental health after a determination by the court that such person may meet the definition of a
sexually violent predator, a person ordered to the department of mental health after a finding of
probable cause under section 632.489, or a person committed for control, care, and treatment by
the department of mental health, pursuant to sections 632.480 to 632.513, with other mental
health patients. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a person who has been
conditionally released under section 632.505.
4. The department of mental health is authorized to enter into an interagency agreement
with the department of corrections for the confinement of [such] persons ordered to the
department of mental health after a determination by the court that such persons may
meet the definition of a sexually violent predator or for the confinement of persons ordered
to the department of mental health after a finding of probable cause under section 632.489,
provided the department of corrections has necessary space and services available and the

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 159
director of the department of corrections has agreed to provide such confinement through
an interagency agreement with the department of mental health. Such persons who are in
the confinement of the department of corrections pursuant to an interagency agreement shall be
housed and managed separately from offenders in the custody of the department of corrections,
and except for occasional instances of supervised incidental contact, shall be segregated from
such offenders. If the department of mental health and the department of corrections have
entered into an interagency agreement as provided in this subsection, the department of
corrections is authorized to enter into one or more contract agreements as may be
necessary to perform the agreed upon responsibilities of the department of corrections
under the interagency agreement including, but not limited to, a contract agreement with
one or more licensed professionals or providers of health care services to provide health
care services to the persons identified in this subsection.
5. The department of mental health is authorized to enter into a contract agreement with
one or more county jails in Missouri for the confinement of persons ordered to the department
of mental health after a determination by the court that such persons may meet the definition of
a sexually violent predator or for the confinement of persons ordered to the department of mental
health after a finding of probable cause under section 632.489. Such persons who are in the
confinement of a county jail pursuant to a contract agreement shall be housed and managed
separately from offenders in the custody of the county jail, and except for occasional instances
of supervised incidental contact, shall be segregated from such offenders.
6. The department of mental health is authorized to enter into an interagency
agreement with the department of corrections for the control and care, including health
care services, of persons committed to the department of mental health by the court as a
sexually violent predator, provided the department of corrections has necessary space and
services available and the director of the department of corrections has agreed to provide
such control and care through an interagency agreement with the department of mental
health. Such persons who are in the control and care of the department of corrections
under an interagency agreement shall be housed and managed separately from offenders
in the custody of the department of corrections, and except for occasional instances of
supervised incidental contact, shall be segregated from such offenders. If the department
of mental health and the department of corrections have entered into an interagency
agreement as provided in this subsection, the department of corrections is authorized to
enter into one or more contract agreements as may be necessary to perform the agreed
upon responsibilities of the department of corrections under the interagency agreement
including, but not limited to, a contract agreement with one or more licensed professionals
or providers of health care services to provide health care services to the persons identified

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 160
in this subsection.
7. The department of mental health is authorized to enter into a contract agreement
with one or more licensed professionals or providers of health care or mental health care
services to provide health care or mental health care services to persons ordered to the
department of mental health after a determination by the court that such persons may
meet the definition of a sexually violent predator, persons ordered to the department of
mental health after a finding of probable cause under section 632.489, and persons
committed for control, care, and treatment by the department of mental health under
sections 632.480 to 632.513.
8. If the court or jury is not satisfied by clear and convincing evidence that the person
is a sexually violent predator, the court shall direct the person's release.
[7.] 9. Upon a mistrial, the court shall direct that the person be held at an appropriate
secure facility, including, but not limited to, a county jail, until another trial is conducted. If the
person is ordered to the department of mental health, the director of the department of mental
health shall determine the appropriate secure facility to house the person. Any subsequent trial
following a mistrial shall be held within ninety days of the previous trial, unless such subsequent
trial is continued as provided in section 632.492.
632.504. Nothing in sections 632.480 to 632.513 shall prohibit a person from filing a
petition for release pursuant to sections 632.480 to 632.513. However, if a person has previously
filed a petition for release without the [director's] director of the department of mental
health's approval and the court determined either upon review of the petition or following a
hearing that the petitioner's petition was frivolous or that the petitioner's condition had not so
changed that the person was safe to be at large, then the court shall deny the subsequent petition
unless the petition contains facts upon which a court could find the condition of the petitioner
had so changed that a hearing was warranted. Upon receipt of a first or subsequent petition from
committed persons without the director's approval, the court shall endeavor whenever possible
to review the petition and determine if the petition is based upon frivolous grounds and if so
shall deny the petition without a hearing.
632.520. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Employee of the department of mental health", a person who is an employee of the
department of mental health, an employee or contracted employee of a subcontractor of the
department of mental health, or an employee or contracted employee of a subcontractor of an
entity [responsible for confining offenders] under an interagency agreement or contract with
the department of mental health as authorized by section 632.495;
(2) "Offender", a person ordered to the department of mental health after a determination
by the court that the person meets the definition of a sexually violent predator, a person ordered

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 161
to the department of mental health after a finding of probable cause under section 632.489, or
a person committed for control, care, and treatment by the department of mental health under
sections 632.480 to 632.513;
(3) "Secure facility", a facility operated by the department of mental health or an entity
[responsible for confining offenders] designated by the department of mental health to
confine offenders or provide control and care to offenders as authorized by section 632.495.
2. No offender shall knowingly commit violence to an employee of the department of
mental health or to another offender housed in a secure facility. Violation of this subsection
shall be a class B felony.
3. No offender shall knowingly damage any building or other property owned or
operated by the department of mental health. Violation of this subsection shall be a class D
felony.
632.580. The definitions set forth in section 632.005 shall apply to sections 632.580
to 632.610. In addition, as used in sections 632.580 to 632.610, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Assisted outpatient treatment", court-ordered involuntary outpatient mental
health care services that are provided by a mental health program under a treatment plan
developed and monitored by a master's level mental health professional. Such services
may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Case management;
(b) Medication management;
(c) Therapy or counseling;
(d) Substance use treatment, if applicable;
(e) Crisis intervention services; and
(f) Assistance with housing, employment, or other community resources necessary
for an individual's stability;
(2) "Case manager", a mental health professional employed by a certified
community mental health center who is assigned to a respondent to oversee the
respondent's compliance with the outpatient treatment plan ordered by the court under
sections 632.580 to 632.610;
(3) "Community mental health center", the same meaning given to the term in
section 205.975;
(4) "Comprehensive mental health services", the same meaning given to the term
in section 205.975;
(5) "Local public health agency", a county health center board established under
chapter 205, a county health department, a combined city and county health department

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 162
or agency, a multicounty health department or agency, or any other county health
authority;
(6) "Petition", a petition for assisted outpatient treatment filed under section
632.585 or for continued assisted outpatient treatment filed under section 632.600;
(7) "Respondent", a person who is alleged in a petition to meet the criteria for
assisted outpatient treatment in section 632.590;
(8) "Service area", the same meaning given to the term in section 205.975.
632.585. 1. A petition for an order authorizing assisted outpatient treatment may
be filed by:
(1) The director, administrator, or treating physician of a mental health program
in which the respondent is hospitalized;
(2) The director, administrator, or treating physician of an emergency receiving
center in which the respondent is receiving services;
(3) A licensed physician, a registered professional nurse designated by the
community mental health center and approved by the department of mental health, or a
mental health professional from whom the respondent is receiving services;
(4) The appointed guardian or limited guardian of a ward who is the respondent;
or
(5) The department of health and senior services, the department of mental health,
or any local public health agency located within the probate jurisdiction in which the
petition is filed.
2. The petition may be filed in the court having probate jurisdiction in which the
respondent is present or reasonably believed to be present or in the probate jurisdiction
in which the respondent resides.
3. The petition shall allege under oath, without a notarization requirement, that the
petitioner has reason to believe that the respondent meets the criteria for assisted
outpatient treatment in section 632.590. The petition shall specify factual information on
which such belief is based and shall contain the names and addresses of all persons known
to the petitioner who have knowledge of such facts through personal observation.
4. No notarization shall be required for a petition or for any affidavits,
declarations, or other documents supporting a petition. The petition and any affidavits,
declarations, or other documents supporting the petition shall be subject to the provisions
of section 492.060 allowing for declaration under penalty of perjury.
5. The prosecuting attorney of the county in which a hearing on a petition takes
place shall represent the petitioner and file and prosecute in court all petitions. Such duty
shall be fulfilled by the county counselor in counties having a county counselor and by the

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 163
circuit attorney in any city not within a county.
632.590. Following receipt of a petition and completion of the procedures required
in section 632.593, a court may issue an order requiring a respondent to participate in
assisted outpatient treatment if:
(1) The respondent:
(a) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Is suffering from a mental illness;
(c) Will not obtain treatment in the community voluntarily; and
(d) Is unable to make an informed decision to seek or to comply with voluntary
treatment; and
(2) Either:
(a) Because of the respondent's fulfillment of the criteria of subdivision (1) of this
section, the respondent requires treatment to prevent a deterioration in the respondent's
mental illness that would be likely to result in serious harm to the respondent or others as
described in section 632.305; or
(b) The respondent has a history of a lack of compliance with treatment for the
respondent's mental illness, and within the thirty-six months immediately preceding the
date of the filing of the petition such lack of compliance has either:
a. At least twice, been a significant factor in necessitating a civil detention period
for treatment instituted under sections 632.120 or 632.305 or receipt of services in a
forensic or other mental health unit of any state or local correctional facility, not including
any period during which the respondent was hospitalized or incarcerated immediately
preceding the date of the filing of the petition; or
b. Resulted in one or more acts of violent behavior with the intention of causing
serious physical injury toward self or others or threats of, or attempts of, serious physical
harm to self or others, not including any period during which the respondent was
hospitalized or incarcerated immediately preceding the date of the filing of the petition.
632.593. 1. At the time of filing the petition, the court clerk shall set a date and
time for the hearing, which shall take place within two judicial days of the filing of the
petition. An attorney shall be appointed to represent the respondent as required under
section 632.450 from the register of attorneys described in section 632.415. An attorney
so appointed shall be entitled to attorney's fees to the same extent as allowed under section
632.415. The clerk shall promptly notify the respondent, the respondent's attorney, the
petitioner, and the petitioner's attorney of the date and time for the hearing. The court
shall not grant continuances except upon a showing of good and sufficient cause.
2. The hearing shall be conducted in as informal a manner as may be consistent

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 164
with orderly procedure and in a physical setting not likely to have a harmful effect on the
respondent. The respondent shall have the following rights in addition to those specified
elsewhere:
(1) To be represented by an attorney;
(2) To present evidence on his or her own behalf;
(3) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;
(4) To remain silent;
(5) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file of his or her case;
(6) To have the hearing open or closed to the public as he or she elects;
(7) To be proceeded against according to the rules of evidence applicable to civil
judicial proceedings; and
(8) To have the hearing before a jury if requested by the respondent or his or her
attorney.
3. The respondent shall be present at the hearing unless the respondent's physical
condition is such that he or she cannot be present in the courtroom or if the court
determines that the respondent's conduct in the courtroom is so disruptive that the
proceedings cannot reasonably continue.
4. The burden of proof at the hearing shall be by clear and convincing evidence and
shall be upon the petitioner.
5. If the matter is tried before a jury, the jury shall determine and shall be
instructed only upon the issue of whether the respondent meets the criteria for assisted
outpatient treatment in section 632.590. The remaining procedures for the jury trial shall
be as in other civil matters.
6. The respondent shall not be required to file an answer or other responsive
pleading.
7. At the conclusion of the hearing, if the court or jury finds, based upon clear and
convincing evidence, that the respondent meets the criteria for assisted outpatient
treatment in section 632.590, and the court finds that a mental health program appropriate
to handle the respondent's condition has agreed to accept the respondent, the court shall
issue an order requiring the respondent to participate in assisted outpatient treatment with
the mental health program for a period not to exceed two years.
8. At the conclusion of the hearing, if the court or jury does not find by clear and
convincing evidence that the respondent meets the criteria for assisted outpatient
treatment in section 632.590, the court shall dismiss the petition.
9. An order requiring the respondent to participate in assisted outpatient treatment
based on satisfaction of the provisions of subparagraph a. of paragraph (b) of subdivision

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 165
(2) of section 632.590 shall not be issued unless the court has considered, or the jury has
been instructed to consider, at least the following factors:
(1) The respondent's ability to access finances in order to obtain food or medicine;
(2) The respondent's ability to obtain treatment for the respondent's medical
condition;
(3) The respondent's ability to access necessary resources in the community without
assistance;
(4) The degree to which there are risks to the respondent's safety;
(5) The likelihood that the respondent will decompensate without immediate care
or treatment;
(6) The respondent's previous attempts to inflict physical injury on self or others;
(7) The respondent's history of behavioral health treatment in the community;
(8) The respondent's patterns of decompensation in the past;
(9) The respondent's risk of being victimized or harmed by others; and
(10) The respondent's access to the means to inflict harm on self or others.
10. Nothing in this section shall prevent the court or jury from considering any
other factor not described in this section.
11. If requested by the respondent, the court shall appoint an available licensed
physician or licensed psychologist to examine the respondent and testify at the
respondent's request. If the respondent or the respondent's attorney so requests, the court
shall not appoint a licensed physician or licensed psychologist who is an employee of any
entity in which the respondent is hospitalized or receiving services or who is an employee
of any entity that filed the petition. The appointment procedures in section 632.420 shall
apply to any appointment under this subsection.
12. The physician-patient privilege recognized by section 491.060 and the
psychologist-patient privilege recognized by section 337.055 shall be deemed waived in
proceedings under sections 632.580 to 632.610. The fact that such privileges have been
waived in accordance with this section shall not by itself waive the privileges in any other
proceeding, civil or criminal. The waiver of the privileges shall extend only to that
evidence that is directly material and relevant to the proceedings under sections 632.580
to 632.610.
13. Appeals from court orders under this section may be made as described in
section 632.430.
14. Assisted outpatient treatment shall not be deemed outpatient detention for
purposes of this chapter, and no provision of this chapter relating to the requirements for
inpatient or outpatient detention proceedings shall apply to assisted outpatient treatment

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 166
under sections 632.580 to 632.610 unless such provision has been specifically incorporated
into sections 632.580 to 632.610 by reference or otherwise.
15. The provisions of section 632.440 shall apply to assisted outpatient treatment
under sections 632.580 to 632.610.
632.595. 1. The court shall assign a case manager from a certified community
behavioral health clinic to each respondent ordered to participate in assisted outpatient
treatment.
2. The case manager and the respondent shall report to the court at least once every
ninety days. The court may, at its discretion, request more frequent appearances. The
case manager shall immediately report to the court a substantial failure of the respondent
or the mental health program providing the assisted outpatient treatment to comply with
the conditions of the assisted outpatient treatment.
632.600. 1. The court order for assisted outpatient treatment shall expire at the end
of the period specified in the order unless a petition for an extension has been filed. If any
person or entity authorized to file a petition under section 632.585 determines that a
respondent requires further involuntary assisted outpatient treatment, the person or entity
shall file a petition for continued assisted outpatient treatment before the expiration of the
involuntary assisted outpatient treatment ordered by the court.
2. The procedure for obtaining an extension shall be the same as for obtaining the
original order, except that the thirty-six-month time period provided in paragraph (b) of
subdivision (2) of section 632.590 shall not be applicable in determining the
appropriateness of an extension.
632.605. 1. During the period of an order for assisted outpatient treatment, if the
mental health program or mental health professional who is providing the respondent's
assisted outpatient treatment determines that the respondent is not complying with the
court order, the mental health program or mental health professional shall notify the court
immediately.
2. If it comes to the attention of the court that a respondent subject to an order of
assisted outpatient treatment is not complying with the order, the court may require one
or more of the following, without a hearing:
(1) That the respondent be taken for evaluation to a community mental health
center providing comprehensive mental health services to individuals residing in the
service area in which the respondent resides;
(2) That the respondent be hospitalized in a psychiatric hospital for a period of not
more than ten days; and
(3) Upon recommendation by the community mental health center providing

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 167
comprehensive mental health services to individuals residing in the service area in which
the respondent resides, that the individual be hospitalized for a period of more than ten
days, but not longer than the duration of the order for assisted outpatient treatment, or not
longer than ninety days, whichever is less.
3. The court may direct peace officers to transport the respondent to a designated
facility or a community mental health center, as applicable, and the court may specify
conditions under which the respondent may return to assisted outpatient treatment before
the order expires. Reimbursement for transportation costs shall be allowed as provided
under section 632.312.
4. A respondent hospitalized without a hearing as provided in subsection 2 of this
section may object to the hospitalization. Upon transfer of the respondent to the hospital,
the hospital shall notify the respondent of his or her right to object under this section.
Upon receipt of an objection to the hospitalization, the court shall schedule a hearing for
a determination that the individual requires hospitalization. The respondent shall have
all rights specified in section 632.593 at the hearing. The court shall order the respondent
discharged from hospitalization unless the court or jury finds, based upon clear and
convincing evidence, that the respondent requires hospitalization as a result of the
respondent's failure to comply with the order for assisted outpatient treatment.
632.610. Beginning December 1, 2028, the office of state courts administrator shall
submit an annual report to the general assembly summarizing:
(1) The number of individuals subject to orders for assisted outpatient treatment;
(2) Statistics on compliance and noncompliance rates with assisted outpatient
treatment; and
(3) Any impact that assisted outpatient treatment has on hospitalization and
incarceration rates.
Section 1. In the event that any section, provision, clause, phrase, or word of this
act or the application thereof is declared invalid under the Constitution of the United
States or the Constitution of the State of Missouri, whether on procedural or substantive
grounds, it is the intent of the general assembly that the remaining sections of this act
remain in force and effect as far as they are capable of being carried into execution as
intended by the general assembly. The general assembly hereby declares that it would
have passed each section, provision, clause, phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact
that any one or more sections, provisions, clauses, phrases, or words of this act or the
application of this act would be declared unenforceable, unconstitutional, or invalid.
[211.436. 1. Instruments of restraint, including handcuffs, chains,
irons, or straitjackets, shall not be used on a child during a proceeding in a

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 168
juvenile court and shall be removed prior to the child's appearance before the
court unless, after a hearing, the court finds both that:
(1) The use of restraints is necessary due to one of the following
factors:
(a) Instruments of restraint are necessary to prevent physical harm to
the child or another person;
(b) The child has a history of disruptive courtroom behavior that has
placed others in potentially harmful situations or presents a substantial risk of
inflicting physical harm on himself or herself or others as evidenced by recent
behavior; or
(c) There is evidence that the child presents a substantial risk of flight
from the courtroom; and
(2) There are no less restrictive alternatives to restraints that will
prevent flight or physical harm to the child or another person including, but
not limited to, the presence of court personnel, law enforcement officers, or
bailiffs.
2. If the juvenile officer believes that there is an immediate safety or
flight risk, as provided under subsection 1 of this section, the juvenile officer
shall advise the attorney for the child and make a request in writing prior to
the commencement of the proceeding for the child to remain restrained during
the court proceeding while in the presence of the parties to the proceeding.
3. If a request for restraints is made by the juvenile officer, the court
shall order a hearing and provide the child's attorney an opportunity to be
heard before the court orders the use of restraints. If restraints are ordered, the
court shall make findings of fact in support of the order.
4. If restraints are used, the restraints shall allow the child limited
movement of the hands to read and handle documents and writings necessary
to the proceeding. Under no circumstances shall a child be restrained using
restraints fixed to a wall, floor, furniture, or other stationary object.
5. Leg restraints shall not be used on a child unless the child is
charged with a class A or class B felony, or the official overseeing custody
of the child determines the child to be an immediate safety or flight risk.]
[589.402. 1. The chief law enforcement officer of the county or city
not within a county may maintain a web page on the internet, which shall be
open to the public and shall include a registered sexual offender search
capability.
2. Except as provided in subsections 4 and 5 of this section, the
registered sexual offender search shall make it possible for any person using
the internet to search for and find the information specified in subsection 3 of
this section, if known, on offenders registered in this state pursuant to sections
589.400 to 589.425.
3. Only the information listed in this subsection shall be provided to
the public in the registered sexual offender search:

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 169
(1) The name and any known aliases of the offender;
(2) The date of birth and any known alias dates of birth of the
offender;
(3) A physical description of the offender;
(4) The residence, temporary, work, and school addresses of the
offender, including the street address, city, county, state, and zip code;
(5) Any photographs of the offender;
(6) A physical description of the offender's vehicles, including the
year, make, model, color, and license plate number;
(7) The nature and dates of all offenses qualifying the offender to
register, including the tier level assigned to the offender under sections
589.400 to 589.425;
(8) The date on which the offender was released from the department
of mental health, prison, or jail, or placed on parole, supervised release, or
probation for the offenses qualifying the offender to register;
(9) Compliance status of the offender with the provisions of sections
589.400 to 589.425; and
(10) Any online identifiers, as defined in section 43.651, used by the
person. Such online identifiers shall not be included in the general profile of
an offender on the web page and shall only be available to a member of the
public by a search using the specific online identifier to determine if a match
exists with a registered offender.
4. The chief law enforcement officer of any county or city not within
a county may publish in any newspaper distributed in the county or city not
within a county the sexual offender information provided under subsection 3
of this section for any offender residing in the county or city not within a
county.
5. Juveniles required to register under subdivision (6) of subsection
1 of section 589.400 shall be exempt from public notification to include any
adjudications from another state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
country or any federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction.]
Section B. The repeal of sections 211.436, 217.362, 217.690, 217.760, 557.011,
557.021, 558.011, 558.019, 558.026, 558.031, 558.046, 559.115, 566.030, 566.060, 566.125,
566.210, 566.211, 568.060, and 589.425 as enacted by senate substitute no. 3 for senate bill
number 888, one hundred third general assembly, second regular session, of this act shall
become effective on August 28, 2026. The repeal and reenactment of sections 217.362, 217.690,
217.760, 557.011, 557.021, 558.011, 558.019, 558.026, 558.031, 558.046, 559.115, 566.030,
566.060, 566.125, 566.210, 566.211, 568.060, and 589.425 of this act shall become effective on
January 1, 2028.
Section C. The repeal and reenactment of sections 565.002, 565.050, 565.052, 565.054,
565.056, 565.072, 565.073, 565.074, 565.076, 565.090, 565.091, 565.225, and 565.227 and the

CCS SS SCS HCS HBs 2637 & 3155 170
enactment of sections 27.117, 565.260, 565.400, and 565.405 of this act shall become effective
on July 1, 2027.
Section D. Because immediate action is necessary to address the urgent need of Missouri
law enforcement agencies to be able to ensure and provide for the safety and security of
Missouri residents from the threat that weaponized unmanned aircraft systems present to
Missouri, the enactment of sections 589.900 and 589.902 and the repeal and reenactment of
section 577.800 of this act are deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared to be an emergency act within the
meaning of the constitution, and the enactment of sections 589.900 and 589.902 and the repeal
and reenactment of section 577.800 of this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage
and approval.
T